THE INN KITCHEN.
During
a journey that I once made through the
Nctherlands
,
I had arrived one evening at the
Pomme d' Or
,
the principal inn of a small Flemish village. It was after
the hour of the
table d'hote
, so that I was obliged to make
a solitary supper from the reliques of its ampler board.
The weather was chilly; I was seated alone in one end
of a great gloomy dining-room, and my repast being over,
I had the prospect before me of a long dull evening,
without
any visible means of enlivening it. I summoned
mine host, and requested something to read; he brought
me the whole literary stock of his household, a Dutch
family-bible, an almanack in the same language, and a
number of old Paris newspapers. As I sat dozing over
one of the latter, reading old news and stale criticisms,
my ear was now and then struck with bursts of laughter
which seemed to proceed from the kitchen. Every one
that has travelled on the continent must know how
favourite
a resort the kitchen of a country inn is to the
middle and inferior order of travellers; particularly in
that equivocal kind of weather, when a fire becomes
agreeable
towards evening. I threw aside the newspaper, and
explored my way to the kitchen, to take a peep at the
group that appeared to be so merry. It was composed
partly of travellers who had arrived some hours before in
a diligence, and partly of the usual attendants and
hangers-on
of inns. They were seated round a great burnished
stove, that might have been mistaken for an altar, at
which they were worshipping. It was covered with
various kitchen vessels of resplendent brightness; among
which steamed and hissed a huge copper tea-kettle. A
large lamp threw a strong mass of light upon the group
bringing out many odd features in strong relief. Its
yellow rays partially illumined the spacious kitchen,
dying
duskily away into remote corners; except where they
settled into mellow radiance on the broad side of a flitch of
bacon, or were reflected back from well-scoured utensils,
that gleamed from the midst of obscurity. A strapping
Flemish lass, with long golden pendants in her ears, and a
necklace with a golden heart suspended to it, was the
presiding
priestess of the temple.
Many of the company were furnished with pipes, and
most of them with some kind of evening potation. I found
their mirth was occasioned by anecdotes, which a little
swarthy Frenchman, with a dry weazen face and large
whiskers, was giving of his love adventures; at the end of
each of which, there was one of those bursts of honest
unceremonious
laughter, in which a man indulges in that
temple of true liberty, an inn.
As I had no better mode of getting through a tedious
blustering evening, I took my seat near the stove, and
listened to a variety of travellers' tales, some very
extravagant
,
and most very dull. All of them, however, have
faded from my treacherous memory except one, which I
will endeavour to relate. I fear, however, it derived its
chief zest from the manner in which it was told, and the
peculiar air and appearance of the narrator. He was a
corpulent old Swiss, who had the look of a veteran
traveller
.
He was dressed in a tarnished green travelling
jacket, with a broad belt round his waist, and a pair of
overalls, with buttons from the hips to the ancles. He
was of a full rubicund countenance, with a double chin,
aquiline nose, and a pleasant twinkling eye. His hair
was light, and curled from under an old green velvet
travelling
cap stuck on one side of his head. He was
interrupted
more than once by the arrival of guests, or the
remarks of his auditors; and paused now and then to
replenish
his pipe; at which times he had generally a
roguish
leer, and a sly joke for the buxom kitchen maid.
I wish my reader could imagine the old fellow lolling
in a huge arm-chair, one arm a-kimbo, the other holding
a curiously twisted tobacco pipe, formed of genuine
e'cume
de mer
, decorated with silver chain and silken tasselhis
head cocked on one side, and a whimsical cut of the eye
occasionally, as he related the following story.
THE SPECTRE BRIDEGROOM.
On
the summit of one of the heights of the Odenwald,
a wild and romantic tract of Upper Germany, that lies
not far from the confluence of the Main and the Rhine,
there stood, many, many years since, the Castle of the
Baron Von Landshort. It is now quite fallen to decay,
and almost buried among beech trees and dark firs; above
which, however, its old watch-tower may still be seen
struggling, like the former possessor I have mentioned,
to carry a high head and look down upon the
neighbouring
country.
The Baron was a dry branch of the great family of
Katzenellenbogen,
[1]
[1]
i e. Cat's-Elbow
. The name of a family of those ports very
powerful in former times. The appellation, we are told, was given in
compliment to a peerless dame of the family, celebrated for a fine arm.
and inherited the reliques of the
property
,
and all the pride of his ancestors. Though the
warlike disposition of his predecessors had much impaired
the family possessions, yet the Baron still endeavoured to
keep up some show of former state. The times were
peaceable, and the German nobles, in general, had
abandoned
their inconvenient old castles, perched like eagles'
nests among the mountains, and had built more
convenient
residences in the valleys; still the Baron remained
proudly drawn up in his little fortress, cherishing with
hereditary inveteracy, all the old family feuds; so that
he was on ill terms with some of his nearest neighbours,
on account of disputes that had happened between their
great great grandfathers.
The Baron had but one child, a daughter: but nature,
when she grants but one child, always compensates by
making it a prodigy; and so it was with the daughter of
the Baron. All the nurses, gossips, and country cousins,
assured her father that she had not her equal for beauty
in all Germany; and who should know better than they?
She had, moreover, been brought up with great care
under
the superintendence of two maiden aunts, who had
spent some years of their early life at one of the little
German courts, and were skilled in all the branches of
knowledge necessary to the education of a fine lady.
Under
their instructions, she became a miracle of
accomplishments
.
By the time she was eighteen, she could
embroider
to admiration, and had worked whole histories of
the saints in tapestry, with such strength of expression
in their countenances, that they looked like so many souls
in purgatory. She could read without great difficulty,
and had spelled her way through several church legends,
and almost all the chivalric wonders of the Heldenbuch.
She had even made considerable proficiency in writing;
could sign her own name without missing a letter, and
so legibly that her aunts could read it without spectacles.
She excelled in making little elegant good-for-nothing
lady-like knicknacks of all kinds; was versed in the most
abstruse dancing of the day; played a number of airs on
the harp and guitar; and knew all the tender ballads of
the Minnielieders by heart.
Her aunts, too, having been great flirts and coquettes
in their younger days, were admirably calculated to be
vigilant guardians and strict censors of the conduct of
their niece; for there is no duenna so rigidly prudent and
inexorably decorous, as a superannuated coquette. She
was rarely suffered out of their sight; never went
beyond
the domains of the castle, unless well attended, or
rather well watched; had continual lectures read to her
about strict decorum and implicit obedience; and, as to
the menpah! she was taught to hold them at such
distance, and in such absolute distrust, that, unless
properly
authorised she would not have cast a glance upon
the handsomest cavalier in the worldno, not if he were
even dying at her feet.
The good effects of this system were wonderfully
apparent
.
The young lady was a pattern of docility and
correctness. While others were wasting their sweetness
in the glare of the world, and liable to be plucked and
thrown aside by every hand; she was coyly blooming into
fresh and lovely womanhood under the protection of those
immaculate spinsters, like a rose-bud blushing forth among
guardian thorns. Her aunts looked upon her with pride
and exultation, and vaunted that though all the other
young ladies in the world might go astray, yet, thank
Heaven, nothing of the kind could happen to the heiress
of Katzenellenbogen.
But, however scantily the Baron Von Landshort might
be provided with children; his household was by no
means a small one; for Providence had enriched him
with abundance of poor relations. They, one and all,
2
possessed the affectionate disposition common to humble
relatives; were wonderfully attached to the Baron, and
took every possible occasion to come in swarms and
enliven
the castle. All family festivals were commemorated
by these good people at the Baron's expense; and when
they were filled with good cheer, they would declare that
there was nothing on earth so delightful as these family
meetings, these jubilees of the heart.
The Baron, though a small man, had a large soul, and
it swelled with satisfaction at the consciousness of being
the greatest man in the little world about him. He
loved to tell long stories about the stark old warriors
whose portraits looked grimly down from the walls
around, and he found no listeners equal to those who fed
at his expense. He was much given to the marvellous,
and a firm believer in all those supernatural tales with
which every mountain and valley in Germany abounds.
The faith of his guests exceeded even his own: they
listened
to every tale of wonder with open eyes and mouth,
and never failed to be astonished, even though repeated
for the hundredth time. Thus lived the Baron Von
Landshort, the oracle of his table, the absolute monarch
of his little territory, and happy, above all things, in the
persuasion that he was the wisest man of the age.
At the time of which my story treats there was a
great family gathering at the castle, on an affair of the
utmost importance. It was to receive the destined
bridegroom
of the Baron's daughter. A negociation had been
carried on between the father and an old nobleman of
Bavaria
,
to unite the dignity of the two houses by the
marriage
of their children. The preliminaries had been
conducted
with proper punctilio. The young people were
betrothed without seeing each other; and the time was
appointed for the marriage ceremony. The young Count
Von Altenburgh had been recalled from the army for
the purpose, and was actually on his way to the Baron's
to receive his bride. Missives had even been received
from him from Wurtzburg, where he was accidentally
detained, mentioning the day and hour when he might
be expected to arrive.
The castle was in a tumult of preparation to give him
a suitable welcome. The fair bride had been decked
out with uncommon care. The two aunts had
superintended
her toilet, and quarrelled the whole morning
about every article of her dress. The young lady had
taken
the advantage of their contest to follow the bent
of her own taste; and fortunately it was a good one. She
looked as lovely as youthful bridegroom could desire; and
the flutter of expectation heightened the lustre of her
charms.
The suffusions that mantled her face and neck, the
gentle heaving of the bosom, the eye now and then lost
in reverie, all betrayed the soft tumult that was going on
in her little heart. The aunts were continually
hovering
around her; for maiden aunts are apt to take great
interest in affairs of this nature. They were giving her
a world of staid council how to deport herself, what to
say, and in what manner to receive the expected lover.
The Baron was no less buried in preparations. He
had, in truth nothing exactly to do; but he was
naturally
a fuming bustling little man, and could not
remain
passive when all the world was in a hurry. He
worried from top to bottom of the castle with an air of
infinite anxiety; he continually called the servants from
their work to exhort them to be diligent; and buzzed about
every hall and chamber, as idly restless and importunate
as a blue-bottle fly on a warm summer's day.
In the mean time the fatted calf had been killed, the
forests had rung with the clamour of the huntsman; the
kitchen was crowded with good cheer; the cellars had
yielded up whole oceans of
Rhein-wine and Ferne-wein;
and even the great Heidelburg tun had been laid under
contribution. Every thing was ready to receive the
distinguished
guests with
Saus und Braus
in the true spirit
of German hospitalitybut the guest delayed to make
his appearance. Hour rolled after hour. The sun that
poured his downward rays upon the rich forest of the
Odenwald, now just gleamed along the summits of the
mountains. The Baron mounted the highest tower, and
strained his eyes in hopes of catching a distant sight of
the Count and his attendants. Once he thought he
beheld
them; the sound of horns came floating from the
valley, prolonged by the mountain echoes. A number
of horsemen were seen far below, slowly advancing along
the road; but when they had nearly reached the foot of
the mountain, they suddenly struck off in a different
direction
.
The last ray of sunshine departedthe bats
began to flit by in the twilightthe road grew dimmer
and dimmer to the view; and nothing appeared stirring
in it, but now and then a peasant lagging homeward from
his labour.
While the old castle of Landshort was in this state of
perplexity, a very interesting scene was transacting in a
different part of the Odenwald.
The young Count Von Altenburg was tranquilly
pursuing
his route in that sober jog-trot way, in which a
man travels towards matrimony when his friends have
taken all the trouble and uncertainty of courtship off his
hands, and a bride is waiting for him, as certainly as a
dinner at the end of his journey. He had encountered
at Wurtzburg, a youthful companion in arms, with whom
he had seen some service on the frontiers; Hermon Von
Starkenfaust, one of the stoutest hands, and worthiest
hearts, of German chivalry, who was now returning from
the army. His father's castle was not far distant from
the old fortress of Landshort, although an hereditary
feud rendered the families hostile, and strangers to each
other.
In the warm-hearted moment of recognition, the young
friends related all their past adventures and fortunes, and
the Count gave the whole history of his intended nuptials
with a young lady whom he had never seen, but of whose
charms he had received the most enrapturing
descriptions
.
As the route of the friends lay in the same direction,
they agreed to perform the rest of their journey together;
and that they might do it the more leisurely, set off from
Wurtzburg, at an early hour, the Count having given
directions
for his retinue to follow and overtake him.
They beguiled their wayfaring with recollections of
their military scenes and adventures; but the Count was
apt to be a little tedious, now and then, about the
reputed
charms of his bride, and the felicity that awaited
him.
In this way they had entered among the mountains of
the Odenwald, and were traversing one of its most
lonely
and thickly wooded passes. It is well known that
the forests of Germany have always been as much
infested
by robbers as its castles by spectres; and at this
time, the former were particularly numerous, from the
hordes of disbanded soldiers wandering about the
country
.
It will not appear extraordinary, therefore, that
the Cavaliers were attacked by a gang of these stragglers,
in the depth of the forest. They defended themselves
with bravery, but were nearly overpowered, when the
Count's retinue arrived to their assistance. At sight of
them the robbers fled, but not until the Count had
received
a mortal wound. He was slowly and carefully
conveyed back to the city of Wurtzburg, and a friar
summoned
from a neighbouring convent, who was famous
for his skill in administering to both soul and body:
but half of his skill was superfluous; the moments of
the unfortunate Count were numbered.
With his dying breath he entreated his friend to
repair
instantly to the castle of Landshort, and explain the
fatal cause of his not keeping his appointment with his
bride. Though not the most ardent of lovers, he was
one of the most punctilious of men, and appeared
earnestly
solicitous that this mission should be speedily and
courteously
executed. Unless this is done, said he, I
shall not sleep quietly in my grave! He repeated these
last words with peculiar solemnity. A request, at a
moment so impressive, admitted no hesitation.
Starkenfaust
endeavoured to soothe him to calmness;
promised
faithfully to execute his wish, and gave him his
hand in solemn pledge. The dying man pressed it in
acknowledgment
,
but soon lapsed into deliriumraved
about
his bridehis engagementshis plighted word;
ordered his horse, that he might ride to the castle of
Landshort; and expired in the fancied act of vaulting
into the saddle.
Starkenfaust bestowed a sigh, and a soldier's tear, on
the untimely fate of his comrade; and then pondered on
the awkward mission he had undertaken. His heart was
heavy, and his head perplexed; for he was to present
himself an unbidden guest among hostile people, and to
damp their festivity with tidings fatal to their hopes.
Still there were certain whisperings of curiosity in his
bosom to see this far-famed beauty of Katzenellenbogen,
so cautiously shut up from the world; for he was a
passionate
admirer of the sex, and there was a dash of
eccentricity
and enterprise in his character that made him
fond of all singular adventures.
Previous to his departure he made all due
arrangements
with the holy fraternity of the convent for the
funeral solemnities of his friend, who was to be buried
in the cathedral of Wurtzburg, near some of his
illustrious
relatives; and the mourning retinue of the Count
took charge of his remains.
2*
It is now high time that we should return to the
ancient
family of Katzenellenbogen, who were impatient
for their guest, and still more for their dinner; and to
the worthy little Baron, whom they left airing himself on
the watch-tower.
Night closed in, but still no guest arrived. The
Baron
descended from the tower in despair. The banquet,
which had been delayed from hour to hour, could no
longer be postponed. The meats were already overdone;
the cook in agony; and the whole household had the
look of a garrison that had been reduced by famine.
The Baron was obliged reluctantly to give orders for the
feast without the presence of the guest. All were seated
at table, and just on the point of commencing, when the
sound of a horn from without the gate gave notice of the
approach of a stranger. Another long blast filled the old
court of the castle with its echoes, and were answered by
the warder from the walls. The Baron hastened to
receive
his future son-in-law.
The drawbridge had been let down, and the stranger
was before the gate. He was a tall gallant cavalier,
mounted on a black steed. His countenance was pale,
but he had a beaming, romantic eye, and an air of
stately
melancholy. The Baron was a little mortified that
he should have come in this simple, solitary style. His
dignity for a moment was ruffled, and he felt disposed to
consider it a want of proper respect for the important
occasion
,
and the important family with which he was to
be connected. He pacified himself, however, with the
conclusion that it must have been youthful impatience
which had induced him thus to spur on sooner than his
attendants.
I am sorry, said the stranger, to break in upon
you thus unseasonably
Here the Baron interrupted him with a world of
compliments
and greetings; for to tell the truth, he prided
himself
upon his courtesy and his eloquence. The stranger
attempted, once or twice, to stem the torrent of words,
but in vain, so he bowed his head and suffered it to flow
on. By the time the Baron had come to a pause, they
had reached the inner court of the castle; and the
stranger
was again about to speak, when he was once more
interrupted by the appearance of the female part of the
family, leading forth the shrinking and blushing bride.
He gazed on her for a moment as one entranced; it
seemed
as if his whole soul beamed forth in the gaze, and
rested upon that lovely form. One of the maiden aunts
whispered something in her ear; she made an effort to
speak; her moist blue eye was timidly raised; gave a shy
glance of inquiry on the stranger; and was cast gain on
the ground. The words died away; but there was a
sweet smile playing about her lips, and a soft dimpling
of the cheek that showed her glance had not been
unsatisfactory
.
It was impossible for a girl at the fond age
of eighteen, highly predisposed for love and matrimony,
not to be pleased with so gallant a cavalier.
The late hour at which the guest had arrived left no
time for parley. The Baron was peremptory, and
deferred
all particular conversation until the morning, and
led the way to the untasted banquet.
It was served up in the great hall of the castle.
Around
the walls hung the hard favoured portraits of the
heroes of the house of Katzenellenbogen and the trophies
which they had gained in the field and in the chase.
Hacked corslets, splintered jousting spears, and tattered
banners, were mingled with the spoils of sylvan warfare;
the jaws of the wolf, and the tusks of the boar, grinned
horribly among cross-bows and battle-axes, and a huge
pair of antlers branched accidentally over the head of the
youthful bridegroom.
The cavalier took but little notice of the company or
the entertainment. He scarcely tasted the banquet, but
seemed absorbed in admiration of his bride. He
conversed
in a low tone that could not be overheardfor
the language of love is never loud; but where is the
female
ear so dull that it cannot catch the softest whisper
of the lover? There was a mingled tenderness and
gravity
in his manner, that appeared to have a powerful
effect
upon the young lady. Her colour came and went
as she listened with deep attention. Now and then she
made some blushing reply, and when his eye was turned
away, she would steal a side-long glance at his romantic
countenance, and heave a gentle sigh of tender happiness.
It was evident that the young couple were completely
enamoured. The aunts, who were deeply versed in the
mysteries of the heart, declared that they had fallen in
love with each at first sight.
The feast went on merrily, or at least noisily, for the
guests were all blessed with those keen appetites that
attend
upon light purses and mountain air. The Baron
told his best and longest stories, and never had he told
them so well, or with such great effect. If there was
any thing marvellous, his auditors were lost in
astonishment
;
and if any thing facetious, they were sure to
laugh exactly in the right place. The Baron, it is true,
like most great men, was too dignified to utter any joke
but a dull one; it was always enforced, however, by a
bumper of excellent hocheimer; and even a dull joke, at
one's own table, served up with jolly old wine, is
irresistible
.
Many good things were said by poorer and keener
wits, that would not bear repeating, except on similar
occasions; many sly speeches whispered in ladies' ears, that
almost convulsed them with suppressed laughter; and a
song or two roared out by a poor, but merry and
broad-faced
cousin of the Baron, that absolutely made the maiden
aunts hold up their fans.
Amidst all this revelry, the stranger guest maintained
a most singular and unseasonable gravity. His
countenance
assumed a deeper cast of dejection as the evening
advanced; and, strange as it may appear, even the
Baron's
jokes seemed only to render him the more
melancholy
.
At times he was lost in thought, and at times
there was a perturbed and restless wandering of the eye
that bespoke a mind but ill at ease. His conversations
with the bride became more and more earnest and
mysterious
.
Louring clouds began to steal over the fair
serenity
of her brow, and tremors to run through her tender
frame.
All this could not escape the notice of the company.
Their gaiety was chilled by the unaccountable gloom of
the bridegroom; their spirits were infected; whispers
and glances were interchanged, accompanied by shrugs
and dubious shakes of the head. The song and the
laugh grew less and less frequent; there were dreary
pauses in the conversation, which were at length
succeeded
by wild tales and supernatural legends. One dismal
story produced another more dismal, and the Baron nearly
frightened some of the ladies into hystericks with the
history
of the goblin horseman that carried away the fair
Leonora; a dreadful but true story, which has since been
put into excellent verse, and is read and believed by all
the world.
The bridegroom listened to this tale with profound
attention
.
He kept his eyes steadily fixed on the Baron,
and as the story drew to a close, began gradually to rise
from his seat, growing taller and taller, until, in the
Baron's
entranced eye, he seemed almost to tower into a
giant. The moment the tale was finished, he heaved a
deep sigh, and took a solemn farewell of the company.
They were all amazement. The Baron was perfectly
thunderstruck.
What! going to leave the castle at midnight? why,
every thing was prepared for his reception; a chamber
was ready for him if he wished to retire.
The stranger shook his head mournfully and
mysteriously
;
I must lay my head in a different chamber
to-night
!
There was something in this reply, and the tone in
which it was uttered, that made the Baron's heart
misgive
him; but he rallied his forces and repeated his
hospitable
entreaties.
The stranger shook his head silently, but positively, at
every offer; and, waving his farewell to the company,
stalked slowly out of the hall. The maiden aunts were
absolutely petrifiedthe bride hung her head, and a tear
stole to her eye.
The Baron followed the stranger to the great court of
the castle, where the black charger stood pawing the earth,
and snorting with impatience.When they had reached
the portal, whose deep archway was dimly lighted by a
cresset, the stranger paused, and addressed the Baron in
a hollow tone of voice, which the vaulted roof rendered
still more sepulchral.
Now that we are alone, said he, I will impart to
you the reason of my going. I have a solemn, an
indispensable
engagement
Why, said the Baron, cannot you send some one in
your place?
It admits of no substituteI must attend it in person
I must away to Wurtzburg cathedral
Ay, said the Baron, plucking up spirit, but not
until to-morrowto-morrow you shall take your bride
there.
No! no! replied the stranger, with tenfold
solemnity
,
my engagement is with no bridethe worms!
the worms expect me! I am a dead manI have been
slain by robbersmy body lies at Wurtzburgat
midnight
I am to be buriedthe grave is waiting for meI
must keep my appointment!
He sprang on his black charger, dashed over the
drawbridge
,
and the clattering of his horse's hoofs was lost in
the whistling of the night blast.
The Baron returned to the hall in the utmost
consternation
,
and related what had passed. Two ladies fainted
outright, others sickened at the idea of having
banqueted
with a spectre. It was the opinion of some, that
this might be the wild huntsman, famous in German
legend
.
Some talked of mountain sprites, of wood-demons,
and of other supernatural beings, with which the good
people
of Germany have been so grievously harassed since
time immemorial. One of the poor relations ventured
to suggest that it might be some sportive evasion of the
young cavalier, and that the very gloominess of the
caprice
seemed to accord with so melancholy a personage.
This, however, drew on him the indignation of the whole
company, and especially of the Baron, who looked upon
him as little better than an infidel; so that he was fain
to abjure his heresy as speedily as possible, and come into
the faith of the true believers.
But whatever may have been the doubts entertained,
they were completely put an end to by the arrival, next
day, of regular missives, confirming the intelligence of the
young Count's murder, and his interment in Wurtzburg
cathedral.
The dismay at the castle may be well imagined. The
Baron shut himself up in his chamber. The guests,
who had come to rejoice with him, could not think of
abandoning him in his distress. They wandered about
the courts, or collected in groups in the hall, shaking
their heads and shrugging their shoulders, at the troubles
of so good a man; and sat longer than ever at table, and
ate and drank more stoutly than ever, by way of keeping
up their spirits. But the situation of the widowed bride
was the most pitiable. To have lost a husband before
she had even embraced himand such a husband! if
the very spectre could be so gracious and noble, what
must have been the living man? She filled the house with
lamentations.
On the night of the second day of her widowhood she
had retired to her chamber, accompanied by one of her
aunts, who insisted on sleeping with her. The aunt,
who was one of the best tellers of ghost stories in all
Germany, had just been recounting one of her longest,
and had fallen asleep in the very midst of it. The
chamber
was remote, and overlooked a small garden. The
niece lay pensively gazing at the beams of the rising
moon as they trembled on the leaves of an aspen tree
before
the lattice. The castle clock had just tolled
midnight
,
when a soft strain of music stole up from the
garden
.
She rose hastily from her bed, and stepped lightly
to the window. A tall figure stood among the shadows
of the trees. As it raised its head, a beam of moonlight
fell upon the countenance. Heaven and earth! she beheld
the Spectre Bridegroom! A loud shriek at that moment
burst upon her ear, and her aunt who had been awakened
by the music, and had followed her silently to the window,
fell into her arms. When she looked again, the spectre
had disappeared.
Of the two females, the aunt required the most
soothing
,
for she was perfectly beside herself with terror. As
to the young lady, there was something, even in the
spectre
of her lover, that seemed endearing. There was still
the semblance of manly beauty; and though the shadow
of a man is but little calculated to satisfy the affections of
a love-sick girl, yet, where the substance is not to be had,
even that is consoling. The aunt declared she would
never sleep in that chamber again; the niece, for once
was refractory, and declared as strongly, that she would
sleep in no other in the castle: the consequence was, that
she had to sleep in it alone; but she drew a promise from
her aunt not to relate the story of the spectre, lest she
should be denied the only melancholy pleasure left her on
earththat of inhabiting the chamber over which the
guardian shade of her lover kept its nightly vigils.
How long the good old lady would have observed this
promise is uncertain, for she dearly loved to talk of the
marvellous, and there is a triumph in being the first to
tell a frightful story; it is, however, still quoted in the
neighbourhood, as a memorable instance of female secrecy,
that she kept it to herself for a whole week; when she was
suddenly absolved from all further restraint, by
intelligence
brought to the breakfast table one morning that
the young lady was not to be found. Her room was
emptythe bed had not been slept inthe window was
open, and the bird had flown!
The astonishment and concern with which the
intelligence
was received, can only be imagined by those who
have witnessed the agitation which the mishaps of a great
man cause among his friends. Even the poor relations
paused for a moment from the indefatigable labours of the
trencher; when the aunt, who had at first been struck
speechless, wrung her hands, and shrieked out, The
goblin! the goblin! she's carried away by the goblin!
In a few words she related the fearful scene of the
garden, and concluded that the spectre must have carried
off his bride. Two of the domestics corroborated the
opinion, for they heard the clattering of a horse's hoofs
down the mountain about midnight, and had no doubt
that it was the spectre on his black charger, bearing her
away to the tomb. All present were struck with the
direful probability; for events of the kind are extremely
common in Germany, as many well authenticated histories
bear witness.
What a lamentable situation was that of the poor
Baron
!
What a heart-rending dilemna for a fond father,
and a member of the great family of Katzenellenbogen!
His only daughter had either been wrapt away to the
grave, or he was to have some wood-demon for a
son-in-law
,
and, perchance, a troop of goblin grand children!
As usual, he was completely bewildered, and all the
castle
in an uproar. The men were ordered to take horse,
and scour every road and path and glen of the
Odenwald
.
The Baron himself had just drawn on his
jackboots
,
girded on his sword, and was about to mount his
steed to sally forth on the doubtful quest, when he was
brought to a pause by a new apparition. A lady was
seen approaching the castle, mounted on a palfrey,
attended
by a cavalier on horseback. She galloped up to
the gate, sprang from her horse, and falling at the
Baron's
feet, embraced his knees. It was his lost
daughter
,
and her companionthe Spectre Bridegroom! The
Baron was astonished. He looked at his daughter, then
at the spectre, and almost doubted the evidence of his
senses. The latter, too, was wonderfully improved in
his appearance, since his visit to the world of spirits.
His dress was splendid, and set off a noble figure of
manly
symmetry. He was no longer pale and melancholy.
His fine countenance was flushed with the glow of youth,
and joy rioted in his large dark eye.
The mystery was soon cleared up. The cavalier, (for
in truth, as you must have known all the while, he was
no goblin,) announced himself as Sir Hermon Von
Starkenfaust
.
He related his adventure with the young
Count. He told how he had hastened to the castle to
deliver the unwelcome tidings, but that the eloquence of
the Baron had interrupted him in every attempt to tell
his tale. How the sight of the bride had completely
captivated him, and that to pass a few hours near her,
he had tacitly suffered the mistake to continue. How
he had been sorely perplexed in what way to make a
decent
retreat, until the Baron's goblin stories had
suggested
his eccentric exit. How, fearing the feudal hostility
of the family, he had repeated his visits by stealthhad
haunted the garden beneath the young lady's window
had wooedhad wonhad borne away in triumph
and, in a word, had wedded the fair.
Under any other circumstances, the Baron would
have been inflexible, for he was tenacious of paternal
authority, and devoutly obstinate in all family feuds; but
he loved his daughter; he had lamented her as lost; he
rejoiced to find her still alive; and, though her husband
was of a hostile house, yet, thank heaven, he was not a
goblin. There was something, it must be acknowledged,
that did not exactly accord with his notions of strict
veracity
,
in the joke the knight had passed upon him of his
being a dead man; but several old friends present, who
had served in the wars, assured him that every stratagem
was excusable in love, and that the cavalier was entitled to
especial privilege, having lately served as a trooper.
Matters, therefore, were happily arranged. The Baron
pardoned the young couple on the spot. The revels at
the castle were resumed. The poor relations overwhelmed
this new member of the family with loving-kindness; he
was so gallant, so generousand so rich. The aunts, it
is true, were somewhat scandalized that their system of
strict seclusion, and passive obedience, should be so badly
exemplified, but attributed it all to their negligence in not
having the windows grated. One of them was
particularly
mortified at having her marvellous story marred, and
that the only spectre she had ever seen should turn out a
counterfeit; but the niece seemed perfectly happy at
having
found him substantial flesh and bloodand so the story
ends.
A WEST SUNDAY IN A COUNTRY INN.
It
was a rainy Sunday, in the gloomy month of
November
.
I had been detained, in the course of a journey, by
3
a slight indisposition, from which I was recovering; but
I was still feverish, and was obliged to keep within doors
all day, in an inn of the small town of Derby. A wet
Sunday in a country inn! whoever has had the luck to
experience one can alone judge of my situation. The rain
pattered against the casements; the bells tolled for church
with melancholy sound. I went to the windows in quest
of something to amuse the eye; but it seemed as if I had
been placed completely out of the reach of all amusement.
The windows of my bed-room looked out among tiled
roofs and stacks of chimneys, while those of my
sitting-room
commanded a full view of the stable-yard. I know
of nothing more calculated to make a man sick of this
world than a stable-yard on a rainy day. The place was
littered with wet straw that had been kicked about by
travellers and stable-boys. In one corner was a stagnant
pool of water, surrounding an island of muck; there
were several half-drowned fowls crowded together under
a cart, among which was a miserable crest-fallen cock,
drenched out of all life and spirit; his drooping tail
matted
,
as it were, into a single feather, along which the water
trickled from his back; near the cart was a half-dozing
cow, chewing the cud, and standing patiently to be rained
on, with wreaths of vapour rising from her recking hide;
a wall-eyed horse, tired of the loneliness of the stable,
was poking his spectral head out of a window, with
the rain dripping on it from the caves; an unhappy
cur, chained to a doghouse hard by, uttered something
every now and then, between a bark and a yelp; a drab
of a kitchen wench tramped backwards and forwards
through the yard in pattens, looking as sulky as the
weather
itself; every thing, in short, was comfortless and
forlorn, excepting a crew of hard-drinking ducks,
assembled
like boon companions round a puddle, and making
a riotous noise over their liquor.
I was lonely and listless, and wanted amusement.
My room soon became insupportable. I abandoned it,
and sought what is technically called the traveller's-room.
This is a public room set apart at most inns for the
accommodation
of a class of wayfarers, called travellers, or
riders; a kind of commercial knights errant, who are
incessantly
scouring the kingdom in gigs, on horseback, or
by coach. They are the only successors that I know of,
at the present day, to the knights errant of yore. They
lead the same kind of roving adventurous life, only
changing
the lance for a driving-whip, the buckler for a
pattern-card
,
and the coat of mail for an upper Benjamin. Instead
of vindicating the charms of peerless beauty, they rove
about, spreading the fame and standing of some
substantial
tradesman, or manufacturer, and are ready at
any time to bargain in his name; it being the fashion
now-a-days to trade, instead of fight, with one another.
As the room of the hostel, in the good old fighting times,
would be hung round at night with the armour of
way-worn
warriors, such as coats of mail, falchions, and
yawning
helmets; so the travellers' room is garnished with the
harnessing of their successors, with box coats, whips of
all kinds, spurs, gaiters, and oil cloth covered hats.
I was in hopes of finding some of these worthies to talk
with, but was disappointed. There were, indeed, two
or three in the room; but I could make nothing of them.
One was just finishing breakfast, quarrelling with his
bread and butter, and huffing the waiter; another
buttoned
on a pair of gaiters, with many execrations at Boots
for not having cleaned his shoes well; a third sat
drumming
on the table with his fingers, and looking at the
rain as it streamed down the window glass: they all
appeared
infected by the weather, and disappeared, one
after the other, without exchanging a word.
I sauntered to the window and stood gazing at the
people, picking their way to the church, with petticoats
hoisted midleg high, and dripping umbrellas. The bell
ceased to toll, and the streets became silent. I then
amused
myself with watching the daughters of a tradesman
opposite; who being confined to the house for fear of
wetting their Sunday finery, played off their charms at
the front windows, to fascinate the chance tenants of the
inn. They at length were summoned away by a
vigilant
vinegar-faced mother, and I had nothing further
from without to amuse me.
What was I to do to pass away the long-lived day? I
was sadly nervous and lonely; and every thing about an
inn seems calculated to make a dull day ten times duller
Old newspapers, smelling of beer and tobacco smoke, and
which I had already read half a dozen times. Good for
nothing books, that were worse than rainy weather. I
bored myself to death with an old volume of the Lady's
Magazine. I read all the common-place names of
ambitious
travellers scrawled on the panes of glass; the
eternal
families of the Smiths and the Browns, and the
Jacksons
,
and the Johnsons, and all the other sons; and I
decyphered several scraps of fatiguing inn-window poetry,
which I have met with in all parts of the world.
The day continued lowering and gloomy; the slovenly,
ragged, spongy clouds drifted heavily along; there was no
variety even in the rain; it was one dull, continued,
monotonous
patterpatterpatter, excepting that now and
then I was enlivened by the idea of a brisk shower, from
the rattling of the drops upon a passing umbrella.
It was quite
refreshing
(if I may be allowed a
hackneyed
phrase of the day), when, in the course of the
morning, a horn blew, and a stage coach whirled through
the street, with outside passengers stuck all over it,
cowering
under cotton umbrellas, and seethed together, and
reeking with the steams of wet box-coats and upper
Benjamins
.
The sound brought out from their lurking-places a
crew of vagabond boys, and vagabond dogs, and the
carroty-headed
hostler, and that non-descript animal ycleped
Boots, and all the other vagabond race, that infest the
purlieus of an inn; but the bustle was transient; the
coach again whirled on its way; and boy and dog,
hostler
and Boots, all slunk back again to their holes; the
street again became silent, and the rain continued to rain
on. In fact, there was no hope of its clearing up, the
barometer pointed to rainy weather; mine hostess's
tortoise
shell cat sat by the fire washing her face, and
rubbing
her paws over her ears; and, on referring to the
Almanack, I found a direful prediction stretching from
the top of the page to the bottom through the whole
month, expectmuchrainaboutthistime!
AN OBEDIENT HEN-PECKED HUSBAND.
In
that same village, and in one of these very houses,
(which, to tell the precise truth, was sadly time-worn
and weather beaten,) there lived many years since, when
the country was yet a province of Great Britain, a
simple
good-natured fellow, of the name of Rip Van
Winkle
.
He was a descendant of the Van Winkles who
figured so gallantly in the chivalrous days of Peter
Stuyvesant
,
and accompanied him to the seige of Fort
Christina
.
He inherited, however, but little of the martial
character of his ancestors. I have observed that he was
a simple good-natured man; he was, moreover, a kind
neighbour, and an obedient hen-pecked husband.
Indeed
,
to the latter circumstance might be owing that
meekness of spirit which gained him such universal
popularity
;
for those men are most apt to be obsequious and
conciliating abroad, who are under the discipline of shrews
at home. Their tempers, doubtless, are rendered pliant
and maleable in the fiery furnace of domestic tribulation,
and a curtain lecture is worth all the sermons in the
world for teaching the virtues of patience and long
suffering
.
A termagent wife may, therefore, in some respects,
be considered a tolerable blessing; and if so, Rip Van
Winkle was thrice blessed.
Certain it is, that he was a great favourite among all
the good wives of the village, who, as usual with the
amiable
sex, took his part in all family squabbles; and never
failed, whenever they talked those matters over in their
evening gossipings, to lay all the blame on Dame Van
Winkle. The children of the village, too, would shout
with joy whenever he approached. He assisted at their
sports, made their playthings, taught them to fly kites
and shoot marbles, and told them long stories of ghosts,
witches, and Indians. Whenever he went dodging about
the village, he was surrounded by a troop of them,
hanging
on his skirts, clambering on his back, and playing
a thousand tricks on him with impunity; and not a dog
would bark at him throughout the neighbourhood.
The great error in Rip's composition was an
insuperable
aversion to all kinds of profitable labour. It could
not be from the want of assiduity or perseverance; for
he would sit on a wet rock, with a rod as long and
heavy
as a Tartar's lance, and fish all day without a
murmer
,
even though he should not be encouraged by a
sinble
nibble. He would carry a fowling piece on his
shoulder for hours together, trudging through woods and
swamps, and up hill and down dale, to shoot a few
squirrels
or wild pigeons. He would never refuse to assist a
neighbour even in the roughest toil, and was a foremost
man at all country frolics for husking Indian corn, or
building stone fences; the women of the village, too, used
to employ him to run their errands, and to do such little
odd jobs as their less obliging husbands would not do for
them.In a word, Rip was ready to attend to any body's
3*
business but his own; but as to doing family duty, and
keeping his farm in order, he found it impossible.
In fact, he declared it was of no use to work on his
farm; it was the most pestilent little piece of ground in
the whole country; every thing about it went wrong,
and would go wrong, in spite of him. His fences were
continually falling to pieces; his cow would either go
astray, or get among the cabbages; weeds were sure to
grow quicker in his field than any where else; the rain
always made a point of setting in just as he had some
out-door work to do; so that though his patrimonial
estate
had dwindled away under his management acre by
acre, until there was little more left than a mere patch
of Indian corn and potatoes, yet it was the worse
conditioned
farm in the neighbourhood.
His children, too, were as ragged and wild as if they
belonged to nobody. His son Rip, an urchin begotten
in his own likeness, promised to inherit the habits with
the old clothes of his father. He was generally seen
trooping like a colt at his mother's heels, equipped in a
pair of his father's cast off galligaskins, which he had
much ado to hold up with one hand, as a fine lady does
her train in bad weather.
Rip Van Winkle, however, was one of those happy
mortals, of foolish, well oiled dispositions, who take the
world easy, eat white bread or brown, whichever can be
got with the least thought or trouble, and would rather
starve on a penny than work for a pound. If left to
himself he would have whistled life away in perfect
contentment
;
but his wife kept continually dinning in his
ears about his idleness, his carelessness, and the ruin he
was bringing on his family. Morning, noon, and night,
her tongue was incessantly going, and every thing he said
or did was sure to produce a torrent of household
eloquence
.
Rip had but one way of replying to all lectures
of the kind, and that, by frequent use, had got into a
habit. He shrugged his shoulders, shook his head, cast
up his eyes, but said nothing. This, however, always
provoked a fresh volley from his wife; so that he was
fain to draw off his forces, and take to the outside of the
housethe only side which, in truth, belongs to a
hen-pecked
husband.
Rip's sole domestic adherent was his dog Wolf, who
was as much henpecked as his master; for Dame Van
Winkle regarded them as companions in idleness and
even looked upon Wolf with an evil eye, as the cause
of his master's going so often astray. True it is, in all
points of spirit befitting an honourable dog, he was as
courageous an animal as ever scoured the woodsbut
what courage can withstand the ever-during and all
besetting
terrors of a woman's tongue? The moment
Wolf entered the house his crest fell, his tail dropped to
the ground or curled between his legs, he sneaked about
with a gallows air, casting many a sidelong glance at
Dame Van Winkle, and at the least flourish of a
broomstick
or ladle, he would fly to the door with yelping
precipitation.
Times grew worse and worse with Rip Van Winkle
as years of matrimony rolled on; a tart temper never
mellows with age, and a sharp tongue is the only edged
tool that grows keener with constant use. For a long
while he used to console himself, when driven from
home, by frequenting a kind of perpetual club of the
sages
,
philosophers, and other idle personages of the village;
which held its sessions on a bench before a small inn,
designated by a rubicund portrait of His Majesty George
the Third. Here they used to sit in the shade, of a
long lazy summer's day, talking listlessly over village
gossip, or telling endless sleepy stories about nothing.
But it would have been worth any statesman's money
to have heard the profound discussions that sometimes
took place, when by chance an old newspaper fell into
their hands from some passing traveller. How
solemnly
they would listen to the contents, as drawled out by
Derrick Van Bummel, the schoolmaster, a dapper learned
little man, who was not to be daunted by the most
gigantic
word in the dictionary; and how sagely they
would deliberate upon public events some months after
they had taken place.
The opinions of this junto were completely controlled
by Nicholas Vedder, a patriarch of the village, and
landlord
of the inn, at the door of which he took his seat
from morning till night, just moving sufficiently to avoid
the sun and keep in the shade of a large tree; so that
the neighbours could tell the hour by his movements as
accurately
as by a sun-dial. It is true, he was rarely heard
to speak, but smoked his pipe incessantly. His
adherents
,
however, (for every great man has his adherents,)
perfectly understood him, and knew how to gather his
opinions. When any thing that was read or related
displeased
him, he was observed to smoke his pipe
vehemently
,
and to send forth short, frequent, and angry puffs;
but when pleased, he would inhale the smoke slowly and
tranquilly, and emit it in light and placid clouds; and
sometimes, taking the pipe from his mouth, and letting
the fragrant vapour curl about his nose, would gravely
nod his head in token of perfect approbation.
From even this strong hold the unlucky Rip was at
length routed by his termagent wife, who would suddenly
break in upon the tranquillity of the assemblage and call
the members all to nought; nor was that august
personage
,
Nicholas Vedder himself, sacred from the daring
tongue of this terrible virago, who charged him outright
with encouraging her husband in habits of idleness.
Poor Rip was at last reduced almost to despair; and
his only alternative, to escape from the labour of the
farm and clamour of his wife, was to take gun in hand
and stroll away into the woods. Here he would
sometimes
seat himself at the foot of a tree, and share the
contents of his wallet with Wolf, with whom he
sympathized
as a fellow-sufferer in persecution. Poor wolf,
he would say, thy mistress leads thee a dog's life of it;
but never mind, my lad, whilst I live thou shalt never
want a friend to stand by thee! Wolf would wag his
tail, look wistfully in his master's face, and if dogs can
feel pity, I verily believe he reciprocated the sentiment
with all his heart.
A DESIRABLE MATCH.
Among
the musical disciples who assembled, one
evening
in each week, to receive his (Ichabod Crane's)
instructions
in psalmody, was Katrina Van Tassel, the
daughter and only child of a substantial Dutch farmer.
She was a blooming lass of fresh eighteen; plump as a
partridge; ripe and melting and rosy cheeked as one of
her father's peaches, and universally famed, not merely for
her beauty, but her vast expectations. She was withal a
little of a coquette, as might be perceived even in her
dress, which was a mixture of ancient and modern
fashions
,
as most suited to set off her charms. She wore
the ornaments of pure yellow gold, which her
great-great-grandmother
had brought over from Saardum; the
tempting
stomacher of the olden time; and withal a
provokingly
short petticoat, to display the prettiest foot and
ankle in the country round.
Ichabod Crane had a soft and foolish heart toward
the sex; and it is not to be wondered at, that so
tempting
a morsel soon found favour in his eyes; more
especially
after he had visited her in her paternal mansion. Old
Baltus Van Tassel was a perfect picture of a thriving,
contented, liberal-hearted farmer. He seldom, it is true,
sent either his eyes or his thoughts beyond the boundaries
of his own farm; but within those every thing was snug,
happy, and well-conditioned. He was satisfied with his
wealth but not proud of it; and piqued himself upon the
hearty abundance, rather than the style in which he lived,
His strong hold was situated on the banks of the
Hudson
,
in one of those green, sheltered, fertile nooks, in
which the Dutch farmers are so fond of nestling. A
great elm-tree spread its broad branches over it; at the
foot of which bubbled up a spring of the softest and
sweetest
water, in a little well, formed of a barrel; and then
stole sparkling away through the grass, to a neighbouring
brook, that babbled along among alders and dwarf willows.
Hard by the farm house was a vast barn, that might
have served for a church; every window and crevice of
which seemed bursting forth with the treasures of the
farm; the flail was busily resounding within from
morning
to night; swallows and martins skimmed
twittering
about the eaves; and rows of pigeons, some with one
eye turned up, as if watching the weather, some with
their heads under their wings, or buried in their bosoms,
and others swelling and cooing and bowing, about their
dames, were enjoying the sunshine on the roof. Sleek
unwieldy porkers were grunting in the repose and
abundance
of their pens; from whence sallied forth, now and
then, troops of sucking pigs, as if to snuff the air. A
stately squadron of snowy geese were riding in an
adjoining
pond, convoying whole fleets of ducks; regiments
of turkeys were gobbling through the farm-yard, and
guinea fowls fretting about it, like ill-tempered
house-wives
,
with their peevish discontented cry. Before the
barn door strutted the gallant cock, that pattern of a
husband, a warrior, and a fine gentleman; clapping his
burnished wings, and crowing in the pride and gladness
of his heartsometimes tearing up the earth with his
feet and then generously calling his ever hungry family
of wives and children to enjoy the rich morsel which he
had discovered.
The pedagogue's mouth watered, as he looked upon
this sumptuous promise of luxurious winter fare. In
his devouring mind's eye, he pictured to himself every
roasting pig running about with a pudding in its belly,
and an apple in its mouth; the pigeons were snugly put
to bed in a comfortable pie, and tucked in with a
coverlet
of crust; the geese were swimming in their own
gravy
;
and the ducks pairing cosily in dishes, like snug
married couples, with a decent competency of onion
sauce. In the porkers he saw carved out the future
sleek side of bacon, and juicy relishing ham; not a
turkey
,
but he beheld daintily trussed up, with its gizzard
under its wing, and, peradventure, a necklace of savoury
sausages; and even bright chanticleer himself lay
sprawling
on his back, in a side dish, with uplifted claws as
if craving that quarter, which his chivalric spirit
disdained
to ask while living.
As the enraptured Ichabod fancied all this, and as he
rolled his great green eyes over the fat meadow lands,
the rich fields of wheat, of rye, of buckwheat, and
Indian
corn, and the orchards burthened with ruddy fruit,
which surrounded the warm tenement of Van Tassel,
his heart yearned after the damsel who was to inherit
these domains, and his imagination expanded with the
idea, how they might be readily turned into cash, and the
money invested in immense tracts of wild land, and
shingle
palaces in the wilderness. Nay, his busy fancy
already
realized his hopes, and presented to him the
blooming
Katrina, with a whole family of children, mounted
on the top of a wagon loaded with household trumpery,
with pots and kettles dangling beneath; and he beheld
himself bestriding a pacing mare, with a colt at her heels,
setting out for Kentucky, Tennessee, or the Lord knows
where.
A RIVAL.
Among these the most formidable was a burly, roaring,
roystering blade, of the name of Abraham, or according
to the Dutch abbreviation, Brom Van Brunt, the hero of
the country round, which rung with his feats of strength
and hardihood. He was broad-shouldered and
double-jointed
,
with short curly black hair, and a bluff, but not
unpleasant countenance, having a mingled air of fun and
arrogance. From his Herculean frame and great powers
of limb, he had received the nick-name of
Brom Bones
,
by which he was universally known. He was famed for
great knowledge and skill in horsemanship, being as
dexterous
on horseback as a Tartar. He was foremost at
all races and cock-fights; and, with the ascendency which
bodily strength always acquires in rustic life, was the
umpire in all disputes, setting his hat on one side, and
giving his decisions with an air and tone that admitted
of no gainsay or appeal. He was always ready for either
a fight or a frolic; had more mischief than ill-will in his
composition; and with all his overbearing roughness,
there was a strong dash of waggish good humour at
bottom
.
He had three or four boon companions of his own
stamp, who regarded him as their model, and at the head
of whom he scoured the country, attending every scene
of feud or merriment for miles round. In cold weather
he was distinguished by a fur cap, surmounted with a
flaunting fox's tail; and when the folks at a country
gathering descried this well-known crest at a distance,
whisking about among a squad of hard riders, they
always
stood by for a squall. Sometimes his crew would
be heard dashing along past the farm houses at midnight,
with whoop and halloo, like a troop of Don Cossacks;
and the old dames, startled out of their sleep, would listen
for a moment till the hurry-skurry had clattered by, and
then exclaim, Ay, there goes Brom Bones and his
gang! The neighbours looked upon him with a mixture
of awe, admiration, and good-will; and when any mad-cap
prank, or rustic brawl, occurred in the vicinity, always
shook their heads, and warranted Brom Bones was at the
bottom of it.
This rantipole hero had for some time singled out the
blooming Katrina for the object of his uncouth gallantries,
and though his amourous toyings were something like the
gentle caresses and endearments of a bear, yet it was
whispered that she did not altogether discourage his hopes.
Certain it is, his advances were signals for rival candidates
to retire, who felt no inclination to cross a lion in his
amours; insomuch, that when his horse was seen tied to
Van Tassel's paling, on a Sunday night, a sure sign that
his master was courting, or, as it is termed, sparking,
within, all other suitors passed by in despair, and carried
the war into other quarters.
Such was the formidable rival with whom Ichabod
Crane had to contend, and, considering all things, a
stouter
man than he would have shrunk from the competition,
and a wiser man would have despaired. He had, a happy
mixture of pliability and perseverance in his nature; he
was in form and spirit like a supple jackyielding, but
tough; though he bent, he never broke; and though he
bowed, beneath the slightest pressure, yet, the moment it
was away, jerk!he was erect, and carried his head as
high as ever.
Brom, who had a degree of rough chivalry in his
nature
,
would fain have carried matters to open warfare,
and have settled their pretensions to the lady, according
to the mode of those most consise and simple reasoners,
the knights-errant of yoreby single combat; but
Ichabod
was too conscious of the superior might of his
adversary
to enter the lists against him: he had overheard the
boast of Bones, that he would double the schoolmaster
up, and put him on a shelf; and he was too wary to
give him an opportunity. There was something
extremely
provoking in this obstinately pacific system; it left
Brom no alternative but to draw upon the funds of
rustic
waggery in his disposition, and to play off boorish
practical jokes upon his rival. Ichabod became the
object
of whimsical persecution to Bones, and his gang of
rough riders. They harried his hitherto peaceful
domains
;
smoked out his singing school, by stopping up
the chimney; broke into the schoolhouse at night, in
spite of his formidable fastenings of withes and window
stakes, and turned every thing topsy-turvy; so that the
poor schoolmaster began to think all the witches in the
country held their meetings there. But what was still
more annoying, Brom took all opportunities of turning
him into ridicule in presence of his mistress, and had a
scoundrel dog whom he taught to whine in the most
ludicrous
manner, and introduced as a rival of Ichabod's
to instruct her in psalmody.
AN INVITATION.
In this way matters went on for some time, without
producing any material effect on the relative situations of
the contending powers. On a fine autumnal afternoon,
Ichabod, in pensive mood, sat enthroned on the lofty stool
from whence he usually watched all the concerns of his
little literary realm. In his hand he swayed a ferule,
that sceptre of despotic power; the birch of justice
reposed
on three nails, behind a throne, a constant terror
to evil doers; while on the desk before him might be seen
sundry contraband articles and prohibited weapons,
detected
upon the persons of idle urchins; such as
half-munched
apples, popguns, whirligigs, fly-cages, and whole
legions of rampant little paper game cocks. Apparently
there had been some appalling act of justice recently
inflicted
,
for his scholars were all busily intent upon their
books, or slyly whispering behind them with one eye kept
upon the master; and a kind of buzzing stillness reigned
throughout the school-room. It was suddenly interrupted
by the appearance of a negro in tow-cloth jacket and
trowsers
,
a round crowned fragment of a hat, like the cap of
Mercury, and mounted on the back of a ragged, wild,
half-broken colt, which he managed with a rope by way
of halter. He came clattering up to the school door with
an invitation to Ichabod to attend a merry meeting, or
quilting frolic, to be held that evening at Mynheer
Van Tassel's; and having delivered his message with that
air of importance, and effort at fine language, which a
negro is apt to display on petty embassies of the kind, he
dashed over the brook, and was seen scampering away up
the hollow, full of the importance and hurry of his
mission
.
All was now bustle and hubbub in the late quiet
school-room
.
The scholars were hurried through their lessons,
without stopping at trifles; those who were nimble,
skipped
over half with impunity, and those who were tardy,
had a smart application now and then in the rear, to
quicken their speed, or help them over a tall word. Books
were flung aside, without being put away on the shelves;
inkstands were overturned; benches thrown down; and
the whole school was turned loose an hour before the
usual time; bursting forth like a legion of young imps,
yelping and racketting about the green, in joy at their early
emancipation.
A DUTCH ENTERTAINMENT.
Thus feeding his mind with many sweet thoughts and
sugared suppositions, he journeyed along the sides of
a range of hills which look out upon some of the goodliest
scenes of the mighty Hudson. The sun gradually wheeled
4
his broad disk down into the west. The wide bosom of
the Tappaan Zee lay motionless and glassy, excepting
that here and there a gentle undulation waved and
prolonged
the blue shadow of the distant mountain. A few
amber clouds floated in the sky, without a breath of air
to move them. The horizon was of a fine golden tint,
changing gradually into a pure apple green, and from
that into the deep blue of the mid-heaven. A slanting
ray lingered on the woody crests of the precipices that
overhung some parts of the river, giving greater depth to
the dark gray and purple of their rocky sides. A sloop
was loitering in the distance, dropping slowly down with
the tide, her sail hanging uselessly against the mast; and
as the reflection of the sky gleamed along the still water,
it seemed as if the vessel was suspended in the air.
It was towards evening that Ichabod arrived at the
castle of the Heer Van Tassel, which he found thronged
with the pride and flower of the adjacent country. Old
farmers, a spare leathern-faced race, in homespun coats
and breeches, blue stockings, huge shoes, and magnificent
pewter buckles. Their brisk, withered little dames, in
close crimped caps, long-waisted gowns, homespun
petticoats
,
with scissors and pincushions, and gay calico
pockets
hanging on the outside. Buxom lasses, almost as
antiquated as their mothers, excepting where a straw hat,
a fine riband, or perhaps a white frock, gave symptoms
of city innovations. The sons, in short square-skirted
coats, with rows of stupendous brass buttons, and their
hair generally queued in the fashion of the times,
especially
if they could procure an eelskin for the purpose, it
being esteemed throughout the country, as a potent
nourisher and strengthener of the hair.
Brom Bones, however, was the hero of the scene,
having
come to the gathering on his favourite steed
Dare-devil
,
a creature, like himself, full of mettle and mischief,
and which no one but himself could manage. He was, in
fact, noted for preferring vicious animals, given to all
kinds of tricks which kept the rider in constant risk of
his neck, for he held a tractable well broken horse as
unworthy
a lad of spirit.
Fain would I pause to dwell upon the world of charms
that burst upon the enraptured gaze of my hero, as he
entered the state parlour of Van Tassel's mansion. Not
those of the bevy of buxom lasses, with their luxurious
display of red and white; but the ample charms of a
genuine
Dutch country tea-table, in the sumptuous time of
autumn. Such heaped up platters of cakes, of various and
almost indescribable kinds, known only to experienced
Dutch housewives! There was the doughty dough-nut,
the tenderer oly koek, and the crisp and crumbling
cruller
;
sweet cakes and short cakes, ginger cakes and honey
cakes, and the whole family of cakes. And then there were
apple pies, and peach pies, and pumpkin pies; besides slices
of ham and smoke beef; and moreover delectable dishes
of preserved plums, and peaches, and pears, and quinces;
not to mention broiled shad and roasted chickens; together
with bowls of milk and cream; all mingled
higgeldy-piggeldy
,
pretty much as I have enumerated them, with the
motherly tea-pot sending up its clouds of vapour from the
midstHeaven bless the mark! I want breath and time
to discuss this banquet as it deserves, and am too eager
to get on with my story. Happily Ichabod Crane was not
in so great a hurry as his historian, but did ample justice
to every dainty.
He was a kind and thankful creature, whose heart dilated
in proportion as his skin was filled with good cheer; and
whose spirits rose with eating as some men's do with
drink. He could not help, too, rolling his large eyes
round him as he ate, and chuckling with the possibility
that he might one day be lord of all this scene of almost
unimaginable luxury and splendour. Then, he thought,
how soon he'd turn his back upon the old school house;
snap his finger in the face of Hans Van Ripper, and every
other niggardly patron, and kick any itinerant pedagogue
out of doors that should dare to call him comrade!
Old Baltus Van Tassel moved about among his guests
with a face dilated with content and good humour, round
and jolly as the harvest moon. His hospitable attentions
were brief, but expressive, being confined to a shake of
the hand, a slap on the shoulder, a loud laugh, and a
pressing invitation to fall to, and help themselves.
Ichabod prided himself upon his dancing as much as
upon his vocal powers. Not a limb, not a fibre about him
was idle; and to have seen his loosely hung frame in full
motion, and clattering about the room, you would have
thought Saint Vitus himself, that blessed patron of the
dance, was figuring before you in person. He was the
admiration of all the negroes; who, having gathered, of all
ages and sizes, from the farm and the neighbourhood, stood
forming a pyramid of shining black faces at every door and
window; gazing with delight at the scene; rolling their
white eye-balls, and showing grinning rows of ivory from
ear to ear. How could the flogger of urchins be
otherwise
than animated and joyous? the lady of his heart
was his partner in the dance, and smiling graciously in
reply
to all his amorous oglings; while Brom Bones, sorely
smitten with love and jealousy, sat brooding by himself in
one corner.
WAR.
The
first conflict between man and man was the mere
exertion of physical force, unaided by auxiliary weapons,
his arm was his buckler, his fist was his mace, and a
broken head the catastrophe of his encounters. The
battle
of unassisted strength was succeeded by the more
rugged
one of stones and clubs, and war assumed a
sanguinary
aspect. As man advanced in refinement, as his
faculties
expanded, and his sensibilities became more
exquisite
,
he grew rapidly more ingenious and experienced in
the art of murdering his fellow beings. He invented a
thousand devices to defend and to assaultthe helmet,
the cuirass, and the buckler, the sword, the dart, and the
javelin, prepared him to elude the wound, as well as to
launch the blow. Still urging on, in the brilliant and
philanthropic career of invention, he enlarges and
heightens
his powers of defence and injury.The aries, the
scorpio, the balista, and the catapulta, give a horror and
sublimity to war; and magnify its glory, by increasing its
desolation. Still insatiable, though armed with machinery
that seemed to reach the limits of destructive invention,
and to yield a power of injury, commensurate even with
the desires of revengestill deeper researches must be
made in the diabolical arcana. With furious zeal he dives
into the bowels of the earth; he toils midst poisonous
minerals
and deadly saltsthe sublime discovery of
gunpowder
blazes upon the worldand, finally, the dreadful art
of fighting by proclamation seems to endow the demon
of war with ubiquity and omnipotence.
This, indeed, is grand!this, indeed, marks the powers
of mind, and bespeaks that divine endowment of reason,
which distinguishes us from the animals, our inferiors.
The unenlightened brutes content themselves with the
native force which providence has assigned them. The
angry bull butts with his horns, as did his progenitors
before
himthe lion, the leopard, and the tiger, seek only
with their talons and their fangs to gratify their
sanguinary
fury; and even the subtle serpent darts the same
venom
,
and uses the same wiles as did his sire before the flood.
Man alone, blessed with the inventive mind, goes on from
discovery to discoveryenlarges and multiplies his powers
of destruction; arrogates the tremendous weapons of Deity
itself, and tasks creation to assist him in murdering his
brother worm.
ENGLISH STAGE COACHMEN.
And
here, perhaps, it may not be unacceptable to my
untravelled readers to have a sketch that may serve as a
general representation of this very numerous and
important
class of functionaries, who have a dress, a manner,
a language, an air, peculiar to themselves, and prevalent
throughout the fraternity: so that, wherever an English
stage Coachman may be seen, he cannot be mistaken for
one of any other craft or mystery.
He has commonly a broad, full face, curiously mottled
with red, as if the blood had been forced by hard feeding
into every vessel of the skin; he is swelled into jolly
dimensions
by frequent potations of malt liquors, and his
bulk is still further increased by a multiplicity of coats, in
which he is buried like a cauliflower, the upper one
reaching
to his heels. He wears a broad-brimmed
low-crowned
hat; a huge roll of coloured handkerchief about his
neck, knowingly knotted and tucked in at the bosom; and
has, in summer time, a large bouquet of flowers in his
button-hole
;
the present, most probably, of some enamoured
country lass. His waistcoat is commonly of some bright
colour, striped, and his small-clothes extend far below the
knees, to meet a pair of jocky boots which reach about
half way up his legs.
All this costume is maintained with much precision;
he has a pride in having his clothes of excellent materials;
and, notwithstanding the seeming grossness of his
appearance
,
there is still discernible that neatness and propriety
of person, which is almost inherent in an Englishman.
He enjoys great consequence and consideration along the
4*
road; has frequent conferences with the village
house-wives
,
who look upon him as a man of great trust and
dependence
;
and he seems to have a good understanding
with every bright-eyed country lass. The moment he
arrives where the horses are to be changed, he throws
down the reins with something of an air, and abandons
the cattle to the care of the hostler; his duty being merely
to drive from one stage to another. When off the box,
his hands are thrust into the pockets of his great coat, and
he rolls about the inn yard with an air of the most absolute
lordliness. Here he is generally surrounded by an
admiring
throng of hostlers, stable-boys, shoeblacks, and those
nameless hangers-on, that infest inns and taverns, and
run errands, and do all kind of odd jobs for the privilege
of battening on the drippings of the kitchen and the
leakage
of the tap-room. These all look up to him as to an
oracle; treasure up his cant phrases; echo his opinions
about horses and other topics of jocky lore; and above all,
endeavour to imitate his air and carriage. Every
ragamuffin
that has a coat to his back, thrusts his hands in
the pockets, rolls in his gait, talks slang, and is an embryo
Coachey.
THE WALTZ.
As many of the retired matrons of this city, unskilled
in gestic lore, are doubtless ignorant of the movements
and figures of this modest exhibition, I will endeavour
to give some account of it in order that they may learn
what odd capers their daughters sometimes cut when from
under their guardian wings.On a signal being given by
the music, the gentleman seizes the lady round her waist;
the lady scorning to be out-done in courtesy, very politely
takes the gentleman round the neck, with one arm resting
against his shoulder to prevent encroachments. Away
then they go, about, and about, and aboutAbout what,
sir?About the room, madam, to be sure. The whole
economy of this dance consists in turning round and
round the room in a certain measured step, and it is truly
astonishing that this continued revolution does not set all
their heads swimming like a top; but I have been
positively
assured that it only occasions a gentle sensation
which is marvellously agreeable. In the course of this
circumnavigation, the dancers, in order to give the charm
of variety are continually changing their relative situations,
now the gentleman, meaning no harm in the world,
I assure you, madam, carelessly flings his arm about the
lady's neck, with an air of celestial impudence; and anon,
the lady, meaning as little harm as the gentleman, takes
him round the waist with most ingenious modest
languishment
,
to the great delight of numerous spectators
and amateurs, who generally form a ring, as the mob do
about a pair of amazons pulling caps, or a couple of
fighting
mastiffs.After continuing this divine interchange
of hands, arms, et cetera, for half an hour or so, the lady
begins to tire, and with eyes upraised, in most
bewitching
languor, petitions her partner for a little more support.
This is always given without hesitation. The lady leans
gently on his shoulder; their arms entwine in a thousand
seducing, mischievous curvesdon't be alarmed, madam
closer and closer they approach each other, and in conclusion,
the parties being overcome with ecstatic fatigue, the lady
seems almost sinking into the gentleman's arms, and then
Well, sir! what then!Lord! madam how
should I know.
DUTCH TEA PARTIES.
These
fashionable parties were generally consigned to
the higher classes, or noblesse, that is to say, such as
kept their own cows, and drove their own wagons. The
company commonly assembled at three o'clock, and went
away about six, unless it was in winter time, when the
fashionable hours were a little earlier, that the ladies
might get home before dark. I do not find that they
ever treated their company to iced creams, jellies, or
syllabubs; or regaled them with musty almonds, mouldy
raisins, or sour oranges, as is often done in the present
age of refinement. Our ancestors were fond of more
sturdy, substantial fare. The tea-table was crowned
with a huge earthen dish, well stored with slices of fat
pork, fried brown, cut up into morsels, and swimming
in gravy. The company being seated round the genial
board, and each furnished with a fork, evinced their
dexterity in launching at the fattest pieces in this mighty
dish, in much the same manner as sailors harpoon
perpoises
at sea, or our Indians spear salmon in the lakes.
Sometimes the table was graced with immense apple
pies, or saucers full of preserved peaches and pears; but
it was always sure to boast an enormous dish of balls of
sweetened dough, fried in hog's fat, and called dough
nuts, or oly keoks: a delicious kind of cake, at present
scarce known in this city, excepting in genuine Dutch
families.
The tea was served out of a majestic delft tea-pot,
ornamented with paintings of fat little Dutch shepherds
and shepherdesses, tending pigswith boats sailing in
the air, and houses built in the clouds, and sundry other
ingenious Dutch fantasies. The beaux distinguished
themselves by their adroitness in replenishing this pot,
from a hugh copper tea-kettle, which would have made
the pigmy macaronies of these degenerate days sweat,
merely to look at it. To sweeten the beverage, a lump
of sugar was laid beside each cupand the company,
alternately nibbled and sipped with great decorum, until an
improvement was introduced by a shrewd and economic
old lady, which was, to suspend a large lump directly over
the tea table, by a string from the ceiling, so that it could
be swung from mouth to mouth,an ingenious expedient,
which is still kept up by some families in Albany; but
which prevails without exception in Communipaw,
Bergen
,
Flat-Bush, and all our uncontaminated Dutch
villages
.
At these primitive tea-parties the utmost propriety and
dignity of deportment prevailed. No flirting nor
coquetting
no
gambling of old ladies, nor hoyden chattering
and romping of young onesno self-satisfied struttings
of wealthy gentlemen, with their brains in their pockets;
nor amusing conceits, and monkey divertisements of
smart young gentlemen with no brains at all. On the
contrary, the young ladies seated themselves demurely in
their rush-bottomed chairs, and knit their own woollen
stockings; nor ever opened their lips, excepting to say
yah Mynheer
, or
yah ya Vrouw
, to any question that was
asked them; behaving, in all things, like decent well
educated damsels. As to the gentlemen, each of them
tranquilly smoked his pipe, and seemed lost in
contemplation
of the blue and white tiles, with which the fire
places were decorated; wherein sundry passages of
scripture were piously pourtrayed: Tobet and his dog
figured to great advantage; Haman swung conspicuously
on his gibbet; and Jonah appeared most manfully
bouncing
out of the whale, like harlequin through a barrel of
fire.
The parties broke up without noise and without
confusion
.
They were carried home by their own carriages,
that is to say, by the vehicles nature had provided
them, excepting such of the wealthy as could afford to keep
a wagon. The gentlemen gallantly attended their fair
ones to their respective abodes, and took leave of them
with a hearty smack at the door: which, as it was an
established piece of etiquette, done in perfect simplicity
and honesty of heart, occasioned no scandal at that time,
nor should it at the presentif our great grandfathers
approved of the custom, it would argue a great want of
reverence in their descendants to say a word against it.
COSMOGONY,
Or Creation of the World; with a multitude of excellent
Theories, by which the Creation of a World is shown
to be no such difficult Matter as common Folks would
imagine.
Having
thus briefly introduced my reader into the world,
and given him some idea of its form and situation, he will
naturally be curious to know from whence it came, and
how it was created. And indeed the clearing up of these
points is absolutely essential to my history, masmuch as
if this world had not been formed, it is more than
probable
,
that this renowned island, on which is situated the
city of New-York, would never have had an existence.
The regular course of my history, therefore, requires that
I should proceed to notice the cosmogony or formation of
this our globe.
And now I give my readers fair warning, that I am
about to plunge for a chapter or two, into as complete a
labyrinth as ever historian was perplexed withal;
therefore
,
I advise them to take fast hold of my skirts, and keep
close at my heels, venturing neither to the right hand nor
to the left, lest they get bemired in a slough of
unintelligible
learning, or have their brains knocked out by some of
those hard Greek names which will be flying about in all
directions. But should any of them be too indolent or
chicken-hearted to accompany me in this perilous
undertaking
,
they had better take a short cut round, and wait for
me at the beginning of some smoother chapter.
Of the creation of the world we have a thousand
contradictory
accounts; and though a very satisfactory one
is furnished by divine revelation, yet every philosopher
feels himself in honour bound to furnish us with a better.
As an impartial historian, I consider it my duty to notice
their several theories by which mankind have been so
exceedingly edified and instructed.
Thus it was the opinion of certain ancient sages, that
the earth and the whole system of the universe was the
deity himself;
[2]
[2]
Aristot. ap. Cic. lib. i. cap. 3.
a doctrine most strenuously maintained
by Zenophanes and the whole tribe of Eleatics, as also by
Strato and the sect of peripatetic philosophers.
Pythagoras
likewise inculcated the famous numerical system of
the monad, dyad, and tryad; and by means of his sacred
quaternary elucidated the formation of the world, the
arcana of nature, and the principles both of music and
morals.
Aristot. Metaph. lib. i. cap. 5. Idem de Clo, 1. iii. c. 1.
Rousseau
.
Mm. sur. Musique Ancien. p. 39. Plutarch de Plac. Philos.
lib i. cap. 3.
Other sages adhered to the mathematical
system
of squares and triangles; the cube, the pyramid, and
the sphere; the tetrahedron, the octahedron, the
icosahedron
,
and the dodecahedron.
Tim. Locr. ap. Plato t. iii. p.
90.
While others advocated
the great elementary theory, which refers the construction
of our globe and all that it contains to the combinations
of four material elements, air, earth, fire, and water;
with the assistance of a fifth, an immaterial and vivifying
principle.
Nor must I omit to mention the great atomic system
taught by old Moschus before the siege of Troy; revived
by Democritus of laughing memory; improved by
Epicurus
,
that king of good fellows; and modernized by the
fanciful Descartes. But I decline inquiring whether the
atoms, of which the earth is said to be composed, are
eternal or recent; whether they are animate or inanimate;
whether, agreeably to the opinions of Atheists, they were
fortuitously aggregated; or, as the Theists maintain,
were arranged by a supreme intelligence.
Aristot. Nat. Ascult. I. ii. cap. 6. Aristoph. Metaph. lib. i. cap.
3. Cic. de Nat. Deor. lib. i. cap. 10. Justin Mart. Orat. ad Gent.
p. 20.
Whether, in
fact, the earth be an insensate clod, or whether it be
animated
by a soul;
[3]
[3]
Mosheim in Cudw. lib. i. cap. 4. Tim. de Anim. Mund. ap, Pit
lib. iii. Mem. de Acad, des Belles Lettres, t. xxxii. p. 19 et al.
which opinion was strenuously
maintained
by a host of philosophers, at the head of whom
stands the great Plato, that temperate sage, who threw
the cold water of philosophy on the form of sexual
intercourse
,
and inculcated the doctrine of Platonic lovean
exquisitely refined intercourse, but much better adapted
to the ideal inhabitants of his imaginary island of Atlantis
than to the sturdy race, composed of rebellious flesh
and blood, which populates the little matter of fact island
we inhabit.
Besides these systems, we have, moreover, the poetical
theogony of old Hesiod, who generated the whole
universe
in the regular mode of procreation, and the
plausible
opinion of others, that the earth was hatched from the
great egg of night, which floated in chaos, and was cracked
by the horns of the celestial bull. To illustrate this last
doctrine, Burnet, in his theory of the earth,
Book i. ch. 5.
has favoured
us with an accurate drawing and description both of the
form and texture of this mundane egg; which is found
to bear a near resemblance to that of a goose. Such of
my readers as take a proper interest in the origin of this
our planet will be pleased to learn, that the most profound
sages of antiquity, among the Egyptians, Chaldeans,
Persians
,
Greeks, and Latins, have alternately assisted at the
hatching of this strange bird; and that their cacklings
have been caught and continued, in different tones and
inflections, from philosopher to philosopher, unto the
present
day.
But while briefly noticing long celebrated systems of
ancient sages, let me not pass over, with neglect, those of
other philosophers; which, though less universal than
renowned
,
have equal claims to attention, and equal chance
for correctness. Thus it is recorded by the Brahmins, in
the pages of their inspired Shastah, that the angel
Bistnoo
transformed himself into a great boar, plunged into
the watery abyss, and brought up the earth on his tusks.
Then issued from him a mighty tortoise, and a mighty
snake; and Bistnoo placed the snake erect upon the back
of the tortoise, and he placed the earth upon the head of
the snake.
[4]
[4]
Holwell, Gent. Philosophy.
The negro philosophers of Congo affirm, that the world
was made by the hands of angels, excepting their own
country, which the supreme being constructed himself,
that it might be supremely excellent. And he took great
pains with the inhabitants, and made them very black and
beautiful; and when he had finished the first man, he was
well pleased with him, and smoothed him over the face,
and hence his nose, and the nose of all his descendants,
became flat.
The Mohawk philosophers tell us, that a pregnant
woman
fell down from heaven, and that a tortoise took her
upon its back, because every place was covered with
water; and, that the woman, sitting upon the tortoise,
paddled with her hands in the water, and raked up the
earth, whence it finally happened that the earth became
higher than the water.
Johannes Megapolensis, jun. Account of Maquaas or Mohawk
Indians. 1644.
But I forbear to quote a number more of these ancient
and outlandish philosophers, whose deplorable ignorance,
in despite of all their erudition, compelled them to write
in languages, which but few of my readers can understand;
and I shall proceed briefly to notice a few more intelligible
and fashionable theories of their modern successors.
And first I shall mention the great Buffon, who
conjectures
that this globe was originally a globe of liquid
fire, scintillated from the body of the sun, by the
percussion
of a comet, as a spark of generated by the collision of
flint and steel. That at first it was surrounded by gross
vapours, which cooling and condensing in process of time,
constituted, according to their densities, earth, water, and
air; which gradually arranged themselves, according to
their respective gravities, round the burning or vitrified
mass that formed their centre.
Hutton, on the contrary, supposes that the waters at
first were universally paramount; and he terrifies himself
with the idea that the earth must be eventually washed
away by the force of rains, rivers, and mountain torrents,
until it is confounded with the ocean, or, in other words,
absolutely dissolves into itself.Sublime idea! far sur
passing that of the tender hearted damsel of antiquity,
who wept herself into a fountain; or the good dame of
Narbonne in France, who, for a volubility of tongue
unusual
in her sex, was doomed to peel five hundred
thousand
and thirty-nine ropes of onions, and actually ran out
at her eyes before half the hideous task was accomplished.
Whiston, the same ingenious philosopher who rivalled
Ditton in his researches after the longitude, (for which the
mischief-loving Swift discharged on their heads, a most
savoury stanza,) has distinguished himself by a very
admirable
theory respecting the earth. He conjectures that
it was originally a
chaotic comet
, which, being selected for
the abode of man, was removed from its eccentric orbit,
and whirled round the sun in its present regular motion;
by which change of direction, order succeeded to
confusion
in the arrangement of its component parts. The
philosopher adds, that the deluge was produced by an
uncourteous
salute from the watery tail of another comet;
doubtless through sheer envy of its improved condition;
thus furnishing a melancholy proof that jealousy may
prevail, even among the heavenly bodies, and discord
interrupt
that celestial harmony of the spheres, so
melodiously
sung by the poets.
But I pass over a variety of excellent theories, among
which are those of Burnet, and Woodward, and
White-hurst
;
regretting extremely that my time will not suffer
me to give them the notice they deserveAnd shall
conclude
with that of the renowned Dr. Darwin. This
learned Theban, who is as much distinguished for rhyme
as reason, and for good natured credulity as serious
research
;
and who has recommended himself wonderfully
to the good graces of the ladies, by letting them into all
the gallantries, amours, debaucheries, and other topics of
scandal of the court of Flora, has fallen upon a theory
worthy of his combustible imagination. According to his
opinion, the huge mass of choas took a sudden occasion
to explode, like a barrel of gunpowder, and, in that act,
exploded the sunwhich, in its flight, by a similar
convulsion
exploded the earthwhich in like guise exploded
the moonand thus, by a concatenation of explosions, the
whole solar system was produced, and set most
systematically
in motion.
[5]
[5]
Darw. Bot. garden. Part I cant. i. l. 105.
5
By the great variety of theories here alluded to, every
one of which, if thoroughly examined, will be found
surprisingly
consistent in all its parts, my unlearned readers
will perhaps be led to conclude, that the creation of a
world is not so difficult a task as they at first imagined.
I have shown at least a score of ingenious methods in
which a world could be constructed; and, I have no
doubt, that had any of the philosophers above quoted the
use of a good manageable comet, and the philosophical
warehouse,
chaos
, at his command, he would engage to
manufacture a planet, as good, or, if you would take his
word for it, better than this we inhabit.
And here I cannot help noticing the kindness of
providence
,
in creating comets for the great relief of bewildered
philosophers. By their assistance more sudden evolutions
and transitions are effected in the system of nature, than
are wrought in a pantomimic exhibition, by the
wonder-working
sword of harlequin. Should one of our modern
sages, in his theoretical flights among the stars, ever find
himself lost in the clouds, and in danger of tumbling into
the abyss of nonsense and absurdity, he has but to seize a
comet by the beard, mount astride of its tail, and away
he gallops in triumph, like an enchanter on his hippogriff,
or a Connecticut witch on her broomstick, to sweep the
cobwebs out of the sky.
It is an old and vulgar saying, about a beggar on
horseback, which I would not for the world have applied
to these reverend philosophers: but I must confess, that
some of them, when they are mounted on one of those
fiery steeds, are as wild in their curvettings as was Ph
ton, of yore, when he aspired to manage the chariot of
Phbus. One drives his comet at full speed against the
sun, and knocks the world out of him with mighty
concussion; another, more moderate, makes his comet a
kind of beast of burden, carrying the sun a regular supply
of food and faggots; a third of more combustible
disposition
,
threatens to throw his comet, like a bombshell, into
the world, and blow it up like a powder magazine; while
a fourth, with no great delicacy to this planet and its
inhabitants
,
insinuates that some day or other his comet
my modest pen blushes while I write itshall absolutely
turn tail upon the world and deluge it with water!
Surely, as I have already observed, comets were
bountifully
provided by providence for the benefit of philosophers
to assist them in manufacturing theories.
And now, having adduced several of the most prominent
theories that occur to my recollection, I leave my
judicious
readers at full liberty to choose among them. They
are all serious speculations of learned menall differ
essentially
from each otherand all have the same title to
belief. It has ever been the task of one race of
philosophers
to demolish the works of their predecessors, and
elevate more splendid fantasies in their stead, which, in
their turn, are demolished and replaced by the air-castles
of a succeeding generation. Thus it would seem that
knowledge and genius, of which we make such great
parade
,
consist but in detecting the errors and absurdities of
those who have gone before, and devising new errors and
absurdities, to be detected by those who are to come after
us. Theories are the mighty soap-bubbles with which
the grown-up children of science amuse themselves; while
the honest vulgar stand gazing in stupid admiration, and
dignify these learned vagaries with the name of wisdom!
Surely Socrates was right in his opinion, that
philosophers
are but a soberer sort of madmen, busying
themselves
in things totally incomprehensible, or which, if
they could be comprehended, would be found not worthy
the trouble of discovery.
For my own part, until the learned have come to an
agreement among themselves, I shall content myself with
the account handed down to us by Moses; in which I do
but follow the example of our ingenious neighbours of
Connecticut; who at their first settlement proclaimed,
that the colony should be governed by the laws of God
until they had time to make better.
One thing however appears certainfrom the
unanimous
authority of the before quoted philosophers,
supported
by the evidence of our own senses, (which, though
very apt to deceive us, may be cautiously admitted as
additional
testimony,) it appears, I say, and I make the
assertion
deliberately, without fear of contradiction, that
this globe really
was created
, and that it is composed of
land and water
. It further appears that it is curiously
divided and parcelled out into continents and islands,
among which I boldly declare the renowned ISLAND OF
NEW-YORK will be found by any one who seeks for it in
its proper place.
DUTCH LEGISLATORS.
And now the infant settlement having advanced in age
and stature, it was thought high time it should receive an
honest Christian name, and it was accordingly called
New-Amsterdam
.
It is true there were some advocates for the
original Indian name, and many of the best writers of the
province did long continue to call it by the title of The
Manhattoes, but this was discountenanced by the
authorities
,
as being heathenish and savage. Besides, it was
considered an excellent and praiseworthy measure to
name it after a great city of the old world; as by that
means it was induced to emulate the greatness and
renown
of its namesakein the manner that little snivelling
urchins are called after great statesmen, saints, and
worthies
,
and renowned generals of yore, upon which they all
industriously copy their examples, and come to be very
mighty men in their day and generation.
The thriving state of the settlement and the rapid
increase
of houses gradually awakened the good Oloffe
from a deep lethargy, into which he had fallen after the
building of the fort. He now began to think it was time
some plan should be devised on which the increasing
town should be built. Summoning, therefore, his
counsellors
and coadjutors together, they took pipe in mouth,
and forthwith sunk into a very sound deliberation on the
subject.
At the very outset of the business an unexpected
difference
of opinion arose, and I mention it with much
sorrowing
,
as being the first altercation on record in the
councils of New-Amsterdam. It was a breaking forth of
the grudge and heartburning that had existed between
those two eminent burghers, Mynheers Tenbroeck and
Hardenbroeck, ever since their unhappy altercation on
the coast of Bellevue. The great Hardenbroeck had
waxed very wealthy and powerful from his domains,
which embraced the whole chain of Apulean mountains
that stretch along the gulf of Kip's Bay, and from part of
which his descendants have been expelled in latter ages
by the powerful clans of the Joneses and the
Schermerhornes
.
An ingenious plan for the city was offered by Mynheer
Tenbroeck, who proposed that it should be cut up and
intersected by canals, after the manner of the most
admired
cities in Holland. To this Mynheer Hardenbroeck
was diametrically opposed, suggesting in place thereof
that they should run out docks and wharfs by means of
piles, driven into the bottom of the river, on which the
town should be built. By these means, said he
triumphantly
,
shall we rescue a considerable space of
territory
from these immense rivers, and build a city that
shall rival Amsterdam, Venice, or any amphibious city
in Europe. To this proposition Tenbroeck (or Ten
Breeches) replied, with a look of as much scorn as he
could possibly assume. He cast the utmost censure
upon the plan of his antagonist as being preposterous,
and against the very order of things, as he would leave to
every true Hollander. For what, said he, is a town
without canals?It is like a body without veins and
arteries
,
and must perish for want of a free circulation of the
vital fluid. Tough Breeches, on the contrary, retorted
with a sarcasm upon his antagonist, who was somewhat of
an arid, dry boned habit; he remarked, that as to the
circulation
of the blood being necessary to existence,
Mynheer
Ten Breeches was a living contradiction to his own
assertion; for every body knew there had not a drop of
blood circulated through his wind-dried carcass for good
ten years, and yet there was not a greater busybody in the
whole colony. Personalities have seldom much effect in
making converts in argument; nor have I ever seen a man
convinced of error by being convicted of deformity. At
least, such was not the case at present. Ten Breeches
was very acrimonious in reply, and Tough Breeches, who
was a sturdy little man, and never gave up the last word,
rejoined with increasing spiritTen Breeches had the
advantage
of the greatest volubility, but Tough Breeches
had that invaluable coat of mail in argument called
obstinacy
Ten
Breeches had, therefore, the most metal, but
Tough Breeches the best bottomso that though Ten
Breeches made a dreadful clattering about his ears, and
battered and belaboured him with hard words and sound
arguments; yet Tough Breeches hung on most resolutely
to the last. They parted, therefore, as is usual in all
arguments where both parties are in the right, without
coming to any conclusion; but they hated each other
most heartily for ever after, and a similar breach with
that between the houses of Capulet and Montague did
ensue between the families of Ten Breeches and Tough
Breeches.
5*
I would not fatigue my reader with these dull matters
of fact, but that my duty as a faithful historian requires
that I should be particular; and, in truth, as I am now
treating of the critical period, when our city, like a young
twig first received the twists and turns, that have since
contributed to give it the present picturesque irregularity
for which it is celebrated, I cannot be too minute in
detailing
their first causes.
After the unhappy altercation I have just mentioned, I
do not find that any thing further was said on the subject
worthy of being recorded. The council, consisting of the
largest and oldest heads in the community, met regularly
once a-week, to ponder on this monstrous subject; but
either they were deterred by the war of words they had
witnessed, or they were naturally averse to the exercise
of the tongue, and the consequent exercise of the brain
certain it is, the most profound silence was maintained
the question, as usual, lay on the tablethe members
quietly smoked their pipes, making but few laws, without
ever enforcing any, and in the mean time the affairs of
the settlement went onas it pleased God.
As most of the council were but little skilled in the
mystery of combining pothooks and hangers, they
determined
,
most judiciously, not to puzzle either themselves
or posterity with voluminous records. The secretary
however, kept the minutes of the council with tolerable
precision, in a large vellum folio, fastened with massy
brass clasps; the journal of each meeting consisted but of
two lines, stating in Dutch. that the council sat this
day, and smoked twelve pipes on the affairs of the
colony
.
By which it appears that the first settlers did not
regulate their time by hours, but pipes, in the same
manner
as they measure distances in Holland at this very time;
an admirably exact measurement, as the pipe in the mouth
of a true born Dutchman is never liable to those accidents
and irregularities that are continually putting our clocks
out of order.
In this manner did the profound council of
New-Amsterdam
smoke, and doze, and ponder, from week to
week, month to month, and year to year, in what
manner
they should construct their infant settlement:
meanwhile
,
the town took care of itself, and like a sturdy brat
which is suffered to run about wild, unshackled by clouts
and bandages, and other abominations, by which your
notable nurses and sage old women cripple and disfigure
the children of men, increased so rapidly in strength and
magnitude, that before the honest burgomasters had
determined
upon a plan, it was too late to put it in
execution
whereupon
they wisely abandoned the subject
altogether
.
THE LITTLE MAN IN BLACK.
The
following story has been handed down by a family
tradition for more than a century. It is one on which
my cousin Christopher dwells with more than usual
prolixity
;
and, being in some measure connected with a
personage
often quoted in our work, I have thought it worthy
of being laid before my readers.
Soon after my grandfather, Mr. Lemuel Cockloft, had
quietly seated himself at the Hall, and just about the
time that the gossips of the neighbourhood, tired of
prying
into his affairs, were anxious for some new tea-table
topic, the busy community of our little village was thrown
into a grand turmoil of curiosity and conjecturea
situation
very common to little gossiping villagesby the
sudden and unaccountable appearance of a mysterious
individual.
The object of this solicitude was a little black-looking
man, of a foreign aspect, who took possession of an old
building, which having long had the reputation of being
haunted, was in a state of ruinous desolation, and an
object
of fear to all true believers in Ghosts. He usually
wore a high sugar-loaf hat with a narrow brim, and a
little black cloak, which, short as he was, scarcely reached
below his knees. He sought no intimacy or acquaintance
with any oneappeared to take no interest in the pleasures
or the little broils of the villagenor ever talked, except
sometimes to himself in an outlandish tongue. He
commonly
carried a large book, covered with sheepskin, under
his arm, appeared always to be lost in meditationand was
often met by the peasantry, sometimes watching the
dawning
of the day, sometimes at noon seated under a tree
poring over his volume, and sometimes at evening gazing,
with a look of sober tranquillity, at the sun as it gradually
sunk below the horizon.
The good people of the vicinity beheld something
prodigiously
singular in all this: a profound mystery
seemed
to hang about the stranger, which, with all their
sagacity
,
they could not penetrate; and in the excess of
worldly
charity they pronounced it a sure sign that he was
no better than he should be; a phrase innocent enough
in itself; but which, as applied in common, signifies
nearly
every thing that is bad. The young people thought
him a gloomy misanthrope, because he never joined in
their sports; the old men thought still more hardly of
him, because he followed no trade, nor ever seemed
ambitious
of earning a farthing; and as to the old gossips,
baffled by the inflexible taciturnity of the stranger, they
unanimously declared that a man who could not or would
not talk was no better than a dumb beast. The little
man in black, careless of their opinions, seemed resolved
to maintain the liberty of keeping his own secret; and the
consequence was, that, in a little while, the whole village
was in an uproar; for in little communities of this
description
,
the members have always the privilege of being
thoroughly
versed, and even of meddling in all the affairs of
each other.
A confidential conference was held one Sunday
morning
after sermon, at the door of the village church, and
the character of the unknown fully investigated. The
schoolmaster gave as his opinion that he was the
wandering
Jew; the sexton was certain that he must be a
free-mason
from his silence; a third maintained, with great
obstinacy, that he was a High German Doctor, and that
the book which he carried about with him contained the
secrets of the black art; but the most prevailing opinion
seemed to be that he was a witcha race of beings at that
time abounding in those parts: and a sagacious old matron,
from Connecticut, proposed to ascertain the fact by sousing
him into a kettle of hot water.
Suspicion, when once afloat, goes with wind and tide,
and soon becomes certainty. Many a stormy night was
the little man in black seen by the flashes of lightning,
frisking and curvetting in the air upon a broomstick; and
it was always observed, that at those times the storm did
more mischief than at any other. The old lady in
particular
,
who suggested the humane ordeal of the boiling
kettle, lost, on one of these occasions, a fine brindle cow;
which accident was entirely ascribed to the vengeance of
the little man in black. If ever a mischievous hireling
rode his master's favourite horse to a distant frolic, and
the animal was observed to be lame and jaded in the
morning,the little man in black was sure to be at the
bottom of the affair; nor could a high wind howl through
the village at night, but the old women shrugged up their
shoulders, and observed, the little man in black was in
his
tantrums
. In short, he became the bugbear of every
house; and was as effectual in frightening little children
into obedience and hysterics, as the redoubtable
Raw-head-and-bloody-bones
himself; nor could a housewife of
the village sleep in peace, except under the guardianship
of a horse-shoe nailed to the door.
The object of these direful suspicions remained for
some time totally ignorant of the wonderful quandary he
had occasioned; but he was soon doomed to feel its
effects
.
An individual who is once so unfortunate as to
incur the odium of a village, is in a great measure
out-lawed
and proscribed, and becomes a mark for injury and
insult; particularly if he has not the power or the
disposition
to recriminate.The little venomous passions,
which in the great world are dissipated and weakened by
being widely diffused, act in the narrow limits of a
country
town with collected vigour, and become rancorous in
proportion as they are confined in their sphere of action.
The little man in black experienced the truth of this;
every mischievous urchin returning from school had full
liberty to break his windows; and this was considered as
a most daring exploit; for in such awe did they stand of
him, that the most adventurous schoolboy was never seen
to approach his threshold, and at night would prefer going
round by the cross-roads, where a traveller had been
murdered
by the Indians, rather than pass by the door of his
forlorn habitation.
The only living creature that seemed to have any care
or affection for this deserted being was an old turnspit,
the companion of this lonely mansion and his solitary
wanderings;the sharer of his scanty meals, and, sorry
am I to say it,the sharer of his persecutions. The
turnspit, like his master, was peaceable and inoffensive;
never known to bark at a horse, to growl at a traveller,
or to quarrel with the dogs of the neighbourhood. He
followed close by his master's heels when he went out,
and when he returned stretched himself in the sunbeams
at the door; demeaning himself in all things like a civil
and well disposed turnspit. But notwithstanding his
exemplary deportment, he fell likewise under the ill
report
of the village; as being the familiar of the little man
in black, and the evil spirit that presided at his
incantations
.
The old hovel was considered as the scene of their
unhallowed rites, and its harmless tenants regarded with
a detestation which their inoffensive conduct never
merited
.
Though pelted and jeered at by the brats of the
village
,
and frequently abused by their parents, the little
man in black never turned to rebuke them; and his
faithful
dog, when wantonly assaulted, looked up wistfully in
his master's face, and there learned a lesson of patience
and forbearance.
The movements of this inscrutable being had long been
the subject of speculation at Cockloft-hall, for its inmates
were full as much given to wondering as their
descendants
.
The patience with which he bore his persecutions
particularly surprised themfor patience is a virtue but
little known in the Cockloft family. My grandmother,
who, it appears, was rather superstitious, saw, in this
humility, nothing but the gloomy sullenness of a wizard,
who restrained himself for the present, in hopes of
midnight
vengeancethe parson of the village, who was a
man of some reading, pronounced it the stubborn
insensibility
of a stoic philosophermy grandfather, who,
worthy soul, seldom wandered abroad in search of
conclusions
,
took datum from his own excellent heart, and
regarded it as the humble forgiveness of a Christian. But
however different were their opinions as to the character
of the stranger, they agreed in one particular, namely, in
never intruding upon his solitude; and my grandmother,
who was at that time nursing my mother, never left the
room without wisely putting the large family bible in the
cradlea sure talisman, in her opinion, against witchcraft
and necromancy.
One stormy windy night, when a bleak north-east
wind moaned about the cottages, and howled around the
village steeple, my grandfather was returning from club
preceded by a servant with a lantern. Just as he arrived
opposite the desolate abode of the little man in black, he
was arrested by the piteous howling of a dog, which,
heard in the pauses of a storm, was exquisitely
mournful
;
and he fancied now and then that he caught the low
and broken groans of some one in distress. He stopped for
some minutes, hesitating between the benevolence of his
heart and a sensation of genuine delicacy, which, in spite
of his eccentricity, he fully possessed,and which forbade
him to pry into the concerns of his neighbours.
Perhaps
,
too, this hesitation might have been strengthened
by a little taint of superstition; or surely, if the unknown
had been addicted to witchcraft, this was a most
propitious
night for his vagaries. At length the old
gentleman's
philanthropy predominated; he approached the
hovel, and pushing open the door,for poverty has no
occasion for locks and keys,beheld, by the light of the
lantern, a scene that smote his generous heart to the core.
On a miserable bed, with pallid and emaciated visage
and hollow eyes; in a room destitute of every
convenience
;
without fire to warm or friend to console him, lay
this helpless mortal, who had been so long the terror and
wonder of the village. His dog was crouching on the
scanty coverlet, and shivering with cold. My
grandfather
stepped softly and hesitatingly to the bedside, and
accosted
the forlorn sufferer in his usual accents of kindness.
The little man in black, seemed recalled by the tones of
compassion from the lethargy into which he had fallen;
for, though his heart was almost frozen, there was yet
one chord that answered to the call of the good old man
who bent over him;the tones of sympathy, so novel to
his ear, called back his wandering senses, and acted like a
restorative to his solitary feelings.
He raised his eyes, but they were vacant and haggard;
he put forth his hand, but it was cold; he essayed to
speak, but the sound died away in his throat;he
pointed
to his mouth with an expression of dreadful meaning,
and, sad to relate! my grandfather understood that the
harmless stranger, deserted by society, was perishing with
hunger!With the quick impulse of humanity he
despatched
the servant to the hall for refreshment. A little
warm nourishment renovated him for a short time, but not
long: it was evident his pilgrimage was drawing to a close,
and he was about entering that peaceful asylum where
the wicked cease from troubling.
His tale of misery was short, and quickly told;
infirmities
had stolen upon him, heightened by the rigours
of the season; he had taken to his bed without strength to
rise and ask for assistance; and if I had, said he, in a
tone of bitter despondency, to whom should I have
applied
?
I have no friend that I know of in the world!
the villagers avoid me as something loathsome and
dangerous
;
and here, in the midst of Christians, should I have
perished without a fellow being to sooth the last moments
of existence, and close my dying eyes, had not the
howlings
of my faithful dog excited your attention.
He seemed deeply sensible of the kindness of my
grandfather
;
and at one time as he looked up into his old
benefactor's
face, a solitary tear was observed to steal
adown the parched furrows of his cheek.Poor outcast!
it was the last tear he shed; but I warrant it was not
the first by millions! My grandfather watched by him
all night. Towards morning he gradually declined; and
as the rising sun gleamed through the windows, he begged
to be raised in his bed, that he might look at it for the
last time. He contemplated it for a moment with a kind
of religious enthusiasm, and his lips moved as if engaged
in prayer. The strange conjecture concerning him
rushed
on my grandfather's mind. He is an idolater!
thought he, and is worshipping the sun! He listened
a moment, and blushed at his own uncharitable suspicion;
he was only engaged in the pious devotions of a Christian.
His simple orison being finished, the little man in black
withdrew his eyes from the east, and taking my
grandfather's
hand in one of his, and making a motion with the
other towards the sunI love to contemplate it, said
he; 'tis an emblem of the universal benevolence of a
true Christian;and it is the most glorious work of him
who is philanthropy itself! My grandfather blushed
still deeper at his ungenerous surmises; he had pitied the
stranger at first, but now he revered him:he turned
once more to regard him, but his countenance had
undergone
a change; the holy enthusiasm that had lighted up
each feature had given place to an expression of
mysterious
import:a gleam of grandeur seemed to steal across
his gothic visage, and he appeared full of some mighty
secret which he hesitated to impart. He raised the
tattered
nightcap that had sunk almost over his eyes, and
waving his withered hand with a slow and feeble
expression
of dignityIn me, said he, with a laconic
solemnity
,In
me you behold the last descendant of the
renowned
Linkum Fidelius! My grandfather gazed at
him with reverence; for though he had never heard of
the illustrious personage thus pompously announced, yet
there was a certain black-letter dignity in the name that
peculiarly struck his fancy and commanded his respect.
You have been kind to me, continued the little man
in black, after a momentary pause, and richly will I
requite your kindness by making you heir to my
treasures
!
In yonder large deal box are the volumes of my
illustrious ancestor, of which I alone am the fortunate
possessor. Inherit themponder over them, and be
wise! He grew faint with the exertion he had made,
and sunk back almost breathless on his pillow. His hand,
which, inspired with the importance of his subject, he had
raised to my grandfather's arm, slipped from its hold and
fell over the side of the bed, and his faithful dog licked
it; as if anxious to sooth the last moments of his master,
and testify his gratitude to the hand that had so often
cherished
him. The untaught caresses of the faithful animal
were not lost upon his dying master; he raised his
languid
eyes,turned them on the dog, then on my
grandfather
;
and having given this silent recommendation
closed them for ever.
The remains of the little man in black,
notwithstanding
the objections of many pious people, were decently
interred
in the church-yard of the village; and his spirit,
harmless as the body it once animated, has never been
known to molest a living being. My grandfather
complied
as far as possible with his last request; he conveyed
the volumes of Linkum Fidelius to his library;he
pondered
over them frequently; but whether he grew wiser,
the family tradition doth not mention. This much is
certain, that his kindness to the poor descendant of
Fidelius
was amply rewarded by the approbation of his own
heart, and the devoted attachment of the old turnspit;
who, transferring his affection from his deceased master
to his benefactor, became his constant attendant, and was
father to a long tribe of runty curs that still flourish in the
family. And thus was the Cockloft library enriched by
the invaluable folios of the sage Linkum Fidelius.
MY AUNT CHARITY.
My
aunt Charity departed this life in the fifty-ninth
year of her age, though she never grew older after
twenty-five
.
In her teens she was, according to her own
account, a celebrated beauty,though I never could meet
with any body that remembered when she was handsome.
On the contrary, Evergreen's father, who used to
gallant
her in his youth, says she was as knotty a little piece
6
of humanity as he ever saw; and that, if she had been
possessed of the least sensibility, she would, like poor old
Acco
, have most certainly run mad at her own figure and
face the first time she contemplated herself in a
looking-glass
.
In the good old times that saw my aunt in the
hey-day of youth, a fine lady was a most formidable
animal
,
and required to be approached with the same awe and
devotion that a Tartar feels in the presence of his grand
Lama. If a gentleman offered to take her hand, except
to help her into a carriage, or lead her into a
drawing-room
,
such frowns! such a rustling of brocade and
taffeta
!
Her very paste shoe buckles sparkled with
indignation
,
and for a moment assumed the brilliancy of
diamonds
!
In those days the person of a belle was sacredit
was unprofaned by the sacrilegious grasp of a stranger:
simple souls:they had not the waltz among them yet!
My good aunt prided herself on keeping up this buckram
delicacy; and if she happened to be playing at the old
fashioned game of forfeits, and was fined a kiss, it was
always more trouble to get it than it was worth; for she
made a most gallant defence, and never surrendered
until
she saw her adversary inclined to give over his
attack
.
Evergreen's father says he remembers once to
have been on a sleighing party with her, and when they
came to Kissing-Bridge, it fell to his lot to levy contributions
on Miss Charity Cockloft, who after squalling at a
hideous rate, at length jumped out of the sleigh plump into
a snow-bank, where she stuck fast like an icicle, until he
came to her rescue. This Latonian feat cost her a
rheumatism
,
which she never thoroughly recovered.
It is rather singular that my aunt, though a great
beauty, and an heiress withal, never got married.The
reason she alleged was, that she never met with a lover
who resembled Sir Charles Grandison, the hero of her
nightly dreams and waking fancy; but I am privately of
opinion that it was owing to her never having had an
offer. This much is certain, that for many years previous
to her decease she declined all attentions from the
gentlemen
,
and contented herself with watching over the
welfare of her fellow creatures. She was, indeed, observed
to take a considerable lean towards methodism, was
frequent
in her attendance at love-feasts, read Whitfield and
Wesley, and even went so far as once to travel the distance
of five and twenty miles to be present at a camp-meeting.
This gave great offence to my cousin Christopher, and
his good lady, who, as I have already mentioned, are
rigidly
orthodox;and had not my aunt Charity been of
a most pacific disposition, her religious whim-wham
would have occasioned many a family altercation. She
was indeed, as the Cockloft family ever boasteda lady
of unbounded loving-kindness, which extended to man,
woman, and child; many of whom she almost killed
with good nature. Was any acquaintance sick?in
vain did the wind whistle and the storm beatmy aunt
would waddle through mud and mire, over the whole
town, but what she would visit them. She would
sit by them for hours together with the most
persevering
patience; and tell a thousand melancholy stories
of human misery, to keep up their spirits. The
whole catalogue of
yerb
teas was at her fingers' ends,
from formidable wormwood down to gentle balm; and
she would descant by the hour on the healing qualities of
hoar-hound, catnip, and penny-royal. Wo be to the
patient
that came under the benevolent hand of my aunt
Charity; he was sure, willy nilly, to be drenched with a
deluge of decoctions; and full many a time has my cousin
Christopher borne a twinge of pain in silence, through
fear of being condemned to suffer the martyrdom of her
materia-medica. My good aunt had, moreover,
considerable
skill in astronomy; for she could tell when the sun
rose and set every day in the year;and no woman in the
whole world was able to pronounce, with more certainty,
at what precise minute the moon changed. She held the
story of the moon's being made of green cheese as an
abominable slander on her favourite planet; and she had
made several valuable discoveries in solar eclipses, by
means of a bit of burnt glass, which entitled her at least
to an honorary admission in the American Philosophical
Society. Hutching's Improved was her favourite
book; and I shrewdly suspect that it was from this
valuable
work she drew most of her sovereign remedies for
colds, coughs, corns, and consumptions.
But the truth must be told; with all her good
qualities
,
my aunt Charity was afflicted with one fault,
extremely
rare among her gentle sexit was curiosity.
How she came by it, I am at a loss to imagine, but it
played the very vengeance with her, and destroyed the
comfort of her life. Having an invincible desire to know
every body's character, business, and mode of living, she
was for ever prying into the affairs of her neighbours;
and got a great deal of ill-will from people towards whom
she had the kindest disposition possible. If any family
on the opposite side of the street gave a dinner, my aunt
would mount her spectacles, and sit at the window until
the company were all housed, merely that she might know
who they were. If she heard a story about any of her
acquaintance
,
she would forthwith, set off full sail, and never
rest, until, to use her usual expression, she had got to the
bottom of it; which meant nothing more than telling it
to every one she knew.
I remember one night my aunt Charity happened to
hear a most precious story about one of her good friends,
but unfortunately too late to give it immediate circulation.
It made her absolutely miserable; and she hardly slept a
wink all night; for fear her bosom friend, Mrs. Sipkins,
should get the start of her in the morning, and blow the
whole affair.You must know there was always a
contest
between these two ladies, who should first give
currency
to the good-natured things said about every body;
and this unfortunate rivalship at length proved fatal to
their long and ardent friendship. My aunt got up full
two hours that morning before her usual time; put on her
pompadour taffeta gown, and sallied forth to lament the
misfortune of her dear friend.Would you believe it!
wherever she went, Mrs. Sipkins had anticipated her;
and instead of being listened to with uplifted hands and
open-mouthed wonder, my unhappy aunt was obliged to
sit down quietly and listen to the whole affair, with
numerous
additions, alterations, and amendments! Now
this was too bad; it would almost have provoked Patient
Grizzle or a saint; it was too much for my aunt, who
kept her bed three days afterwards, with a cold as she
pretended; but I have no doubt it was owing to this
affair
of Mrs. Sipkins, to whom she never would be
reconciled
.
But I pass over the rest of my aunt Charity's life
chequered
with the various calamities and misfortunes and
mortifications, incident to those worthy old gentlewomen
who have the domestic cares of the whole community upon
their minds; and I hasten to relate the melancholy
incident
that hurried her out of existence in the full bloom of
antiquated virginity.
In their frolicsome malice the fates had ordered that
a French boarding-house, or
Pension Francaise
, as it was
called, should be established directly opposite my aunt's
residence. Cruel event! unhappy aunt Charity!it
threw her into that alarming disorder denominated the
fidgets: she did nothing but watch at the window day
after day, but without becoming one whit the wiser at the
end of a fortnight than she was at the beginning; she
thought that neighbour Pension had a monstrous large
family
,
and somehow or other they were all men! She
could not imagine what business neighbour Pension
followed
to support so numerous a household; and wondered
why there was always such a scraping of fiddles in the
parlour, and such a smell of onions from neighbour
Pension's
kitchen: in short, neighbour Pension was
continually
uppermost in her thoughts, and incessantly on the outer
edge of her tongue. This was, I believe, the very first
time she had ever failed to get at the bottom of a thing;
and the disappointment cost her many a sleepless night, I
warrant you. I have little doubt, however, that my aunt
would have ferretted neighbour Pension out, could she
have spoken or understood French; but in those times
people in general could make themselves understood in
plain English; and it was always a standing rule in the
Cockloft family, which exists to this day, that not one of
the females should learn French.
My aunt Charity had lived at her window, for some
time in vain; when one day she was keeping her usual
look-out, and suffering all the pangs of unsatisfied
curiosity
,
she beheld a little meagre, weazel-faced Frenchman,
of the most forlorn, diminutive, and pitiful proportions,
arrive at neighbour Pension's door. He was dressed in
white, with a little pinch-up cocked hat; he seemed to
shake in the wind, and every blast that went over him
whistled through his bones, and threatened instant
annihilation
.
This embodied spirit of famine was followed
by three carts, lumbered with crazy trunks, chests,
band-boxes
,
bidets, medicine-chests, parrots, and monkeys;
and at his heels ran a yelping pack of little black-nosed
pug-dogs. This was the one thing wanting to fill up
the measure of my aunt Charity's afflictions; she could
not conceive, for the soul of her, who this mysterious
little apparition could be that made so great a display;
what he could possibly do with so much baggage, and
particularly with his parrots and monkeys; or how so
small a carcass could have occasion for so many trunks of
clothes. Honest soul! she never had a peep into a
Frenchman's
wardrobethat depot of old coasts, hats, and
6*
breeches, of the growth of every fashion he has followed
in his life.
From the time of this fatal arrival my poor aunt was in a
quandary;all her inquiries were fruitless; no one could
expound the history of this mysterious stranger: she
never held her head up afterwardsdrooped daily, took to
her bed in a fortnight, and in one little month, I saw
her quietly deposited in the family vaultbeing the
seventh
Cockloft that has died of a whim-wham!
Take warning, my fair countrywomen! and you, O! ye
excellent ladies, whether married or single, who pry into
other people's affairs and neglect those of your own
household
;
who are so busily employed in observing the faults
of others that you have no time to correct your own;
remember
the fate of my dear aunt Charity and eschew the
evil spirit of curiosity.
WILL WIZARD.
I WAS not a little surprised the other morning at a
request
from Will Wizard, that I would accompany him
that evening to Mrs. 's ball. The request was
simple enough in itself, it was only singular as coming
from Will;of all my acquaintance, Wizard, is the least
calculated and disposed for the society of ladiesnot that
he dislikes their company; on the contrary, like every
man of pith and marrow, he is a professed admirer of
the sex; and had he been born a poet, would
undoubtedly
have bespattered and be-rhymed some hard
named goddess; until she became as famous as Petrach's
Laura, or Waller's Sacharissa; but Will is such a
confounded
bungler at a bow, has so many odd bachelor
habits, and finds it so troublesome to be gallant, that he
generally prefers smoking his cigar and telling his story
among cronies of his own gender:and thundering long
stories they are, let me tell you: set Will once a-going
about China or Crim Tartary, or the Hottentots, and
heaven help the poor victim who has to endure his
prolixity
;
he might better be tied to the tail of a jack-
o'lanthern
.
In one word, Will talks like a traveller. Being
well acquainted with his character, I was the more
alarmed at his inclination to visit a party; since he has
often assured me, that he considered it as equivalent
to being stuck up for three hours in a steam-engine. I
even wondered how he had received an invitation;this
he soon accounted for. It seems Will, on his last arrival
from Canton, had made a present of a case of tea to a
lady, for whom he had once entertained a sneaking
kindness
when at grammar-school; and she in return had
invited him to come and drink some of it: a cheap way
enough of paying off little obligations. I readily
acceded
to Will's proposition, expecting much entertainment
from his eccentric remarks; and as he has been absent
some few years, I anticipated his surprise at the splendour
and elegance of a modern rout.
On calling for Will in the evening, I found him full
dressed, waiting for me. I contemplated him with absolute
dismay. As he still retained a spark of regard for the
lady who once reigned in his affections, he had been at
unusual pains in decorating his person, and broke upon
my sight arrayed in the true style that prevailed among
our beaux some years ago. His hair was turned up and
tufted at the top, frizzled out at the ears, a profusion of
powder puffed over the whole, and a long plaited club
swung gracefully from shoulder to shoulder, describing
a pleasing semi-circle of powder and pomatum. His
claret-coloured coat was decorated with a profusion of
gilt buttons, and reached to his calves. His white
cassimere
small-clothes were so tight that he seemed to have
grown up in them; and his ponderous legs, which are
the thickest part of his body, were beautifully clothed in
sky-blue silk stockings, once considered so becoming.
But above all, he prided himself upon his waistcoat of
China silk, which might almost have served a good
house-wife
for a short-gown; and he boasted that the roses and
tulips upon it were the work of
Nang-Fou
, daughter of
the great
Chin-Chin-Fou
, who had fallen in love with the
graces of his person, and sent it to him as a parting
present
;
he assured me she was a perfect beauty, with
sweet obliquity of eyes, and a foot no longer than the
thumb of an alderman;he then dilated most copiously
on his silver sprigged dicky, which he assured me was
quite the rage among the dashing young mandarins of
Canton.
I hold it an ill-natured office to put any man out of
conceit with himself; so, though I would willingly have
made a little alteration in my friend Wizard's
picturesque
costume, yet I politely complimented him on his
rakish appearance.
On entering the room I kept a good look out on Will,
expecting to see him exhibit signs of surprise; but he is
one of those knowing fellows who are never surprised at
any thing, or at least will never acknowledge it. He
took his stand in the middle of the floor, playing with
his great steel watch-chain; and looking round on the
company, the furniture, and the pictures, with the air of
a man who had seen dd finer things in his time;
and to my utter confusion and dismay, I saw him coolly
pull out his villanous old japanned tobacco-box,
ornamented
with a bottle, a pipe, and a scurvy motto, and
help himself to a quid in face of all the company.
I knew it was all in vain to find fault with a fellow
of Will's socratic turn, who is never to be put out of
humour with himself; so, after he had given his box its
prescriptive rap, and returned it to his pocket, I drew
him into a corner where he might observe the company
without being prominent objects ourselves.
And pray who is that stylish figure, said Will,
who blazes away in red, like a volcano, and who
seems wrapped in flames like a fiery dragon?That,
cried I, is Miss Laurelia Dashaway:she is the
highest
flash of the tonhas much whim and more
eccentricity
,
and has reduced many an unhappy gentleman to
stupidity by her charms; you see she holds out the red
flag in token of no quarter. Then keep me safe
out of the sphere of her attractions, cried Will: I
would not e'en come in contact with her train, lest it
should scorch me like the tail of a comet.But who, I
beg of you, is that amiable youth who is handing along
a young lady, and at the same time contemplating his
sweet person in a mirror, as he passes? His name,
said I, is Billy Dimple;he is a universal smiler, and
would travel from Dan to Beersheba, and smile on every
body as he passed. Dimple is a slave to the ladiesa
hero at tea-parties, and is famous at the
pirouet
and the
pigeon-wing; a fiddle-stick is his idol, and a dance his
elysium. A very pretty young gentleman, truly,
cried Wizard; he reminds me of a contemporary beau
at Hayti. You must know that the magnanimous
Dessalines
gave a great ball to his court one fine sultry
summer's
evening; Dessy and I were great cronies;hand
and glove:one of the most condescending great men I
ever knew.Such a display of black and yellow beauties!
such a show of Madras handkerchiefs, red beads, cocks'
tails, and peacocks' feathers!it was, as here, who should
wear the highest top-knot, drag the longest tails, or
exhibit
the greatest variety of combs, colours, and
gew-gaws
.
In the middle of the rout, when all was buzz,
slip-slop, clack, and perfume, who should enter but Tucky
Squash! The yellow beauties blushed blue, and the
black ones blushed as red as they could, with pleasure;
and there was a universal agitation of fans: every eye
brightened and whitened to see Tucky; for he was the
pride of the court, the pink of courtesy, the mirror of
fashion, the adoration of all the sable fair ones of Hayti.
Such breadth of nose, such exuberance of lip! his shins
had the true cucumber curve;his face in dancing shone
like a kettle; and provided you kept to windward of him
in summer, I do not know a sweeter youth in all Hayti
than Tucky Squash. When he laughed, there appeared
from ear to ear a chevaux-de-frize of teeth, that rivalled
the shark's in whiteness; he could whistle like a
north-wester
;
play on a three-stringed fiddle like Apollo;
and, as to dancing, no Long-Island negro could shuffle
you double-trouble, or hoe corn and dig potatoes,
more scientifically: in short, he was a second Lothario.
And the dusky nymphs of Hayti, one, and all, declared
him a perpetual Adonis. Tucky walked about, whistling
to himself, without regarding any body; and his
nonchalance
was irresistible.
I found Will had got neck and heels into one of his
traveller's stories; and there is no knowing how far he
would have run his parallel between Billy Dimple and
Tucky Squash, had not the music struck up from an
adjoining apartment, and summoned the company to the
dance. The sound seemed to have an inspiring effect on
honest Will, and he procured the hand of an old
acquaintance
for a country dance. It happened to be the
fashionable
one of The devil among the Tailors, which is
so vociferously demanded at every ball and assembly: and
many a torn gown, and many an unfortunate toe, did rue
the dancing of that night; for Will thundered down the
dance like a coach and six, sometimes right and sometimes
wrong; now running over half a score of little Frenchmen,
and now making sad inroads into ladies' cobweb muslins
and spangled tails. As every part of Will's body
partook
of the exertion, he shook from his capacious head
such volumes of powder, that like pious Eneas on the first
interview with Queen Dido, he might be said to have
been enveloped in a cloud. Nor was Will's partner an
insignificant figure in the scene; she was a young lady
of most voluminous proportions, that quivered at every
skip; and being braced up in the fashionable style with
whalebone, stay-tape and buckram, looked like an apple
pudding tied in the middle; or, taking her flaming dress
into consideration, like a bed and bolsters rolled up in a
suit of red curtains. The dance finished.I would
gladly have taken Will off, but no;he was now in one
of his happy moods, and there was no doing any thing
with him. He insisted on my introducing him to Miss
Sparkle, a young lady unrivalled for playful wit and
innocent
vivacity, and who, like a brilliant, adds lustre to
the front of fashion. I accordingly presented him to her,
and began a conversation, in which, I thought, he might
take a share; but no such thing. Will took his stand
before
her, straddling like a colossus, with his hands in his
pockets, and an air of the most profound attention; nor
did he pretend to open his lips for some time, until, upon
some lively sally of hers, he electrified the whole company
with a most intolerable burst of laughter. What was to
be done with such an incorrigible fellow?To add to my
distress, the first word he spoke was to tell Miss Sparkle
that something she said reminded him of a circumstance
that happened to him in China;and at it he went, in
the true traveller style,described the Chinese mode of
eating rice with chop-sticks;entered into a long
eulogium
on the succulent qualities of boiled birds' nests: and
I made my escape at the very moment when he was on
the point of squatting down on the floor, to show how the
little Chinese
Joshes
sit cross-legged.
STYLE.
In
no instance have I seen this grasping after style
more whimsically exhibited than in the family of my old
acquaintance Timothy Giblet. I recollect old Giblet
when I was a boy, and he was the most surly curmudgeon
I ever knew. He was a perfect scare-crow to the
small-fry
of the day, and inherited the hatred of all these
unlucky
little shavers; for never could we assemble about
his door of an evening to play, and make a little hubbuh,
but out he sallied from his nest like a spider, flourished
his formidable horse-whip, and dispersed the whole crew
in the twinkling of a lamp. I perfectly remember a bill
he sent in to my father for a pane of sound glass I had
accidentally broken, which came well nigh getting me a
flogging; and I remember, as perfectly, that the next night
I revenged myself by breaking half-a-dozen. Giblet was
as arrant a grub-worm as ever crawled; and the only rules
of right and wrong he cared a button for, were the rules
of multiplication and addition; which he practised much
more successfully than he did any of the rules of religion
or morality. He used to declare they were the true
golden
rules; and he took special care to put Cocker's
arithmetic
in the hands of his children, before they had
read ten pages in the bible or the prayer book. The
practice
of these favourite maxims was at length crowned
with the harvest of success; and after a life of incessant
self-denial, and starvation, and after enduring all the
pounds, shillings and pence miseries of a miser, he had the
satisfaction of seeing himself worth a plum, and of dying
just as he had determined to enjoy the remainder of his
days in contemplating his great wealth and accumulating
mortgages.
His children inherited his money; but they buried
the disposition, and every other memorial of their father
in his grave. Fired with a noble thirst for style, they
instantly emerged from the retired lane in which
themselves
and their accomplishments had hitherto been
buried
;
and they blazed, and they whizzed, and they
cracked
about town, like a nest of squibs and devils in a
fire-work
.
I can liken their sudden
eclat
to nothing but that
of the locust, which is hatched in the dust, where it
increases
and swells up to maturity, and after feeling for
a moment the vivifying rays of the sun, bursts forth a
mighty insect, and flutters and rattles, and buzzes from
every tree. The little warblers, who have long cheered
the woodlands with their dulcet notes, are stunned by
the discordant racket of these upstart intruders, and
contemplate
,
in contemptuous silence, their tinsel and their
noise.
Having once started, the Giblets were determined that
nothing should stop them in their career, until they
had run their full course and arrived at the very tip-top
of style. Every tailor, every shoemaker, every
coachmaker
,
every milliner, every mantua-maker, every
paper-hanger
,
every piano-teacher, and every dancing-master in
the city, were enlisted in their service; and the willing
wights most courteously answered their call, and fell to
work to build up the fame of the Giblets, as they had
done that of many an aspiring family before them. In
a little time the young ladies could dance the waltz,
thunder
Lodoiska, murder French, kill time, and commit
violence
on the face of nature in a landscape in
water-colours
,
equal to the best lady in the land, and the young
gentlemen were seen lounging at corners of streets, and
driving tandem; heard talking loud at the theatre, and
laughing in church, with as much ease and grace, and
modesty, as if they had been gentlemen all the days of
their lives.
And the Giblets arrayed themselves in scarlet, and in
fine linen, and seated themselves in high places; but no
body noticed them except to honour them with a little
contempt. The Giblets made a prodigious splash in
their own opinion; but nobody extolled them except the
tailors, and the milliners, who had been employed in
manufacturing
their paraphernalia. The Giblets thereupon
being, like Caleb Quotem, determined to have a place
at the review, fell to work more fiercely than ever;
they gave dinners, and they gave balls; they hired cooks;
they hired confectioners; and they would have kept a
newspaper in pay, had they not been all bought up at that
time for the election. They invited the dancing men,
and the dancing women, and the gormandizers, and the
epicures of the city, to come and make merry at their
expense; and the dancing men, and the dancing women,
and the epicures, and the gormandizers, did come; and
they did make merry at their expense; and they eat, and
they drank, and they capered, and they danced, and they
laughed at their entertainers.
Then commenced the hurry and the bustle, and the
mighty nothingness of fashionable life;such rattling in
coaches! such flaunting in the streets! such slamming of
box-doors at the theatre! such a tempest of bustle and
unmeaning
noise wherever they appeared! The Giblets were
seen here and there and every where;they visited every
body they knew, and every body they did not know;
and there was no getting along for the Giblets. Their
plan at length succeeded. By dint of dinners, of feeding
and frolicking the town, the Giblet family worked
themselves into notice, and enjoyed the ineffable pleasure
of being for ever pestered by visiters, who cared nothing
about them; of being squeezed, and smothered, and
parboiled
at nightly balls, and evening tea-parties; they
were allowed the privilege of forgetting the very few old
friends they once possessed;they turned their noses up
in the wind at every thing that was not genteel; and
their superb manners and sublime affectation at length
left it no longer a matter of doubt that the Giblets were
perfectly in the style.
FRENCHMEN.
In
my mind there's no position more positive and
unexceptionable
than that most Frenchmen, dead or alive,
are born dancers. I came pounce upon this discovery
at the assembly, and I immediately noted it down in my
register of indisputable factsthe public shall know all
about it. As I never dance cotillions, holding them to
be monstrous distorters of the human frame, and
tantamount
in their operations to being broken and dislocated
on the wheel, I generally take occasion, while they are
going on, to make my remarks on the company. In the
course of these observations I was struck with the
energy
and eloquence of sundry limbs, which seemed to be
flourishing about without appertaining to any body.
After much investigation and difficulty, I, at length,
traced them to their respective owners, whom I found
to be all Frenchmen to a man. Art may have meddled
somewhat in these affairs, but nature certainly did more.
I have since been considerably employed in calculations
on this subject; and by the most accurate computation
I have determined, that a Frenchman passes at least
three fifths of his time between the heavens and the
earth, and partakes eminently of the nature of a gossam
or soap bubble. One of these jack-a-lantern heroes, in
taking a figure, which neither Euclid nor Pythagoras
himself could demonstrate, unfortunately wound himself
I mean his foothis better partinto a lady's cobweb
muslin robe; but perceiving it at the instant, he set
himself a spinning the other way, like a top, unravelled
his step, without omitting one angle or curve, and
extricated
7
himself without breaking a thread of the lady's
dress! he then sprung up like a sturgeon, crossed his
feet four times, and finished this wonderful evolution by
quivering his left leg, as a cat does her paw when she
has accidentally dipped it in water. No man of
woman born, who was not a Frenchman, or a
mountebank
,
could have done the like.
THE WIFE.
I have
often had occasion to remark the fortitude with
which women sustain the most overwhelming reverses of
fortune. Those disasters which break down the spirit
of a man, and prostrate him in the dust, seem to call forth
all the energies of the softer sex, and give such intrepidity
and elevation to their character, that at times it approaches
to sublimity. Nothing can be more touching than to
behold
a soft and tender female, who had been all weakness
and dependence, and alive to every trivial roughness
while treading the prosperous paths of life, suddenly
rising
in mental force to be the comforter and supporter of
her husband under misfortune, and abiding, with
unshrinking
firmness, the bitterest blasts of adversity.
As the vine which has long twined its graceful foliage
about the oak, and been lifted by it in sunshine, will,
when the hardy plant is rifted by the thunderbolt, cling
round it with its caressing tendrils, and bind up its
shattered
boughs; so is it beautifully ordered by Providence,
that woman, who is the mere dependant and ornament
of man in his happier hours, should be his stay and solace
when smitten with sudden calamity; winding herself into
the rugged recesses of his nature, tenderly supporting the
drooping head, and binding up the broken heart.
I was once congratulating a friend, who had around
him a blooming family, knit together in the strongest
affection
.
I can wish you no better lot, said he, with
enthusiasm, than to have a wife and children.If you
are prosperous, there they are to share your prosperity;
if otherwise, there they are to comfort you. And,
indeed
,
I have observed that a married man falling into
misfortune is more apt to retrieve his situation in the
world than a single one; partly because he is more
stimulated
to exertion by the necessities of the helpless and
beloved beings who depend upon him for subsistence; but
chiefly because his spirits are soothed and relieved by
domestic
endearments, and his self respect kept alive by
finding, that, though all abroad is darkness and
humiliation
,
yet there is still a little world of love at home, of
which he is the monarch. Whereas a single man is apt
to run to waste and self neglect; to fancy himself lonely
and abandoned, and his heart to fall to ruin like some
deserted mansion, for want of an inhabitant.
These observations call to mind a little domestic story,
of which I was once a witness. My intimate friend,
Leslie, had married a beautiful and accomplished girl,
who had been brought up in the midst of fashionable life.
She had, it is true, no fortune, but that of my friend was
ample; and he delighted in the anticipation of indulging
her in every elegant pursuit, and administering to those
delicate tastes and fancies that spread a kind of witchery
about the sex.Her life, said he, shall be like a fairy
tale.
The very difference in their characters produced an
harmonious combination: he was of a romantic and
somewhat
serious cast; she was all life and gladness. I have
often noticed the mute rapture with which he would
gaze upon her in company, of which her sprightly powers
made her the delight; and how, in the midst of applause,
her eye would still turn to him, as if there alone she
sought favour and acceptance. When leaning on his
arm, her slender form contrasted finely with his tall manly
person. The fond confiding air with which she looked
up to him seemed to call forth a flush of triumphant pride
and cherishing tenderness, as if he doted on his lovely
burthen for its very helplessness. Never did a couple set
forward on the flowery path of early and well-suited
marriage
with a fairer prospect of felicity.
It was the misfortune of my friend, however, to have
embarked his property in large speculations; and he had
not been married many months, when, by a succession
of sudden disasters, it was swept from him, and he found
himself reduced almost to penury. For a time he kept
his situation to himself, and went about with a haggard
countenance, and a breaking heart. His life was but a
protracted agony; and what rendered it more
insupportable
was the keeping up a smile in the presence of his
wife; for he could not bring himself to overwhelm her
with the news. She saw, however, with the quick eyes
of affection, that all was not well with him. She
marked
his altered looks and stifled sighs, and was not to be
deceived by his sickly and vapid attempts at cheerfulness.
She tasked all her sprightly powers and tender
blandishments
to win him back to happiness; but she only drove
the arrow deeper into his soul. The more he saw cause
to love her, the more torturing was the thought that he
was soon to make her wretched. A little while, thought he,
and the smile will vanish from that cheekthe song will
die away from those lipsthe lustre of those eyes will be
quenched with sorrow; and the happy heart, which now
beats lightly in that bosom, will be weighed down like
mine, by the cares and miseries of the world.
At length he came to me one day, and related his whole
situation in a tone of the deepest despair. When I heard
him through, I inquired, Does your wife know all this?
At the question he burst into an agony of tears. For
God's sake! cried he, if you have any pity on me,
don't mention my wife; it is the thought of her that
drives me almost to madness!
And why not? said I. She must know it sooner
or later: you cannot keep it long from her, and the
intelligence
may break upon her in a more startling
manner
than if imparted by yourself; for the accents of those
we love soften the harshest tidings. Besides you are
depriving yourself of the comforts of her sympathy;
and not merely that, but also endangering the only bond
that can keep hearts togetheran unreserved
community
of thought and feeling. She will soon perceive that
something is secretly preying upon your mind; and true
love will not brook reserve; it feels undervalued and
outraged, when even the sorrows of those it loves are
concealed from it.
Oh, but, my friend! to think what a blow I am to
give to all her future prospectshow I am to strike her
very soul to the earth, by telling her that her husband is
a beggar! that she is to forego all the elegancies of life
all the pleasures of societyto shrink with me into
indigence
and obscurity! To tell her that I have dragged
her down from the sphere in which she might have
continued
to move in constant brightnessthe light of every
eyethe admiration of every heart!how can she bear
poverty? she has been brought up in all the
refinement
of opulence- How can she bear neglect? she has
been the idol of society. Oh, it will break her heart
it will break her heart!
I saw his grief was eloquent, and I let it have its flow;
for sorrow relieves itself by words. When his paroxysm
had subsided, and he had relapsed into moody silence, I
resumed
the subject gently, and urged him to break his
situation
at once to his wife. He shook his head mournfully,
but positively.
But how are you to keep it from her? It is
necessary
she should know it, that you may take the steps
proper to the alteration of your circumstances. You
must change your style of livingnay, observing a
pang to pass across his countenance, don't let that afflict
you. I am sure you have never placed your happiness in
outward showyou have yet friends, warm friends, who
will not think the worse of you for being less splendidly
lodged; and surely it does not require a palace to be happy
with Mary
I could be happy with her, cried he, convulsively,
in a hovel!I could go down with her into poverty and
the dust!I couldI couldGod bless her!God bless
her! cried he, bursting into a transport of grief and
tenderness
.
And believe me, my friend, said I, stepping up, and
grasping him warmly by the hand, believe me she can
be the same with you. Ay, more: it will be a source of
pride and triumph to herit will call forth all the
latent
energies and fervent sympathies of her nature; for
she will rejoice to prove that she loves you for yourself.
There is in every true woman's heart a spark of heavenly
fire, which lies dormant in the broad daylight of
prosperity
;
but which kindles up, and beams and blazes in
the dark hour of adversity. No man knows what the
wife of his bosom isno man knows what a ministering
angel she isuntil he has gone with her through the
fiery trials of this world.
There was something in the earnestness of my manner,
and the figurative style of my language, that caught the
excited imagination of Leslie. I knew the auditor I had
to deal with; and following up the impression I had
made, I finished by persuading him to go home and
unburden
his sad heart to his wife.
I must confess, notwithstanding all I had said, I felt
some little solicitude for the result. Who can calculate
7*
on the fortitude of one whose whole life has been a round
of pleasures? Her gay spirits might revolt at the dark
downward path of low humility suddenly pointed out
before her, and might cling to the sunny regions in which
they had hitherto revelled. Besides, ruin in fashionable
life is accompanied by so many galling mortifications, to
which in other ranks it is a stranger.In short, I could
not meet Leslie the next morning without trepidation.
He had made the disclosure.
And how did she bear it?
Like an angel! It seemed rather to be a relief to
her mind, for she threw her arms round my neck, and
asked if this was all that had lately made me unhappy.
But, poor girl, added he, she cannot realize the change
we must undergo. She has no idea of poverty but in the
abstract; she has only read of it in poetry, where it is
allied to love. She feels as yet no privation; she suffers
no loss of accustomed conveniences nor elegancies. When
we come practically to experience its sordid cares, its
paltry wants, its petty humiliationsthen will be the
real trial.
But, said I, now that you have got over the
severest
task, that of breaking it to her, the sooner you let
the world into the secret the better. The disclosure may
be mortifying; but then it is a single misery, and soon
over: whereas you otherwise suffer it, in anticipation,
every hour in the day. It is not poverty so much as
pretence, that harasses a ruined manthe struggle
between
a proud mind and an empty pursethe keeping
up a hollow show that must soon come to an end. Have
the courage to appear poor, and you disarm poverty of its
sharpest sting. On this point I found Leslie perfectly
prepared. He had no false pride himself, and as to his
wife, she was only anxious to conform to their altered
fortunes.
Some days afterwards he called upon me in the
evening
.
He had disposed of his dwelling-house, and taken
a small cottage in the country, a few miles from town.
He had been busied all day in sending out furniture.
The new establishment required few articles, and those
of the simplest kind. All the splendid furniture of his
late residence had been sold, excepting his wife's harp.
That, he said, was too closely associated with the idea of
herself; it belonged to the little story of their loves: for
some of the sweetest moments of their courtship were
those when he had leaned over that instrument, and
listened
to the melting tones of her voice. I could not but
smile at this instance of romantic gallantry in a doting
husband.
He was now going out to the cottage, where his wife
had been all day superintending its arrangement. My
feelings had become strongly interested in the progress of
this family story, and, as it was a fine evening, I offered
to accompany him.
He was wearied with the fatigues of the day, and as
we walked out, fell into a fit of gloomy musing.
Poor Mary! at length broke, with a heavy sigh,
from his lips.
And what of her? asked I: has any thing
happened
to her?
What, said he, darting an impatient glance, is it
nothing to be reduced to this paltry situationto be caged
in a miserable cottageto be obliged to toil almost in the
menial concerns of her wretched habitation?
Has she then repined at the change?
Repined! she has been nothing but sweetness and
good humour. Indeed, she seems in better spirits than
I have ever known her; she has been to me all love, and
tenderness and comfort!
Admirable girl! exclaimed I. You call yourself
poor, my friend; you never were so richyou never knew
the boundless treasure of excellence you possessed in that
woman.
Oh! but, my friend, if this first meeting at the cottage
were over, I think I could then be comfortable. But this
is her first day of real experience; she has been
introduced
into a humble dwellingshe has been employed all
day in arranging its miserable equipmentsshe has, for
the first time, known the fatigues of domestic employment
she has, for the first time, looked round her on a home
destitute of every thing elegant,almost of every thing
convenient; and may now be sitting down, exhausted and
spiritless, brooding over a prospect of future poverty.
There was a degree of probability in this picture that
I could not gainsay, so we walked on in silence.
After turning from the main road up a narrow lane,
so thickly shaded with forest trees as to give it a complete
air of seclusion, we came in sight of the cottage. It was
humble enough in its appearance for the most pastoral
poet; and yet it had a pleasing rural look. A wild vine
had overrun one end with a profusion of foliage; a few
trees threw their branches gracefully over it; and I
observed
several pots of flowers tastefully disposed about the
door, and on the grass-plat in front. A small wicket gate
opened upon a footpath that wound through some
shrubbery
to the door. Just as we approached, we heard the
sound of musicLeslie grasped my arm; we paused and
listened. It was Mary's voice, singing, in a style of the
most touching simplicity, a little air of which her husband
was peculiarly fond.
I felt Leslie's hand tremble on my arm. He stepped
forward to hear more distinctly. His step made a noise
on the gravel walk. A bright beautiful face glanced out
at the window and vanisheda light footstep was heard
and Mary came tripping forth to meet us; she was in
a pretty rural dress of white; a few wild flowers were
twisted in her fine hair; a fresh bloom was on her cheek;
her whole countenance beamed with smilesI had never
seen her look so lovely.
My dear George, cried she, I am so glad you are
come! I have been watching and watching for you; and
running down the lane, and looking out for you. I've
set out a table under a beautiful tree behind the cottage;
and I've been gathering some of the most delicious
strawberries
,
for I know you are fond of themand we have
such excellent creamand we have every thing so sweet
and still hereOh! said she, putting her arm within his,
and looking up brightly in his face, Oh, we shall be so
happy!
Poor Leslie was overcomeHe caught her to his bosom
he folded his arms round herhe kissed her again and
againhe could not speak, but the tears gushed into his
eyes; and he has often assured me that though the world
has since gone prosperously with him, and his life has,
indeed, been a happy one, yet never has he experienced a
moment of more exquisite felicity.
TO ANTHONY EVERGREEN, Gent.
Sir,
As you appear to have taken to yourself the trouble of
meddling in the concerns of the beau-monde, I take the
liberty of appealing to you on a subject, which, though
considered merely as a very good joke, has occasioned me
great vexation and expense. You must know I pride
myself on being very useful to the ladies, that is, I take
boxes for them at the theatre, go shopping with them,
supply them with bouquets, and furnish them with novels
from the circulating library. In consequence of these
attentions I am become a great favourite, and there is
seldom a party going on in the city without my having
an invitation. The grievance I have to mention is the
exchange of hats which takes place on these occasions;
for, to speak my mind freely, there are certain young
gentlemen
who seem to consider fashionable parties as mere
places to barter old clothes: and I am informed, that a
number of them manage by this great system of exchange
to keep their crowns decently covered without their
hatters
suffering in the least by it.
It was but lately that I went to a private ball with a new
hat, and on returning in the latter part of the evening, and
asking for it, the scoundrel of a servant, with a broad grin,
informed me that the new hats had been dealt out half an
hour since, and they were then on the third quality; and I
was in the end obliged to borrow a young lady's beaver
rather than go home with any of the ragged remnants that
were left.
Now I would wish to know if there is no possibility
of having these offenders punished by law; and whether
it would not be advisable for ladies to mention in their
cards of invitation, as a postscript, Stealing hats and
shawls positively prohibited.At any rate, I would
thank you, Mr. Evergreen, to discountenance the thing
totally, by publishing in your paper, that stealing a hat is
no joke.
Your humble servant,
Walter Withers
.
Showing the nature of History in general; containing
furthermore
the universal Acquirements of William the
Testy, and how a Man may learn so much as to render
himself good for nothing.
When
the lofty Thucydides is about to enter on his
description
of the plague that desolated Athens, one of his
modern commentators
[6]
[6]
Smith's Thucyd. vol. I.
assures the reader, that his
history
is now going to be exceeding solemn, serious, and
pathetic; and hints, with that air of chuckling
gratulation
,
with which a good dame draws forth a choice
morsel
from a cupboard to regale a favourite, that this plague
will give his history a most agreeable variety.
In like manner did my heart leap within me, when I
came to the dolorous dilemma of Fort Good Hope, which
I at once perceived to be the forerunner of a series of
great events and entertaining disasters. Such are the
true subjects for the historic pen. For what is history in
fact, but a kind of Newgate Calendar, a register of the
crimes and miseries that man has inflicted on his fellow
men? It is a huge libel on human nature, to which we
industriously
add page after page, volume after volume, as
if we were building up a monument to the honour rather
then the infamy of our species. If we turn over the pages
of these chronicles that man has written of himself, what
are the characters dignified by the appellation of great, and
held up to the admiration of posterity?Tyrants, robbers,
conquerors, renowned only for the magnitude of their
misdeeds
and the stupendous wrongs and miseries they have
inflicted on mankindwarriors, who have hired
themselves
to the trade of blood, not from motives of virtuous
patriotism, or to protect the injured or defenceless, but
merely to gain the vaunted glory of being adroit and
successful
in massacring their fellow beings! What are the
great events that constitute a glorious era? The fall of
empires
the
desolation of happy countriessplendid cities
smoking in their ruinsthe proudest works of art tumbled
in the dustthe skrieks and groans of whole nations
ascending
unto heaven!
It is thus the historians may be said to thrive on the
miseries of mankindthey are like the birds of prey that
hover over the field of battle, to fatten on the mighty dead.
It was observed by a great projector of inland lock
navigation
,
that rivers, lakes, and oceans were only formed to
feed canals. In like manner I am tempted to believe, that
plots, conspiracies, wars, victories, and massacres are
ordained
by Providence only as food for the historian.
It is a source of great delight to the philosopher in
studying
the wonderful economy of nature, to trace the
mutual
dependencies of things, how they are created
reciprocally
for each other, and how the most noxious and
apparently unnecessary animal has it uses. Thus those
swarms of flies, which are so often execrated as useless
vermin, are created for the sustenance of spiders; and
spiders, on the other hand, are evidently made to devour
flies. So those heroes who have been such pests in the
world were bountcously provided as themes for the poet
and the historian, while the poet and historian were
destined
to record the achievements of heroes!
These and many similar reflections naturally arose in
my mind as I took up my pen to commence the reign of
William Kieft; for now the stream of our history, which
hitherto has rolled in a tranquil current, is about to
depart
for ever from its peaceful haunts, and brawl through
many a turbulent and rugged scene. Like some sleek ox,
which, having fed and fattened in a rich clover field, lies
sunk in luxurious repose, and will bear repeated taunts
and blows before it heaves its unwieldy limbs, and
clumsily
arouses from its slumbers; so the province of the
Nieuw Nederlandts, having long thriven and grown
corpulent
under the prosperous reign of the Doubter, was
reluctantly awakened to a melancholy conviction that, by
patient sufferance, its grievances had become so numerous
and aggravating, that it was preferable to repel than
endure
them. The reader will now witness the manner in
which a peaceful community advances toward a state of
war; which it is too apt to approach, as a horse does a
drum, with much prancing and parade, but with little
progress
,
and too often with the wrong end foremost.
Wilhelmus Kieft
, who, in 1634, ascended the
Gubernatorial
chair, (to borrow a favourite though clumsy
appellation
of modern phraseologists,) was in form, feature,
and character, the very reverse of Wouter Von Twiller,
his renowned predecessor. He was of very respectable
descent, his father being Inspector of Windmills in the
ancient town of Saardam; and our here, we are told,
made very curious investigations in the nature and
operations
of those machines when a boy, which is one reason
why he afterwards came to be so ingenious a governor.
His name, according to the most ingenious etymologists,
was a corruption of
Kyver
, that is to say, a
wrangler
or
scolder
, and expressed the hereditary disposition of his
family, which, for nearly two centuries, had kept the windy
town of Saardam in hot water, and produced more tartars
and brimstones, than any ten families in the place; and so
truly did Wilhelmus Kieft inherit this family endowment,
that he had scarcely been a year in the discharge of his
government, before he was universally known by the name
of
William The Testy
.
He was a brisk, waspish, little old gentleman, who had
dried and withered away, partly through the natural
process
of years, and partly from being parched and burned
up by his fiery soul, which blazed like a vehement
rushlight
in his bosom, constantly inciting him to most
valorous
broils, altercations, and misadventures. I have
heard it observed by a profound and philosophical judge
of human nature, that if a woman waxes fat as she grows
old, the tenure of her life is very precarious; but if
haply
she withers, she lives for ever: such likewise was the
case with William the Testy, who grew tougher in
proportion
as he dried. He was some such a little
Dutchman
as we may now and then see, stumping briskly about
the streets of our city, in a broad skirted coat, with
buttons
nearly as large as the shield of Ajax, an old-fashioned
cocked hat stuck on the back of his head, and a cane as
high as his chin. His visage was broad, but his features
sharp; his nose turned up with a most petulant curl; his
cheeks, like the regions of Terra del Fuego, were scorched
into a dusky reddoubtless, in consequence of the
neighbourhood
of two fierce little gray eyes, through which
his torrid soul beamed as fervently as a tropical sun
blazing
through a pair of burning glasses. The corners of
his mouth were curiously modelled into a kind of
fretwork
,
not a little resembling the wrinkled proboscis of an
irritable pug dog; in a word, he was one of the most
positive
,
restless, ugly little men that ever put himself in a
passion
about nothing.
Such were the personal endowments of William the
Testy; but it was the sterling riches of his mind that
raised him to dignity and power. In his youth he had
passed with great credit through a celebrated academy at
the Hague, noted for producing finished scholars with a
despatch unequalled, except by certain of our American
colleges, which seem to manufacture bachelors of arts by
some patent machine. Here he skirmished very smartly
on the frontiers of several of the sciences, and made so
gallant
an inroad on the dead languages, as to bring off
captive
a host of Greek nouns and Latin verbs, together with
divers pithy saws and apophthegms; all which he
constantly
paraded in conversation and writing, with as much
vain glory as would a triumphant general of yore display
the spoils of the countries he had ravished. He had
moreover
puzzled himself considerably with logic, in which he
had advanced so far as to attain a very familiar
acquaintance
,
by name at least, with the whole family of syllogisms
and dilemmas; but what he chiefly valued himself on was
his knowledge of metaphysics, in which having once upon
a time ventured too deeply, he came well nigh being
smothered in a slough of unintelligible learninga fearful
peril, from the effects of which he never perfectly
recovered
.
In plain words, like many other profound
intermeddlers
in his abstruse, bewildering science, he so
confused
his brain with abstract speculations which he could
not comprehend, and artificial distinctions which he could
not realize, that he could never think clearly on any
subject
,
however simple, through the whole course of his life
afterwards. This, I must confess, was in some measure
a misfortune, for he never engaged in argument, of which
he was exceeding fond, but what, between logical
deductions
and metaphysical jargon, he soon involved himself
and his subject in a fog of contradictions and perplexities,
and then would get into a mighty passion with his
adversary
,
for not being convinced gratis.
It is in knowledge as in swimming,he who
ostentatiously
sports and flounders on the surface makes more
noise and splashing, and attracts more attention than the
industrious pearl diver, who plunges in search of treasures
to the bottom. The universal acquirements of
William
Kieft were the subject of great marvel and
admiration
among his countrymen; he figured about at the
Hague with as much vain glory as does a profound Bonze
at Pekin, who has mastered half the letters of the Chinese
alphabet; and, in a word, was unanimously pronounced
a
universal genius!
I have known many universal
geniuses
in my time, though to speak my mind freely, I never
knew one, who, for the ordinary purposes of life, was
worth his wcight in straw; but for the purposes of
government
,
a little sound judgment, and plain common sense,
is worth all the sparkling genius that ever wrote poetry,
or invented theories.
Strange as it may sound, therefore, the
universal
acquirements
of the illustrious Wilhelmus were very much
in his way; and had he been less a learned man, it is
possible he would have been a much greater governor.
8
He was exceedingly fond of trying philosophical and
political
experiments: and having stuffed his head full of
scraps and remnants of ancient republics, and oligarchies,
and aristocracies, and monarchies, and the laws of Solon,
and Lycurgus, and Charondas, and the imaginary
commonwealth
of Plato, and the Pandects of Justinian, and
a thousand other fragments of venerable antiquity, he
was for ever bent upon introducing some one or other of
them into use; so that between one contradictory measure
and another, he entangled the government of the little
province of Nieuw Nederlandts in more knots, during
his administration, than half a dozen successors could have
untied.
No sooner had this bustling little man been blown by a
whiff of fortune into the seat of government, than he called
together his council, and delivered a very animated speech
on the affairs of the province. As every body knows
what a glorious opportunity a governor, a president, or
even an emperor has of drubbing his enemies in his
speeches
,
messages, and bulletins, where he has the talk all on
his own side, they may be sure the high-mettled William
Kieft did not suffer so favourable an occasion to escape
him, of evincing that gallantry of tongue common to all
able legislators. Before he commenced, it is recorded
that he took out his pocket handkerchief, and gave a very
sonorous blast of the nose, according to the usual custom
of great orators. This, in general, I believe, is intended
as a signal trumpet, to call the attention of the auditors;
but with William the Testy it boasted a more classic
cause, for he had read of the singular expedient of that
famous
demagogue Caius Gracchus, who, when he
harangued
the Roman populace, modulated his tones by an
oratorical flute or pitch-pipe.
This preparatory symphony being performed, he
commenced
by expressing an humble sense of his own want
of talents, his utter unworthiness of the honour conferred
upon him, and his humiliating incapacity to discharge
the important duties of his new station; in short, he
expressed
so contemptible an opinion of himself, that many
simple country members present, ignorant that these were
mere words of course, always used on such occasions,
were very uneasy, and even felt wrath that he should
accept an office for which he was consciously so
inadequate
.
He then proceeded in a manner highly classic,
profoundly
erudite, and nothing at all to the purpose; being
nothing more than a pompous account of all the
governments
of ancient Greece, and the wars of Rome and
Carthage, together with the rise and fall of sundry
outlandish
empires, about which the assembly knew no more
than their great grandchildren who were yet unborn.
Thus having, after the manner of your learned orators,
convinced the audience that he was a man of many words
and great erudition, he at length came to the less
important
part of his speech, the situation of the province; and
here he soon worked himself into a fearful rage against
the Yankees, whom he compared to the Gauls who
desolated
Rome, and the Goths and Vandals who overran
the fairest plains of Europenor did he forget to mention,
in terms of adequate opprobrium, the insolence with
which they had encroached upon the territories of New
Netherlands, and the unparalleled audacity with which
they had commenced the town of New Plymouth, and
planted the onion patches of Weathersfield under the very
walls of Fort Goed Hoop.
Having thus artfully wrought up his tale of terror to
a climax, he assumed a self-satisfied look, and declared,
with a nod of knowing import, that he had taken
measures
to put a final stop to these encroachmentsthat he
had been obliged to have recourse to a dreadful engine of
warfare, lately invented, awful in its effects, but
authorised
by direful necessity. In a word, he was resolved to
conquer the Yankeesby proclamation.
For this purpose he had prepared a tremendous
instrument
of the kind, ordering, commanding, and enjoining
the intruders aforesaid, forthwith to remove, depart, and
withdraw from the districts, regions, and territories
aforesaid
,
under the pain of suffering all the penalties,
forfeitures
,
and punishments, in such case made and provided,
&c. This proclamation, he assured them, would at once
exterminate the enemy from the face of the country; and
he pledged his valour as a governor, that within two
months after it was published, not one stone should
remain
on another in any of the towns which they had
built.
The council remained for some time silent after he had
finished; whether struck dumb with admiration at the
brilliancy of his project, or put to sleep by the length of
his harangue, the history of the times deth not mention.
Suffice it to say, they at length gave a general grunt of
acquiescence; the proclamation was immediately
despatched
with due ceremony, having the great seal of the
province
,
which was about the size of a buckwheat pancake,
attached to it by a broad red riband. Governor Keift,
having thus vented his indignation, felt greatly relieved
adjourned the council
sine die
put on his cocked hat
and corduroy small-clothes, and, mounting on a tall
raw-boned
charger, trotted out to his country seat, which was
situated in a sweet, sequestered swamp, now called Dutch
Street, but more commonly known by the name of Dog's
Misery.
Here, like the good Numa, he reposed from the toils
of legislation, taking lessons in Government, not from the
Nymph Ageria, but from the honoured wife of his
bosom
;
who was one of that peculiar kind of females, sent
upon earth a little before the flood, as a punishment for
the sins of mankind, and commonly known by the
appeallation
of
knowing women
. In fact, my duty as an historian
obliges me to make known a circumstance which was a
great secret at the time, and consequently was not a
subject
of scandal at more than half the tea-tables of
New-Amsterdam
,
but which, like many other great secrets. has
leaked out in the lapse of years; and this was, that the
great Wilhelmus the Testy, though one of the most
potent
little men that ever breathed, yet submitted at home
to a species of government, neither laid down in Aristotle
nor Plato; in short, it partook of the nature of a pure,
unmixed
tyranny, and is familiarly denominated
petticoat
government
. An absolute sway, which, though
exceedingly
common in these modern days, was very rare
among the ancients, if we may judge from the rout made
about the domestic economy of honest Socrates, which
is the only ancient case on record.
The great Kieft, however, warded off all the sneers
and sarcasms of his particular friends, who are ever
ready to joke with a man on sore points of the kind, by
alleging it was a government of his own election, to which
he submitted through choice; adding, at the same time, a
profound maxim which he had found in an ancient
author
,
that he who would aspire to
govern
, should first
learn to
obey
.
DIRK SCHUILER,
AND
THE VALIANT PETER.
This was one Dirk Schuiler (or Skulker,) a kind of
hanger-on to the garrison, who seemed to belong to
nobody
,
and in a manner to be self-outlawed. He was one
of those vagabond cosmopolites, who shark about the
world as if they had no right or business in it; and who
infest the skirts of society, like poachers and interlopers.
Every garrison and country village has one or more
scapegoats
of this kind, whose life is a kind of enigma, whose
existence is without motive, who comes from the Lord
knows where, who lives the Lord knows how, and seems
to be made for no other earthly purpose but to keep up
the ancient and honourable order of idleness. This
vagabond
philosopher was supposed to have some Indian
blood in his veins, which was manifested by a certain
Indian complexion and cast of countenance; but more
especially by his propensities and habits. He was a tall,
lank fellow, swift of foot, and long-winded. He was
generally equipped in a half Indian dress, with belt,
leggings, and moccasons. His hair hung in strait
gallows-locks
about his ears, and added not a little to his
sharking demeanour. It is an old remark, that persons
of Indian mixture are half civilized, half savage, and
half devil; a third half being expressly provided for their
particular convenience. It is for similar reasons, and
probably with equal truth, that the back-wood men of
Kentucky are styled half man, half horse, and half
alligator
by the settlers on the Mississippi, and held
accordingly
in great respect and abhorrence.
The above character may have presented itself to the
garrison as applicable to Dirk Schuiler whom they
familiarly
dubbed Gallows Dirk. Certain it is, he
acknowledged
allegiance to no onewas an utter enemy to work.
8 *
holding it in no manner of estimationbut lounged about
the fort, depending upon chance for a subsistence, getting
drunk whenever he could get liquor, and stealing
whatever
he could lay his hands on. Every day or two he
was sure to get a sound rib-roasting for some of his
misdemeanours
,
which, however, as it broke no bones, he
made very light of, and scrupled not to repeat the offence
whenever another opportunity presented. Sometimes, in
consequence of some flagrant villainy, he would abscond
from the garrison, and be absent for a month at a time;
skulking about the woods and swamps, with a long
fowling-piece
on his shoulder, laying in ambush for game, or
squatting himself down on the edge of a pond catching
fish for hours together, and bearing no little resemblance
to that notable bird ycleped the Mud-pole. When he
thought his crimes had been forgotten or forgiven, he
would sneak back to the fort with a bundle of skins, or a
bunch of poultry, which perchance he had stolen, and
would exhange them for liquor, with which, having well
soaked his carcass, he would lay in the sun and enjoy all
the luxurious indolence of that swinish philosopher
Diogenes
.
He was the terror of all the farm-yards in the
country, into which he made fearful inroads; and
sometimes
he would make his sudden appearance at the
garrison
at daybreak, with the whole neighbourhood at his
heels, like a scoundrel thief of a fox, detected in his
maraudings
,
and hunted to his hole. Such was this Dirk
Schuiler; and from the total indifference he showed to
this world or its concerns, and from his truly Indian
stoicism and taciturnity, no one would ever have dreamed
that he would have been the publisher of the treachery of
Risingh.
When the carousal was going on, which proved so fatal
to the brave Von Poffenburgh and his watchful garrison,
Dirk skulked about from room to room, being a kind of
privileged vagrant or useless hound, whom nobody
noticed
.
But though a fellow of few words, yet, like your
taciturn people, his eyes and ears were always open, and
in the course of his prowlings he overheard, the whole plot
of the Swedes. Dirk immediately settled in his own mind
how he should turn the matter to his own advantage.
He played the perfect jack-of-both-sides; that is to say,
he made a prize of every thing that came in his reach,
robbed both parties, stuck the copper-bound cocked hat
of the puissant Von Poffenburgh on his head, whipped a
huge pair of Risingh's jackboots under his arm. and took to
his heels just before the catastrophe and confusion at the
garrison.
Finding himself completely dislodged from his haunt
in this quarter, he directed his flight towards his native
place, New-Amsterdam, from whence he had formerly
been obliged to abscond precipitately, in consequence of
misfortune in business, that is to say, having been
detected
in the act of sheep-stealing. After wandering
many days in the woods, toiling through swamps,
fording
brooks, swimming various rivers, and encountering a
world of hardships that would have killed any other being
but an Indian, a back-wood man, or the devil; he at length
arrived, half-famished, and lank as a starved weasel at
Communipaw, where he stole a canoe, and paddled over
to New-Amsterdam. Immediately on landing, he
repaired
to Governor Stuyvesant, and in more words than
he had ever spoken before in the whole course of his life,
gave an account of the disastrous affair.
On receiving these direful tidings, the valiant Peter
started from his seat, as did the stout King Arthur when
at merry Carleile, the news was brought him of the
uncourteous misdeeds of the grim baronewithout
uttering a word, he dashed the pipe he was smoking
against the back of the chimney, thrust a prodigious quid
of negro-headed tobacco into his left cheek, pulled up his
galligaskins, and strode up and down the room, humming,
as was customary with him when in a passion, a hideous
north-west ditty. But, as I have before shown, he was
not a man to vent his spleen in idle vapouring. His first
measure after the paroxysm of wrath had subsided, was
to stump up stairs to a huge wooden chest, which served
as his armoury, from whence he drew forth that identical
suit of regimentals described in the preceding chapter.
In these portentous habiliments he arrayed himself, like
Achilles in the armour of Vulcan, and maintaining all the
while a most appalling silence, knitting his brows, and
drawing his breath through his clenched teeth. Being
hastily equipped, he strode down into the parlour, jerked
down his trusty sword from over the fire-place, where it
was usually suspended; but before he girded it on his
thigh he drew it from its scabbard, and as his eye coursed
along the rusty blade, a grim smile stole over his iron
visage. It was the first smile that had visited his
countenance
for five long weeks; but every one who beheld
it prophesied that there would soon be warm work in the
province!
Thus armed at all points, with grisly war depicted in
each feature, his very cocked hat assuming an air of
uncommon
defiance, he instantly put himself on the alert,
and despatched Anthony Van Corlear hither and thither.
this way and that way, through all the muddy streets and
crooked lanes of the city, summoning by sound of trumpet
his trusty peers to assemble in instant council. This done,
by way of expediting matters, according to the custom
of people in a hurry, he kept in continual bustle, shifting
from chair to chair, popping his head out of every
window
,
and stumping up and down stairs with his wooden
leg in such brisk and incessant motion, that, as we are
informed by an authentic historian of the times, the
continual
clatter bore no small resemblance to the music of
a cooper hooping a flour barrel.
Description of the powerful Army that assembled at the
City of New-Amsterdamtogether with the interview
between Peter the Headstrong and General Von
Poffenburgh
;
and Peter's Sentiments respecting
unfortunate
great Men.
While
thus the enterprising Peter was coasting, with
flowing sail, up the shores of the lordly Hudson, and
arousing
all the phlegmatic little Dutch settlements upon its
borders, a great and puissant concourse of warriors was
assembling at the city of New-Amsterdam. And here
that invaluable fragment of antiquity, the Stuyvesant
manuscript
,
is more than commonly particular; by which
means I am enabled to record the illustrious host that
encamped
itself on the public square, in front of the fort, at
present denominated the Bowling Green.
In the centre then was pitched the tents of the men of
battle of the Manhattoes; who, being the inmates of the
metropolis, composed the life-guards of the governor.
These were commanded by the valiant Stoffel
Brinker-hoof
,
who whilome had acquired such immortal fame at
Oyster Baythey displayed as a standard, a beaver
rampant
on a field of orange; being the arms of the province,
and denoting the persevering industry, and the
amphibious
origin of the Nederlanders.
[7]
[7]
This was likewise the great seal of the New-Netherlands, as
may still be seen in ancient records.
On their right hand might be seen the vassals of that
renowned Mynheer Michael Paw,
Besides what is related in the Stuyvesant MS. I have found
mention made of this illustrious patroon in another manuscript,
which says:De Heer (or the Squire) Michael Paw, a Dutch
subject, about 10th Aug. 1630, by deed purchased Staten Island.
N. B. The same Michael Paw had what the Dutch call a colonie at
Pavonia, on the Jersey shore, opposite New-York, and his
over-seer
,
in 1636, was named Corns. Van Vorsta person of the same
name, in 1769, owned Pawles Hook, and a large farm at
Pavonia
,
and is a lineal descendant from Van
Vorst.
who lorded it over
the fair regions of ancient Pavonia, and the lands away
south, even unto the Navesink mountains,
So called from the Navesink tribe of Indians, that inhabited
these partsat present they are erroneously denominated the
Neversink, or Neversunk mountains.
and was
moreover patroon of Gibbet-Island. His standard was
borne by his trusty squire, Cornelius Van Vorst;
consisting
of a huge oyster
recumbent
upon a sea green field,
being the armorial bearings of his favourite metropolis,
Communipaw. He brought to the camp a stout force of
warriors, heavily armed, being each clad in ten pair of
linsey woolsey breeches, and overshadowed by broad
brimmed beavers, with short pipes twisted in their
hatbands
.
These were the men who vegetated in the mud
along the shores of Pavonia; being of the race of
genuine
copperheads, and were fabled to have sprung from
oysters.
At a little distance was encamped the tribe of warriors
who came from the neighbourhood of Hell-Gate. These
were commanded by the Suy Dams, and the Van Dams,
incontinent hard swearers as their names betokenthey
were terrible looking fellows, clad in broad-skirted
gaberdines
,
of that curious coloured cloth called thunder and
lightning; and bore as a standard three devil's
darning-needles
,
volant
, in a flame coloured field.
Hard by was the tent of the men of battle from the
marshy borders of the Wael-bogtig,
i. e. The
Winding Bay
, named from the windings of its shores.
This has since been corrupted by the vulgar into the
Wallabout
, and
is the basin which shelters our infant navy.
and the country
thereaboutsthese were of a sour aspect, by reason that
they lived on crabs, which abound in these parts: they
were the first institutors of that honourable order of
knighthood, called
Fly market shirks;
and if tradition
speak true, did likewise introduce the far famed step in
dancing, called double trouble. They were commanded
by the fearless Jacobus Varra Vanger, and, had moreover,
a jolly band of Breukelen
[8]
[8]
Now spelt Brooklyn.
ferrymen, who performed a
brave concerto on conchshells.
But I refrain from pursuing this minute description
which goes on to describe the warriors of Bloemen-dael,
and Wee-hawk, and Hoboken, and sundry other places,
well known in history and songfor now does the sound
of martial music alarm the people of New-Amsterdam,
sounding afar from beyond the walls of the city. But this
alarm was in a little time relieved, for lo, from the midst
of a vast cloud of dust, they recognized the brimstone
coloured
breeches, and splendid silver leg of Peter
Stuyvesant
glaring in the sunbeams; and beheld him
approaching
at the head of a formidable army, which he had
mustered
along the banks of the Hudson. And here the
excellent but anonymous writer of the Stuyvesant
manuscript
breaks out into a brave but glorious description of
the forces, as they defiled through the principal gate of the
city that stood by the head of Wall-street.
First of all came the Van Bummels, who inhabit the
pleasant borders of the Bronx. These were short fat men,
wearing exceeding large trunk breeches, and are
renowned
for feats of the trencher: they were the first inventors
of suppawn, or mush and milk.Close in their rear
marched the Van Vlotans, of Kaats Kill, most horrible
quaffers of new cider, and arrant braggarts in their liquor.
After them came the Van Pelts, of Groodt Esopus,
dexterous horsemen, mounted upon goodly switch-tailed
steeds of the Esopus breed: these were mighty hunters
of minks and musk rats, whence came the word
Peltry
.
Then the Van Nests of Kinderhoek, valiant robbers of
birds' nests, as their name denotes: to these, if the report
may be believed, are we indebted for the invention of
slapjacks
,
or buckwheat cakes.Then the Van
Higginbottoms
,
of Wapping's Creek: these came armed with ferules
and birchen rods, being a race of schoolmasters, who first
discovered the marvellous sympathy between the seat of
honour and the seat of intellect, and that the shortest way
to get knowledge into the head was to hammer it into the
bottom.Then the Van Grolls of Anthony's Nose, who
carried their liquor in fair round little pottles, by reason
they could not bouse it out of their canteens, having such
rare long noses.Then the Gardeniers, of Hudson and
thereabouts, distinguished by many triumphant feats, such
as robbing watermelon patches, smoking rabbits out of
their holes, and the like, and by being great lovers of
roasted pig's tails: these were the ancestors of the
renowned
congressman of that name.Then the Van
Hoesen's of Sing-Song, great choristers and players upon
the Jew's-harp: these marched two and two, singing the
great song of St. Nicholas.Then the Couenhovens, of
Sleepy Hollow: these gave birth to a jolly race of
publicans
,
who first discovered the magic art of conjuring a
quart of wine into a pint bottle.Then the Van
Kortlandts
,
who lived on the wild banks of the Croton, and
were great killers of wild ducks, being much spoken of
for their skill in shooting with the long bow.Then the
Van Bunschotens, of Nyock and Kakiat, who were the
first that did ever kick with the left foot; they were
gallant
bush-whackers, and hunters of racoons, by moonlight.
Then the Van Winkles of Haerlem, potent suckers of
eggs, and noted for running of horses, and running up of
scores at taverns: they were the first that ever winked
with both eyes at once.Lastly, came the
Knickerbockers
,
of the great town of Schahtikoke, where the folk
lay stones upon the houses in windy weather, lest they
should be blown away. These derive their name, as some
say, from
Kniker
, to shake, and
Becker
, a goblet, indicating
thereby that they were sturdy tosspots of yore; but, in
truth, it was derived from
Knicker
, to nod, and
Boeken
,
books, plainly meaning that they were great nodders or
dozers over books: from them did descend the writer of
this history.
Such was the legion of sturdy bush-beaters, that poured
in at the grand gate of New-Amsterdam. The Stuyvesant
manuscript, indeed, speaks of many more, whose names I
omit to mention, seeing that it behoves me to hasten to
matters of greater moment. Nothing could surpass the
joy and martial pride of the lion-hearted Peter, as he
reviewed this mighty host of warriors; and he
determined
no longer to defer the gratification of his much
wished-for revenge, upon the scoundrel Swedes at Fort
Casimir.
But before I hasten to record those unmatchable events
which will be found in the sequel of this faithful history,
let me pause to notice the fate of Jacobus Von
Poffenburgh
,
the discomfitted commander-in-chief of the armies
of the New-Netherlands. Such is the inherent
uncharitableness
of human nature, that scarcely did the news
become public, of his deplorable discomfiture at Fort
Casimir than a thousand scurvy rumours were set afloat
in New-Amsterdam; wherein it was insinuated, that he
had in reality a treacherous understanding with the
Swedish
commander; that he had long been in the practice of
privately communicating with the Swedes; together with
divers hints about secret service money,to all which
deadly charges I do not give a jot more credit than I think
they deserve.
Certain it is, that the general vindicated his character
by the most vehement oaths and protestations, and put
every man out of the ranks of honour who dared to doubt
his integrity. Moreover, on returning to
New-Amsterdam
,
he paraded up and down the streets with a crew of
hard swearers at his heels,sturdy bottle companions,
whom he gorged and fattened, and who were ready to
bolster him through all the courts of justice,heroes of
his own kidney, fierce whiskered, broad shouldered,
colbrand
looking swaggerers, not one of whom but looked as
though he could eat up an ox, and pick his teeth with the
horns. These life-guard men quarrelled all his quarrels,
were ready to fight all his battles, and scowled at every
man that turned up his nose to the general, as though they
would devour him alive. Their conversation was
interspersed
with oaths like minute guns, and every bombastic
rhodomontado was rounded off by a thundering
execration
like a patriotic toast honoured with a discharge of
artillery.
All these valorous vapourings had a considerable effect
in convincing certain profound sages, many of whom
began
to think the general a hero of unutterable loftiness
and magnanimity of soul, particularly as he was
continually
protesting
on the honour of a soldier
,a
marvellously
high sounding asseveration. Nay, one of the
members
of the council went so far as to propose they should
immortalize
him by an imperishable statue of plaster of Paris.
But the vigilant Peter the Headstrong was not thus to
be deceived. Sending privately for the
commander-in-chief
of all the armies, and having heard all his story,
garnished with the customary pious oaths, protestations,
and ejaculationsHarkee, comrade, cried he, though
by your own account you are the most brave, upright,
and honourable man in the whole province, yet do you lie
under the misfortune of being damnably traduced and
immeasurably despised. Now though it is certainly hard
to punish a man for his misfortunes, and though it is very
possible you are totally innocent of the crimes laid to your
charge; yet as heaven, at present, doubtless for some wise
purpose, sees fit to withhold all proofs of your innocence,
far be it from me to counteract its sovereign will.
Beside
,
I cannot consent to venture my armies with a
commander
whom they despise, or to trust the welfare of my
people to a champion whom they distrust. Retire,
therefore, my friend, from the irksome toils and cares
of public life, with this comforting reflectionthat if
you be guilty, you are but enjoying your just reward
and if innocent, that you are not the first great and
good man, who has most wrongfully been slandered and
maltreated in this wicked worlddoubtless to be
better
treated in a better world, where there shall neither
be error, calumny, nor persecution. In the mean time
let me never see your face again, for I have a horrid
antipathy to the countenances of unfortunate great men
like yourself.
Of Peter Stuyvesant's expedition into the East Country;
showing that, though an old Bird, he did not understand
Trap.
Great
nations resemble great men in this particular,
that their greatness is seldom known until they get in
trouble; adversity, therefore, has been wisely
denominated
the ordeal of true greatness, which, like gold, can
never receive its real estimation until it has passed through
the furnace. In proportion, therefore, as a nation, a
community
,
or an individual (possessing the inherent quality
of greatness) is involved in perils and misfortunes, in
proportion
does it rise in grandeurand even when sinking
under calamity, makes, like a house on fire, a more
glotious
9
display than ever it did, in the fairest period of its
prosperity.
The vast empire of China, though teeming with
population
,
and imbibing and concentrating the wealth of
nations
,
has vegetated through a succession of drowsy ages;
and were it not for its internal revolution, and the
subversion
of its ancient government by the Tartars, might
have presented nothing but an uninteresting detail of dull,
monotonous prosperity. Pompeii and Herculaneum
might have passed into oblivion, with a herd of their
contemporaries
,
had they not been fortunately overwhelmed
by a volcano. The renowned city of Troy has acquired
celebrity only from its ten years' distress and final
conflagration
;
Paris rises in importance by the plots and
massacres which have ended in the exaltation of the
illustrious
Napoleon; and even the mighty London itself
has skulked through the records of time, celebrated for
nothing of moment, excepting the plague, the great fire,
and Guy Faux's gunpowder plot! Thus cities and
empires
seem to creep along, enlarging in silent obscurity
under the pen of the historian, until at length they burst
forth in some tremendous calamity, and snatch, as it
were, immortality from the explosion!
The above principle being admitted, my reader will
plainly perceive that the city of New-Amsterdam and its
dependent province are on the high road to greatness.
Dangers and hostilities threaten from every side, and it
is really a matter of astonishment to me, how so small a
state has been able, in so short a time, to entangle itself in
so many difficulties. Ever since the province was first
taken by the nose, at the Fort of Good Hope, in the
tranquil
days of Wouter Van Twiller, has it been gradually
increasing in historic importance; and never could it have
had a more appropriate chieftain to conduct it to the
pinnacle
of grandeur than Peter Stuyvesant.
In the fiery heart of this iron-headed old warrior sat
enthroned
all those five kinds of courage described by
Aristotle
;
and had the philosopher mentioned five hundred
more to the back of them, I verily believe, he would have
been found master of them all. The only misfortune was,
that he was deficient in the better part of valour called
discretion
,
a cold-blooded virtue which could not exist in the
tropical climate of his mighty soul. Hence it was, he was
continually hurrying into those unheard-of enterprises that
gave an air of chivalric romance to all his history; and
and hence it was, that he now conceived a project worthy
of the hero of La Mancha himself.
This was no other than to repair in person to the great
council of the Amphyctions, bearing the sword in one
hand, and the olive branch in the other; to require
immediate
reparation for the innumerable violations of that
treaty, which, in an evil hour, he had formed; to put a
stop to those repeated maraudings on the eastern borders;
or else to throw the gauntlet, and appeal to arms for
satisfaction
.
On declaring this resolution in his privy council, the
venerable members were seized with vast astonishment:
for once in their lives they ventured to remonstrate,
setting
forth the rashness of exposing his sacred person in
the midst of a strange and barbarous people, with sundry
other weighty remonstrancesall which had about as
much influence upon the determination of the headstrong
Peter, as though you were to endeavour to turn a rusty
weathercock with a broken-winded bellows.
Summoning therefore, to his presence his trusty
follower
,
Anthony Van Corlear, he commanded him to hold
himself in readiness to accompany him the following
morning
on this his hazardous enterprise. Now Anthony, the
trumpeter, was a little stricken in years, yet by dint of
keeping up a good heart, and having never known care or
sorrow (having never been married), he was still a hearty,
jocund, rubicund, gamesome wag, and of great capacity
in the doublet. This last was ascribed to his living a
jolly life on those domains at the Hook, which Peter
Stuyvesant had granted to him for his gallantry at Fort
Casimir.
Be this as it may, there was nothing that more
delighted
Anthony than this command of the great Peter; for he
could have followed the stout-hearted old governor to the
world's end, with love and loyalty: and he moreover still
remembered the frolicking, and dancing, and bundling,
and other disports of the east country; and entertained
dainty recollection of numerous kind and buxon lasses,
whom he longed exceedingly again to encounter.
Thus, then, did this mirror of hardihood set forth, with
no other attendant but his trumpeter, upon one of the most
perilous enterprises ever recorded in the annals of
knight-errantry
.
For a single warrior to venture openly among
a whole nation of foes; but, above all, for a plain,
downright
Dutchman to think of negotiating with the whole
council of New-Englandnever was there known a more
desperate undertaking! Ever since I have entered upon
the chronicles of this peerless, but hitherto uncelebrated
chieftain, has he kept me in a state of incessant action
and anxiety with the toils and dangers he is constantly
encountering. Oh! for a chapter of the tranquil reign of
Wouter Van Twiller, that I might repose on it as on a
feather bed!
Is it not enough, Peter Stuyvesant, that I have once
already
rescued thee from the machinations of these terrible
Amphyctions, by bringing the whole powers of witchcraft
to thine aid?is it not enough, that I have followed thee
undaunted, like a guardian spirit, into the misdst of the
horrid battle of Fort Christina? That I have been put
incessantly to my trumps to keep thee safe and sound
now warding off with my single pen the shower of dastard
blows that fell upon thy rearnow narrowly shielding
thee from a deadly thrust, by a mere tobacco-boxnow
casing thy dauntless skull with adamant, when even thy
stubborn ram-beaver failed to resist the sword of the stout
Risinghand now, not merely bringing thee off alive, but
triumphant, from the clutches of the gigantic Swede, by
the desperate means of a paltry stone pottle?Is not all
this enough, but must thou still be plunging into new
difficulties
,
and jeopardizing in headlong enterprises thyself,
thy trumpeter, and thy historian?
And now the ruddy faced Aurora, like a buxom
chambermaid
,
draws aside the sable curtains of the night, and
out bounces from his bed the jolly red haired Phbus,
startled at being caught so late in the embraces of Dame
Thetis. With many a stable oath, he harnesses his
brazen-footed
steeds, and whips and lashes, and splashes up
the firmament, like a loitering post-boy, half an hour
behind
his time. And now behold that imp of fame and
prowess, the headstrong Peter, bestriding a raw-boned,
switch-tailed charger, gallantly arrayed in full regimentals,
and bracing on his thigh that trusty brass-hilted sword,
which had wrought such fearful deeds on the banks of
the Delaware.
Behold, hard after him, his doughty trumpeter, Van
Corlear, mounted on a broken-winded, wall-eyed, calico
mare; his stone pottle which had laid low the mighty
Risingh, slung under his arm, and his trumpet displayed
vauntingly in his right hand, decorated with a gorgeous
banner, on which is emblazoned the great beaver of the
Manhattoes. See him proudly issuing out of the city
gate, like an iron-clad hero of yore, with his faithful squire
at his heels, the populace following them with their eyes,
and shouting many a parting wish, and hearty cheering.
Farewell, Hard-koppig Piet! Farewell, honest
Anthony
!Pleasant
be your wayfaringprosperous your
return! The stoutest hero that ever drew a sword, and
the worthiest trumpeter that ever trod shoe leather.
Legends are lamentably silent about the events that
befell our adventurers, in this their adventurous travel,
excepting the Stuyvesant manuscript, which gives the
substance of a pleasant little heroic poem, written on the
occasion by Domini gidus Luyck,
[9]
[9]
This Luyck was, moreover, rector of the Latin school in
Nieuw-Nederlands
,
1663. There are two pieces of gidius Luyck in D.
Selyn's MSS. of poesies, upon his marriage with Judith Isendoorn.
Old MS.
who appears to
have been the poet-laureate of New-Amsterdam. This
inestimable manuscript assures us, that it was a rare
spectacle
to behold the great Peter, and his loyal follower,
hailing
the morning sun, and rejoicing in the clear
countenance
of nature, as they pranced it through the pastoral
scenes of Bloomen Dael;
Now called Blooming Dale, about four miles
from New-York.
which, in those days, was a
wild flower, refreshed by many a pure streamlet, and
enlivened
here and there by a delectable little Dutch cottage,
sheltering under some sloping hill, and almost buried in
embowering trees.
Now did they enter upon the confines of Connecticut,
where they encountered many grievous difficulties and
perils
.
At one place they were assailed by a troop of
country
squires and militia colonels, who, mounted on goodly
steeds, hung upon their rear for several miles, harassing
them exceedingly with guesses and questions, more
especially
the worthy Peter, whose silver chased leg excited
not a little marvel. At another place, hard by the
renowned
town of Stamford, they were set upon by a great
and mighty legion of church deacons, who imperiously
demanded of them five shillings for travelling on Sunday,
and threatened to carry them captive to a neighbouring
church, whose steeple peered above the trees: but these
the valiant Peter put to rout with little difficulty,
insomuch
that they bestrode their canes and gallopped off in
horrible confusion, leaving their cocked hats behind in the
9*
hurry of their flight. But not so easily did he escape from
the hands of a crafty man of Pyquag; who, with
undaunted
perseverance, and repeated onsets, fairly bargained
him out of his goodly switched-tailed charger, leaving him
in place thereof a villanous, spavined, foundered
Narraganset
pacer.
But, maugre all these hardships, they pursued their
journey cheerily along the courses of the soft flowing
Connecticut
,
whose gentle waves, says the song, roll through
many a fertile vale and sunny plain; now reflecting the
lofty spires of the bustling city, and now the rural
beauties
of the humble hamlet; now echoing with the busy
hum of commerce, and now with the cheerful song of the
peasant.
At every town would Peter Stuyvesant, who was noted
for warlike punctilio, order the sturdy Anthony to sound a
courteous salutation; though the manuscript observes, that
the inhabitants were thrown in great dismay when they
heard of his approach. For the fame of his incomparable
achievements on the Delaware, had spread throughout
the east country, and they dreaded lest he had come to
take vengeance on their manifold transgressions.
But the good Peter rode through these towns with a
smiling aspect; waving his hand with inexpressible
majesty
and condescension; for he verily believed that the
old clothes which these ingenious people had thrust into
their broken-windows, and the festoons of dried apples
and peaches which ornamented the front of their houses,
were so many decorations in honour of his approach;
as it was the custom in the days of chivalry to compliment
renowned heroes, by sumptuous displays of tapestry and
gorgeous furniture. The women crowded to the doors to
gaze upon him as he passed, so much does prowess in arms
delight the gentle sex. The little children too ran after
him in troops, staring with wonder at his regimentals, his
brimstone breeches, and silver garniture of his wooden
leg. Nor must I omit to mention the joy which many
strapping wenches betrayed, at beholding the jovial Van
Corlear, who had whilome delighted them so much with
his trumpet, when he bore the great Peter's challenge to
the Amphyctions. The kind-hearted Anthony alighted
from his calico mare, and kissed them all with infinite
loving kindnessand was right pleased to see a crew of
little trumpeters crowding around him for his blessing;
each of whom he patted on the head, bade him be a good
boy, and gave him a penny to buy molasses candy.
The Stuyvesant manuscript makes but little further
mention of the governor's adventures upon this expedition,
excepting that he was received with extravagant courtesy
and respect by the great council of the Amphyctions, who
almost talked him to death with complimentary and
congratulatory
harangues. I will not detain my readers by
dwelling on his negotiations with the grand council.
Suffice it to mention, it was like all other negotiationsa
great deal was said, and very little done: one conversation
led to anotherone conference begat misunderstandings
which it took a dozen conferences to explain; at the end
of which the parties found themselves just where they
were at first; excepting that they had entangled themselves
in a host of questions of etiquette, and conceived a cordial
distrust of each other, that rendered their future
negotiations
ten times more difficult than ever.
[10]
[10]
For certain of the particulars of this ancient negotiation, see
Haz. Col. State Pap. It is singular that Smith is entirely silent with
respect to this memorable expedition of Peter Stuyvesant.
In the midst of all these perplexities, which bewildered
the brain and incensed the ire of the sturdy Peter, who
was, perhaps, of all men in the world, least fitted for
diplomatic
wiles, he privately received the first intimation of
the dark conspiracy which had been matured in the
Cabinet
of England. To this was added the astounding
intelligence that a hostile squadron had already sailed
from England, destined to reduce the province of
New-Netherlands
,
and that the grand council of Amphyctions
had engaged to co-operate, by sending a great army to
invade
New-Amsterdam by land!
Unfortunate Peter! did I not enter with sad
forebodings
upon this ill-starred expedition? Did I not tremble
when I saw thee with no other counsellor but thine own
headwith no other armour but an honest tongue, a
spotless conscience, and a rusty swordwith no other
protector but St. Nicholasand no other attendant but a
trumpeter? Did I not tremble when I beheld thee thus
sally forth to contend with all the knowing powers of
New-England?
Oh how did the sturdy old warrior rage and roar, when
he found himself thus intrapped, like a lion in the
hunter's
toil! Now did he determine to draw his trusty
sword, and manfully to fight his way through all the
countries of the east. Now did he resolve to break in
upon the council of the Amphyctions, and put every
mother's son of them to death. At length, as his direful
wrath subsided, he resorted to safer though less glorious
expedients.
Concealing from the council his knowledge of their
machinations, he privately despatched a trusty messenger
with missives to his counsellors at New-Amsterdam,
apprising
them of the impending danger, commanding them
immediately to put the city in a posture of defence, while
in the mean time he would endeavour to elude his enemies
and come to their assistance. This done, he felt himself
marvellously relieved, rose slowly, shook himself like a
rhinoceros, and issued forth from his den, in much the
same manner as Giant Despair is described to have issued
from Doubting Castle, in the chivalric history of the
Pilgrim's Progress.
And how much does it grieve me that I must leave the
gallant Peter in this imminent jeopardy: but it behoves
us to hurry back and see what is going on at
New-Amsterdam
,
for greatly do I fear that city is already in a
turmoil
.
Such was ever the fate of Peter Stuyvesant; while
doing one thing with heart and soul, he was too apt to
leave every thing else at sixes and sevens. While, like a
potentate of yore, he was absent attending to those things
in person, which in modern days are trusted to generals
and ambassadors, his little territory at home was sure to
get in an uproarall which was owing to that uncommon
strength of intellect, which induced him to trust to nobody
but himself, and which had acquired him the renowned
appellation of Peter the Headstrong.
How the People of New-Amsterdam were thrown into a
great Panic by the News of a threatened Invasion: and
the Manner in which they fortified themselves.
There
is no sight more truly interesting to a
philosopher
than to contemplate a community where every
individual
has a voice in public affairs, where every individual
thinks himself the Atlas of the nation, and where every
individual thinks it is duty to bestir himself for the good
of his country.I say, there is nothing more interesting
to a philosopher than to see such a community in a
sudden
bustle of war. Such a clamour of tongues, such a
bawling of patriotism, such running hither and thither,
every body in a hurry, every body up to the ears in trouble,
every body in the way, and every body interrupting his
industrious neighbour, who is busily employed in doing
nothing! It is like witnessing a great fire, where every
man is at work like a hero; some dragging about empty
engines! others scampering with full buckets, and spilling
the contents into the boots of their neighbour; and others
ringing the church bells at night, by way of putting out
the fire. Little firemen, like sturdy little knights
storming
a breach, clambering up and down scaling-ladders,
and bawling through tin trumpets, by way of directing the
attack. Here one busy fellow, in his great zeal to save
the property of the unfortunate, catches up an anonymous
chamber utensil, and gallants it off with an air of as much
self-importance, as if he had rescued a pot of money;
another throws looking glasses and china out of the
window
,
to save them from the flames; while those, who can
do nothing else to assist the great calamity, run up and
down the streets with open throats, keeping up an
incessant
cry of
Fire! Fire! Fire!
When the news arrived at Sinope, says the grave
and profound Lucian, though I own the story is rather
trite, that Philip was about to attack them, the
inhabitants
were thrown into violent alarm. Some ran to
furbish
up their arms; others rolled stones to build up the
walls; every body, in short, was employed, and every
body was in the way of his neighbour. Diogenes alone
was the only man who could find nothing to do;
whereupon
,
determining not to be idle when the welfare of his
country was at stake, he tucked up his robe, and fell to
rolling his tub with might and main, up and down the
Gymnasium. In like manner did every mother's son,
in the patriotic community of New-Amsterdam, on
receiving
the missives of Peter Stuyvesant, busy himself
most mightily in putting things into confusion, and
assisting
the general uproar. Every man, saith the
Stuyvesant
manuscript, flew to arms! By which is meant,
that not one of our honest Dutch citizens would venture
to church or to market, without an old fashioned spit of
a sword dangling at his side, and a long Dutch
fowling-piece
on his shoulder; nor would he go out of a night
without a lantern! nor turn a corner without first
peeping
cautiously round, lest he should come unawares upon
a British army; and we are informed, that Stoffel
Brinkerhoff
,
who was considered by the old women almost as
brave a man as the governor himself, actually had two
one-pound swivels mounted in his entry, one pointing out
at the front door and the other at the back.
But the most strenuous measure resorted to on this
awful occasion, and one which has since been found of
wonderful efficacy, was to assemble popular meetings.
These brawling convocations, I have already shown, were
extremely offensive to Peter Stuyvesant; but as this was
a moment of unusual agitation, and as the old governor
was not present to repress them, they broke out with
intolerable
violence. Hither, therefore, the orators and
politicians
repaired, and there seemed to be a competition
among them who should bawl the loudest, and exceed the
others in hyperbolical bursts of patriotism, and in
resolutions
to uphold and defend the government. In these sage
and all powerful meetings it was determined,
nem. con.
that
they were the most enlightened, the most dignified, the
most formidable, and the most ancient community upon
the face of the earth. Finding that this resolution was so
universally and readily carried, another was immediately
proposed,Whether it were not possible and politic to
exterminate
Great Britain? Upon which sixty-nine
members
spoke most eloquently in the affirmative, and only
one arose to suggest some doubts, who, as a punishment
for his treasonable presumption, was immediately seized
by the mob, and tarred and feathered; which punishment
being equivalent to the Tarpeian Rock, he was
afterwards
considered as an outcast from society, and his
opinion went for nothing. The question, therefore, being
unanimously carried in the affirmative, it was
recommended
to the grand council to pass it into a law, which was
accordingly done; by this measure the hearts of the
people
at large were wonderfully encouraged, and they waxed
exceedingly choleric and valorous. Indeed, the first
paroxysm of alarm having in some measure subsided, the
old women having buried all the money they could lay
their hands on, and their husbands daily getting fuddled
with what was leftthe community began even to stand on
the offensive. Songs were manufactured in low Dutch,
and sung about the streets, wherein the English were most
wofully beaten, and shown no quarter; and popular
addresses
were made, wherein it was proved to a certainty,
that the fate of Old England depended upon the will of
the New-Amsterdammers.
Finally, to strike a violent blow at the very vitals of
Great Britain, a multitude of the wiser inhabitants
assembled
,
and having purchased all the British manufactures
they could find, they made thereof a huge bonfire; and,
in the patriotic glow of the moment, every man present,
who had a hat or breeches of English workmanship,
pulled
it off, and threw it most undauntedly into the flames
to the irreparable detriment, loss, and ruin of the
English
manufacturers. In commemoration of this great
exploit, they erected a pole on the spot, with a device
on the top intended to represent the province of Nieuw
Nederlandts, destroying Great Britain, under the
similitude
of an Eagle picking the little Island of Old England
out of the globe; but either through the unskillfulness of
the sculptor, or his ill timed waggery, it bore a striking
resemblance to a goose vainly striving to get hold of a
dumpling.
In which the Troubles of New-Amsterdam appear to
thicken
Showing
the bravery, in Time of Peril, of a
People
who defend themselves by Resolutions.
Like
as an assemblage of politic cats, engaged in
clamorous
gibberings and catterwaulings, eyeing one another
with hideous grimaces, spitting in each other's faces, and
on the point of breaking forth into a general
clapper-clawing
,
are suddenly put to scampering, rout, and
confusion
,
by the startling appearance of a house-dogso
was the no less vociferous council of New-Amsterdam
amazed, astounded, and totally dispersed, by the sudden
arrival of the enemy. Every member made the best of
his way home, waddling along as fast as his short legs
could fag under their heavy burthen, and wheezing as he
went with corpulency and terror. When he arrived at
his castle, he barricadoed the street door, and buried
himself
in the cider cellar, without daring to peep out, lest
he should have his head carried off by a cannon ball.
The sovereign people all crowded into the
market-place
,
herding together with the instinct of sheep, who
seek for safety in each other's company, when the shepherd
and his dog are absent, and the wolf is prowling round
the fold. Far from finding relief, however, they only
increased each other's terrors. Each man looked
ruefully
in his neighbour's face, in search of encouragement,
but only found, in its wo-begone lineaments, a
confirmation
of his own dismay. Not a word now was to
be heard of conquering Great Britain, not a whisper
about the sovereign virtues of economywhile the old
women heightened the general gloom, by clamorously
bewailing their fate, and incessantly calling for
protection
on St. Nicholas and Peter Stuyvesant.
Oh, how did they bewail the absence of the lion-hearted
Peter!and how did they long for the comforting
presence
of Anthony Van Corlear! Indeed, a gloomy
uncertainty
hung over the fate of these adventurous heroes.
Day after day had elapsed since the alarming message
from the governor, without bringing any further tidings
of his safety. Many a fearful conjecture was hazarded
as to what had befallen him and his loyal squire. Had
they not been devoured alive by the cannibals of
Marble-head
and Cape Cod? Were they not put to the question
by the great council of Amphyctions? Were they not
smothered in onions by the terrible men of Pyquag? In
the midst of this consternation and perplexity, when
horror, like a mighty night-mare, sat brooding upon the
little, fat, plethoric city of New-Amsterdam, the ears of
the multitude were suddenly startled by a strange and
distant soundit approachedit grew louder and louder
and now it resounded at the city gate. The public
could not be mistaken in the well known sound. A
shout of joy burst from their lips, as the gallant Peter,
covered with dust, and followed by his faithful trumpeter,
came galloping into the market-place.
The first transports of the populace having subsided,
they gathered round the honest Anthony, as he
dismounted
from his horse, overwhelming him with
greetings
and congratulations. In breathless accents he
related to them the marvellous adventures through which
the old governor and himself had gone, in making their
escape from the clutches of the terrible Amphyctions.
But though the Stuyvesant manuscript, with its
customary
minuteness where any thing touching the great
Peter is concerned, is very particular as to the incidents
of this masterly retreat, yet the particular state of the
public affairs will not allow me to indulge in a full
recital thereof. Let it suffice to say, that, while Peter
Stuyvesant was anxiously revolving in his mind how he
could make good his escape with honour and dignity,
certain of the ships sent out for the conquest of the
Manhattoes touched at the eastern ports, to obtain
needful
supplies, and to call on the grand council of the
league for its promised co-operation. Upon hearing of
this, the vigilant Peter perceiving that a moment's delay
were fatal, made a secret and precipitate decampment;
though much did it grieve his lofty soul, to be obliged to
turn his back even upon a nation of foes. Many
hair-breadth
'scapes and divers perilous mishaps did they
sustain
,
as they scoured, without sound of trumpet, through
the fair regions of the east. Already was the country in
an uproar with hostile preparation, and they were obliged
to take a large circuit in their flight, lurking along,
through the woody mountains of the Devil's Backbone;
from whence the valiant Peter sallied forth one day, like
a lion, and put to rout a whole legion of squatters,
consisting
of three generations of a prolific family, who were
already on their way to take possession of some corner of
the New Netherlands. Nay, the faithful Anthony had
great difficulty at sundry times to prevent him, in the
excess of his wrath, from descending down from the
mountains, and falling sword in hand upon certain of
the border-towns, who were marshalling forth their
draggle-tailed
militia.
The first movements of the governor, on reaching his
dwelling, was to mount the roof, from whence he
contemplated
with rueful aspect the hostile squadron. This
had already come to an anchor in the bay, and consisted
of two stout frigates, having on board, as John Josselyn,
Gent. informs us, three hundred valiant red coats.
Having taken this survey, he sat himself down, and
wrote an epistle to the commander, demanding his
reason
of anchoring in the harbour without obtaining
previous
permission so to do. This letter was couched in
the most dignified and courteous terms, though I have it
from undoubted authority, that his teeth were clenched,
and he had a bitter sardonic grin upon his visage all the
while he wrote. Having despatched his letter, the grim
Peter stumped to and fro about the town, with a most
war-betokening countenance, his hand thrust into his
breeches pockets, and whistling a low Dutch Psalm tune,
which bore no small resemblance to the music of a
northeast
10
wind, when a storm is brewing. The very dogs, as
they eyed him, skulked away in dismaywhile all the
old and ugly women of New-Amsterdam ran howling at
his heels, imploring him to save them from murder,
robbery
,
and pitiless ravishment!
The reply of Col. Nicholas, who commanded the
invaders
,
was couched in terms of equal courtesy with the
letter of the governordeclaring the right and title of his
British majesty to the province; where he affirmed the
Dutch to be mere interlopers; and demanding that the
town, forts, &c. should be forthwith rendered into his
majesty's
obedience and protectionpromising at the same
time, life, liberty, estate, and free trade, to every Dutch
denizen, who should readily submit to his majesty's
government
.
Peter Stuyvesant read over this friendly epistle with
some such harmony of aspect as we may suppose a crusty
farmer, who has long been fattening upon his neighbour's
soil, reads the loving letter of John Styles, that warns him
of an action of ejectment. The old governor, however,
was not to be taken by surprise, but thrusting the
summons
into his breeches pocket, he stalked three times
across the room, took a pinch of snuff with great
vehemence
,
and then loftily waving his hand, promised to
send an answer the next morning. In the mean time he
called a general council of war of his privy counsellors
and burgomasters, not for the purpose of asking their
advice
,
for that, as has been already shown, he valued not a
rush; but to make known to them his sovereign
determination
,
and require their prompt adherence.
Before, however, he convened his council, he resolved
upon three important points;
first
, never to give up the
city without a little hard fighting, for he deemed it highly
derogatory to the dignity of so renowned a city, to suffer
itself to be captured and stripped, without receiving a few
kicks into the bargain.
Secondly
, that the majority of his
grand council was composed of arrant poltroons, utterly
destitute of true bottom; and,
thirdly
, that he would not
therefore suffer them to see the summons of Col. Nicholas,
lest the easy terms it held out might induce them to clamour
for a surrender.
His orders being duly promulgated, it was a piteous
sight to behold the late valiant burgomasters, who had
demolished the whole British empire in their harangues;
peeping ruefully out of their hiding places, and then
crawling
cautiously forth, dodging through narrow lanes and
alleys; starting at every little dog that barked, as though
it had been a discharge of artillerymistaking lamp-posts
for British grenadiers, and in the excess of their panic,
metamorphosing pumps into formidable soldiers, levelling
blunderbusses at their bosoms! Having, however, in
despite of numerous perils and difficulties of the kind,
arrived
safe without the loss of a single man, at the hall of
assembly, they took their seats and awaited in fearful
silence
the arrival of the governor. In a few moments the
wooden leg of the intrepid Peter was heard in regular
and stout hearted thumps upon the staircase.He entered
the chamber arrayed in full suit of regimentals, and
carrying
his trusty toledo, not girded on his thigh, but tucked
under his arm. As the governor never equipped himself
in this portentous manner, unless something of martial
nature were working within his fearless pericranium, his
council regarded him ruefully, as a very Janus, bearing
fire and sword, in his iron countenance, and forgot to light
their pipes in breathless suspense.
The great Peter was as eloquent as he was valorous;
indeed, these two rare qualities seemed to go hand in
hand in his composition; and, unlike most great
statesmen
,
whose victories are only confined to the bloodless
field of argument, he was always ready to enforce his
hardy words by no less hardy deeds. His speeches were
generally marked by a simplicity approaching to bluntness,
and by truly categorical decision. Addressing the grand
council, he touched briefly upon the perils and hardships
he had sustained, in escaping from his crafty foes. He
next reproached the council for wasting in idle debate
and party feuds that time which should have been devoted
to their country. He was particularly indignant at those
brawlers, who, conscious of individual security, had
disgraced
the councils of the province, by impotent hectorings
and scurrilous invectives, against a noble and powerful
enemythose cowardly curs who were incessant in their
barkings and yelpings at the lion, while distant or asleep,
but the moment he approached, were the first to skulk
away. He now called on those who had been so valiant
in their threats against Great Britain, to stand forth and
support their vauntings by their actionsfor it was
deeds
,
not
words
, that bespoke the spirit of a nation. He
proceeded
to recall the golden days of former prosperity,
which were only to be gained by manfully withstanding
their enemies; for the peace, he observed, which is effected
by force of arms, is always more sure and durable than
that which is patched up by temporary accommodations.
He endeavoured, moreover, to arouse their martial fire,
by reminding them of the time, when, before the frowning
walls of fort Christina, he had led them on to victory.
He strove likewise to awaken their confidence, by assuring
them of the protection of St. Nicholas, who had hitherto
maintained them in safety, amid all the savages of the
wilderness, the witches and squatters of the east, and the
giants of Merry-land. Finally, he informed them of the
insolent summons he had received, to surrender; but
concluded
by swearing to defend the province as long as
heaven was on his side, and he had a wooden leg to stand
upon. Which noble sentence he emphasized by a
tremendous
thwack with the broad side of his sword upon
the table, that totally electrified his auditors.
The privy counsellors, who had long been accustomed
to the governor's way, and in fact had been brought into
as perfect discipline as were ever the soldiers of the great
Frederick, saw that there was no use in saying a word
so lighted their pipes and smoked away in silence like fat
and discreet counsellors. But the burgomasters being less
under the governor's control, considering themselves as
representatives of the sovereign people, and being
moreover
inflated with considerable importance and
self-sufficiency
,
which they had acquired at those notable schools of
wisdom and morality, the popular meetingswere not so
easily satisfied. Mustering up fresh spirit, when they
found there was some chance of escaping from their
present
jeopardy, without the disagreeable alternative of
fighting, they requested a copy of the summons to
surrender
,
that they might show it to a general meeting of the
people.
So insolent and mutinous a request would have been
enough to have aroused the gorge of the tranquil Van
Twiller himselfwhat then must have been its effects upon
the great Stuyvesant, who was not only a Dutchman, a
governor, and a valiant wooden-legged soldier to boot, but
withal a man of the most stomachful and gunpowder
disposition
.
He burst forth into a blaze of noble indignation,
to which the famous rage of Achilles was a mere pouting
fitswore not a mother's son of them should see a
syllable
of itthat they deserved, every one of them, to be
hanged, drawn, and quartered, for traitorously daring to
question the infallibility of government; that as to their
advice and concurrence, he did not care a whiff of tobacco
for either; that he had long been harassed and thwarted
by their cowardly councils; but that they might thence
forth go home, and go to bed like old women, for he was
determined to defend the colony himself, without the
assistance
of them or their adherents! So saying, he tucked
his sword under his arm, cocked his hat upon his head,
and girding up his loins, stumped indignantly out of the
council-chamber, every body making room for him as he
passed.
No sooner had he gone than the busy burgomasters
called a public meeting in front of the Stadt-house, where
they appointed as chairman one Dofue Roerback, a
mighty
gingerbread-baker in the land, and formerly of the
cabinet of William the Testy. He was looked up to with
great reverence by the populace, who considered him a
man of dark knowledge, seeing he was the first that
imprinted
new-year cakes with the mysterious hieroglyphics
of the cock and breeches, and such like magical devices.
This great burgomaster, who still chewed the cud of ill
will against the valiant Stuyvesant, in consequence of
having been ignominiously kicked out of his cabinet at the
time of his taking the reins of government, addressed the
greasy multitude in what is called a patriotic speech; in
which he informed them of the courteous summons to
surrender
of
the governor's refusal to comply therewith
of his denying the public a sight of the summons, which,
he had no doubt, contained conditions highly to the
honour
and advantage of the province.
He then proceeded to speak of his excellency in high
sounding terms, suitable to the dignity and grandeur of
his station, comparing him to Nero, Caligula, and those
other great men of yore, who are generally quoted by
popular orators on similar occasions. Assuring the
people
that the history of the world did not contain a despotic
outrage to equal the present for atrocity, cruelty, tyranny,
and blood-thirstiness; that it would be recorded in letters
of fire on the blood stained tablet of history! that ages
would roll back with sudden horror, when they came to
view it! That the womb of time(by the way your orators
and writers take strange liberties with the womb of time,
though some would fain have us believe that time is an old
gentleman)that the womb of time, pregnant as it was
with direful horrors, would never produce a parallel
enormity
!with
10*
a variety of other heart-rending, soul-stirring
tropes and figures, which I cannot enumerate. Neither,
indeed need I, for they were exactly the same that are
used in all popular harangues and patriotic orations at the
present day, and may be classed in rhetoric under the
general
title of
Rigmarole
.
The speech of this inspired burgomaster being finished,
the meeting fell into a kind of popular fermentation, which
produced not only a string of right wise resolutions, but
likewise a most resolute memorial, addressed to the
governor
,
remonstrating at his conduct; which was no sooner
handed to him, than he handed it into the fire; and thus
deprived posterity of an invaluable document, that might
have served as a precedent to the enlightened cobblers
and tailors of the present day; in their sage intermeddlings
with politics.
THE WIDOW AND HER SON.
During
my residence in the country, I used frequently
to attend at the old village church. Its shadowy aisles,
its mouldering monuments, its dark oaken pannelling,
all reverend with the gloom of departed years, seemed to
fit it for the haunt of solemn meditation. A Sunday,
too, in the country, is so holy in its repose; such a
pensive
quiet reigns over the face of nature, that every
restless
passion is charmed down, and we feel all the natural
religion of the soul gently springing up within us.
Sweet day, so pure, so calm, so bright,
The bridal of the earth and sky.
I do not pretend to be what is called a devout man; but
there are feelings that visit me in a country church, amid
the beautiful serenity of nature, which I experience no
where else; and if not a more religious, I think I am a
better man on Sunday, than on any other day of the
seven.
But in this church I felt myself continually thrown
back upon the world by the frigidity and pomp of the
poor worms around me. The only being that seemed
thoroughly to feel the humble and prostrate piety of a
true Christian, was a poor decrepid old woman, bending
under the weight of years and infirmities. She bore the
traces of something better than abject poverty. The
lingerings of decent pride were visible in her appearance,
Her dress, though humble in the extreme, was
scrupulously
clean. Some trivial respect, too, had been
awarded
her, for she did not take her seat among the village
poor, but sat alone on the steps of the altar. She seemed
to have survived all love, all friendship, all society; and
to have nothing left her but the hopes of heaven. When
I saw her feebly rising and bending her aged form in
prayerhabitually conning her prayer book, which her
palsied hand and failing eyes would not permit her to
read, but which she evidently knew by heartI felt
persuaded
that the faultering voice of that poor woman arose
to heaven far before the responses of the clerk, the swell
of the organ, or the chanting of the choir.
I am fond of loitering about country churches, and
this was so delightfully situated, that it frequently
attracted
me. It stood on a knoll, round which a small
stream made a beautiful bend, and then wound its way
through a long reach of soft meadow scenery. The church
was surrounded by yew trees which seemed almost
coeval
with itself. Its tall Gothic spire shot up lightly from
among them, with rooks and crows generally wheeling
about it. I was seated there one still sunny morning,
watching two labourers who were digging a grave. They
had chosen one of the most remote and neglected corners
of the church-yard; where, from the number of nameless
graves around, it would appear that the indigent and
friendless were huddled into the earth. I was told that
the new made grave was for the only son of a poor
widow
.
While I was meditating on the distinctions of
worldly rank, which extend thus down into the very
dust, the toll of the bell announced the approach of the
funeral. They were the obsequies of poverty, with which
pride had nothing to do. A coffin of the plainest
materials
,
without pall or other covering, was borne by some
of the villagers. The sexton walked before with an air
of cold indifference. There were no mock mourners in
the trappings of affected wo; but there was one real
mourner who feebly tottered after the corpse. It was
the aged mother of the deceasedthe poor old woman
whom I had seen seated on the steps of the altar. She
was supported by a humble friend, who was
endeavouring
to comfort her. A few of the neighbouring poor
had joined the train, and some children of the village
were running hand in hand, now shouting with
unthinking
mirth, and now pausing to gaze with childish
curiosity
,
on the grief of the mourner.
As the funeral train approached the grave, the parson
issued from the church porch, arrayed in the surplice,
with prayer-book in hand, and attended by the clerk.
The service however, was a mere act of charity. The
deceased had been destitute, and the surviver was
pennyless
.
It was shuffled through, therefore, in form, but
coldly and unfeelingly. The well fed priest moved but
a few steps from the church door; his voice could
scarcely
be heard at the grave; and never did I hear the
funeral
service, that sublime and touching ceremony, turned
into such a frigid mummery of words.
I approached the grave. The coffin was placed on
the ground. On it were inscribed the name and age of
the deceasedGeorge Sommers, aged 26 years. The
poor mother had been assisted to kneel down at the head
of it. Her withered hands were clasped, as if in prayer,
but I could perceive, by a feeble rocking of the body, and
a convulsive motion of the lips, that she was gazing on
the last relics of her son, with the yearnings of a mother's
heart.
Preparations were made to deposite the coffin into the
earth. There was that bustling stir which breaks so
harshly on the feelings of grief and affection; directions
given in the cold tones of business: the striking of spades
into sand and gravel; which, at the grave of those we
love, is, of all sounds, the most withering. The bustle
around seemed to awaken the mother from a wretched
reverie. She raised her glazed eyes, and looked about
with a faint wildness. As the men approached with
cords to lower the coffin into the grave, she wrung her
hands and broke into an agony of grief. The poor
woman
who attended her took her by the arm,
endeavouring
to raise her from the earth, and to whisper something
like consolationNay, nownay, nowdon't take it
so sorely to heart. She could only shake her head and
wring her hands, as one not to be comforted.
As they lowered the body into the earth, the creaking
of the cords seemed to agonize her; but when, on some
accidental obstruction, there was a jostling of the coffin,
all the tenderness of the mother burst forth; as if any
harm could come to him who was far beyond the reach of
worldly suffering.
I could see no moremy heart swelled into my throat
my eyes filled with tearsI felt as if I were acting a
barbarous part in standing by and gazing idly on this
scene of maternal anguish. I wandered to another part
of the church-yard, where I remained until the funeral
train had dispersed.
When I saw the mother slowly and painfully quitting
the grave, leaving behind her the remains of all that was
dear to her on earth, and returning to silence and
destitution
,
my heart ached for her. What, thought I, are the
distresses of the rich! they have friends to soothe
pleasures
to beguilea world to divert and dissipate their
griefs. What are the sorrows of the young! Their
growing minds soon close above the woundtheir
elastic
spirits soon rise above the pressuretheir green and
ductile affections soon twine round new objects. But
the sorrows of the poor, who have no outward appliances
to soothethe sorrows of the aged, with whom life at best
is but a wintry day, and who can look for no aftergrowth
of joythe sorrows of a widow, aged, solitary, destitute,
mourning over an only son, the last solace of her years;
these are indeed sorrows which make us feel the impotency
of consolation.
It was some time before I left the church-yard. On my
way homeward I met with the woman who had acted as
comforter: she was just returning from accompanying the
mother to her lonely habitation, and I drew from her some
particulars connected with the affecting scene I had
witnessed
.
The parents of the deceased had resided in the village
from childhood. They had inhabited one of the neatest
cottages, and by various rural occupations, and the
assistance
of a small garden, had supported themselves
creditably
and comfortably, and led a happy and a blameless life.
They had only one son, who had grown up to be the staff
and pride of their age.Oh, Sir! said the good woman,
he was such a comely lad, so sweet-tempered, so kind to
every one around him, so dutiful to his parents! It did
one's heart good, to see him of a Sunday, dressed out in
his best, so tall, so straight, so cheery, supporting his old
mother to churchfor she was always fonder of leaning
on George's arm, than on her good man's; and, poor soul,
she might well be proud of him, for a finer lad there was
not in the country round.
Unfortunately the son was tempted, during a year of
scarcity and agricultural hardship to enter into the
service
of one of the small craft that plied on a neighbouring
river. He had not been long in this employ when he
was entrapped by a press-gang, and carried off to sea.
His parents received tidings of his seizure, but beyond
that they could learn nothing. It was the loss of their
main prop. The father, who was already infirm, grew
heartless and melancholy, and sunk into his grave. The
widow, left lonely, in her age and feebleness, could no
longer support herself, and came upon the parish. Still
there was a kind of feeling toward her throughout the
village, and a certain respect as being one of the oldest
inhabitants. As no one applied for the cottage, in which
she had passed so many happy days, she was permitted
to remain in it, where she lived solitary and almost
helpless
.
The few wants of nature were chiefly supplied,
from the scanty productions of her little garden, which
the neighbours would now and then cultivate for her.
It was but a few days before the time at which these
circumstances were told me, that she was gathering some
vegetables for a repast, when she heard the cottage door
which faced the garden suddenly open. A stranger came
out, and seemed to be looking eagerly and wildly around,
He was dressed in seamen's clothes, was emaciated and
ghastly pale, and bore the air of one broken by sickness
and hardships. He saw her, and hastened towards her,
but his steps were faint and faltering; he sank on his
knees before her, and sobbed like a child. The poor
woman
gazed upon him with a vacant and wandering eye
Oh my dear, dear mother! don't you know your son?
your poor boy George? It was indeed the wreck of
her once noble lad; who, shattered by wounds, by
sickness
and foreign imprisonment, had, at length, dragged
his wasted limbs homeward, to repose among the scenes of
his childhood.
I will not attempt to detail the particulars of such a
meeting, where joy and sorrow were so completely
blended
:
still he was alive! he was come home! he might
yet live to comfort and cherish her old age! Nature,
however, was exhausted in him; and if any thing had
been wanting to finish the work of fate, the desolation of
his native cottage would have been sufficient. He
stretched
himself on the pallet on which his widowed mother
had passed many a sleepless night, and never rose from it
again.
The villagers when they heard that George Sommers
had returned, crowded to see him, offering every comfort
and assistance that their humble means afforded. He
was too weak, however, to talkhe could only look his
thanks. His mother was his constant attendant; and
he seemed unwilling to be helped by any other hand.
There is something in sickness, that breaks down the
pride of manhood; that softens the heart, and brings it
back to the feelings of infancy. Who that has languished,
even in advanced life, in sickness and despondency; who
that has pined on a weary bed in the neglect and
loneliness
of a foreign land; but has thought on the mother
that looked on his childhood, that smoothed his pillow
and administered to his helplessness? Oh! there is an
enduring tenderness in the love of a mother to a son that
transcends all other affections of the heart. It is neither
to be chilled by selfishness, nor daunted by danger, nor
weakened by worthlessness, nor stifled by ingratitude.
She will sacrifice every comfort to his convenience; she
will surrender every pleasure to his enjoyment; she will
glory in his fame, and exult in his prosperity;and, if
misfortune overtake him, he will be the dearer to her from
his misfortunes; and if disgrace settle upon his name,
she will still love and cherish him in spite of his disgrace;
and if all the world beside cast him off, she will be all
the world to him.
Poor George Sommers had known what it was to be in
sickness and none to soothelonely and in prison, and
none to visit him. He could not endure his mother from
his sight; if she moved away, his eye would follow her.
She would sit for hours by his bed, watching him as he
slept. Sometimes he would start from a feverish dream,
and look anxiously up until he saw her bending over
him; when he would take her hand, lay it on his bosom,
and fall asleep with the tranquillity of a child. In this
way he died.
My first impulse on hearing this humble tale of
affliction
,
was to visit the cottage of the mourner, and
administer
pecuniary assistance, and, if possible, comfort. I
found, however, on inquiry, that the good feelings of the
villagers had prompted them to do every thing that the
case admitted; and as the poor know best how to console
each other's sorrows, I did not venture to intrude.
The next Sunday I was at the village church; when,
to my surprize, I saw the poor old woman tottering
down the aisle to her accustomed seat on the steps of the
altar.
She had made an effort to put on something like
mourning for her son; and nothing could be more
touching
than this struggle between pious affection and utter
poverty: a black ribbon or soa faded black
handkerchief
,
and one or two more such humble attempts to
express
by outward signs that grief that passes show. When
I looked round upon the storied monuments; the stately
hatchments; the cold marble pomp, with which grandeur
mourned magnificently over departed pride, and turned
to this poor widow, bowed down by age and sorrow at
the altar of her God, and offering up the prayers and
praises of a pious, though a broken heart, I felt that this
living monument of real grief was worth them all.
I related her story to some of the wealthy members
of the congregation, and they were moved by it. They
exerted themselves to render her situation more
comfortable
,
and to lighten her afflictions. It was, however,
but smoothing a few steps to the grave. In the course
of a Sunday or two after, she was missed from her usual
seat at church, and before I left the neighbourhood I heard,
with a feeling of satisfaction, that she had quietly breathed
her last, and had gone to rejoin those she loved, in that
world where sorrow is never known, and friends are never
parted.
STORM AT SEA.
The storm increased with the night. The sea was
lashed
into tremendous confusion. There was a fearful,
sullen
sound of rushing waves, and broken surges. Deep
called unto deep. At times the black volume of clouds
over head seemed rent asunder by flashes of lightning that
quivered along the foaming billows, and made the
succeeding
darkness doubly terrible. The thunders
bellowed
over the wild waste of waters, and were echoed and
prolonged by the mountain waves. As I saw the ship
staggering and plunging among these roaring caverns, it
seemed miraculous that she regained her balance, or
preserved
her buoyancy. Her yards would dip in the
water; her bow was almost buried beneath the waves.
Sometimes an impending surge appeared ready to
overwhelm
her, and nothing but a dexterous movement of
the helm preserved her from the shock.
When I retired to my cabin, the awful scene still
followed
me. The whistling of the wind through the
rigging
sounded like funeral wailings. The creaking of the
masts, the straining and groaning of bulk heads, as the
ship laboured in the weltering sea, were frightful. As
I heard the waves rushing along the side of the ship, and
roaring in my very ear, it seemed as if Death were raging
round this floating prison, seeking for his prey; the mere
starting of a nail, the yawning of a seam might give him
entrance.
JOHN BULL.
There
is no species of humour in which the English
more excel, than that which consists in caricaturing and
giving ludicrous appellations, or nicknames. In this
way they have whimsically designated, not merely
individuals
,
but nations; and in their fondness for pushing
a joke, they have not spared even themselves. One
would think that, in personifying itself, a nation would
be apt to picture something grand, heroic, and imposing;
but it is characteristic of the peculiar humour of the
English, and of their love for what is blunt, comic and
familiar, that they have embodied their national oddities in
the figure of a sturdy corpulent old fellow, with a
three-cornered hat, red waistcoat, leather breeches, and
stout oaken cudgel. Thus they have taken a singular
delight in exibiting their most private foibles in a
laughable
point of view; and have been so successful in their
delineations, that there is scarcely a being in actual
existence
more absolutely present to the public mind than
that eccentric personage, John Bull.
Perhaps the continual contemplation of the character
thus drawn of them, has contributed to fix it upon the
nation; and thus to give reality to what at first may
have been painted in a great measure from imagination.
Men are apt to acquire peculiarities that are continually
ascribed to them. The common orders of English seem
wonderfully captivated with the
beau ideal
which they
have formed of John Bull, and endeavour to act up to the
broad caricature that is perpetually before their eyes.
Unluckily
,
they sometimes make their boasted Bull-ism an
apology for their prejudice or grossness; and this I have
F 11
especially noticed among those truly home-bred and
genuine
sons of the soil who have never migrated beyond the
sound of Bow-bells. If one of these should be a little
uncouth in speech, and apt to utter impertinent truths,
he confesses that he is a real John Bull, and always speaks
his mind. If he now and then flies into an
unreasonable
burst of passion about trifles, he observes, that John
Bull is a choleric old blade, but then his passion is over
in a moment, and he bears no malice. If he betrays a
coarseness of taste, and an insensibility to foreign
refinements
,
he thanks heaven for his ignorancehe is a plain
John Bull, and has no relish for frippery and nicknacks,
his very proneness to be gulled by strangers, and to pay
extravagantly for absurdities, is excused under the plea
of munificencefor John is always more generous than
wise.
Thus, under the name of John Bull, he will contrive to
argue every fault into a merit, and will frankly convict
himself of being the honestest fellow in existence.
However little, therefore, the character may have
suited in the first instance, it has gradually adapted itself
to the nation, or rather they have adapted themselves to
each other; and a stranger who wishes to study English
peculiarities, may gather much valuable information from
the innumerable portraits of John Bull, as exhibited in
the windows of the caricature shops. Still, however, he
is one of those fertile humourists, that are continually
throwing out new portraits, and presenting different
aspects
from different points of view; and, often as he has
been described, I cannot resist the temptation to give a
slight sketch of him, such as he has met my eye.
John Bull, to all appearance, is a plain downright
matter-of-fact
fellow, with much less of poetry about him
than rich prose. There is little of romance in his nature,
but a vast deal of strong natural feeling. He excels in
humour more than in wit; is jolly rather than gay;
melancholy
rather than morose; can easily be moved to a
sudden tear, or surprised to a broad laugh; but he loathes
sentiment, and has no turn for light pleasantry. He is
a boon companion, if you allow him to have his humour,
and to talk about himself; and he will stand by a friend
in a quarrel, with life and purse, however soundly he
may be cudgelled.
In this last respect, to tell the truth, he has a
propensity
to be somewhat too ready. He is a busy-minded
personage, who thinks not merely for himself and family,
but for all the country round, and is most generously
disposed
to be every body's champion. He is continually,
volunteering his services to settle his neighbour's affairs,
and takes it in great dudgeon if they engage in any
matter
of consequence without asking his advice; though he
seldom engages in any friendly office of the kind without
finishing by getting into a squabble with all parties, and
then railing bitterly at their ingratitude. He unluckily
took lessons in his youth in the noble science of defence,
and having accomplished himself in the use of his limbs
and his weapons, and become a perfect master at boxing
and cudgel play, he has had a troublesome life of it ever
since. He cannot hear of a quarrel between the most
distant of his neighbours, but he begins incontinently to
fumble with the head of his cudgel, and to consider
whether his interest or honour does not require that he
should meddle in the broil. Indeed he has extended his
relations of pride and policy so completely over the whole
country, that no event can take place, without infringing
some of his finely-spun rights and dignities. Couched in
his little domain, with these filaments stretching forth in
every direction, he is like some choleric, bottle-bellied old
spider, who has woven his web over a whole chamber, so
that a fly cannot buzz, nor a breeze blow, without startling
his repose, and causing him to sally forth wrathfully
from his den.
Though really a good-hearted, good-tempered old
fellow
at bottom, yet he is singularly fond of being in the
midst of contention. It is one of his peculiarities,
however
,
that he only relishes the beginning of an affray; he
always goes into a fight with alacrity, but he comes out of
it grumbling even when victorious; and though no one
fights with more obstinacy to carry a contested point,
yet, when the battle is over, and he comes to the
reconciliation
,
he is so much taken up with the mere shaking of
hands, that he is apt to let his antagonist pocket all that
they have been quarrelling about. It is not, therefore,
fighting that he ought to be so much on his guard against,
as making friends. It is difficult to cudgel him out of a
farthing; but put him in a good humour, and you may
bargain
him out of all the money in his pocket. He is
like one of his own ships, which will weather the roughest
storm uninjured, but roll its masts overboard in the
succceding
calm.
He is a little fond of playing the magnifico abroad; of
pulling out a long purse; flinging his money bravely about
at boxing matches, horse races, and cockfights, and
carrying
a high head among gentlemen of the fancy; but
immediately after one of these fits of extravagance, he will
be taken with violent qualms of economy; stop short at
the most trivial expenditure; talk desperately of being
ruined, and brought upon the parish; and in such moods,
he will not pay the smallest tradesman's bill without
violent altercation. He is, in fact, the most punctual
and discontented paymaster in the world; drawing his
coin out of his breeches' pocket with infinite reluctance;
paying to the uttermost farthing, but accompanying every
guinea with a growl.
With all this talk of economy, however, he is a bountiful
provider, and a hospitable housekeeper. His economy is
of a whimsical kind, its chief object being to devise how
he may afford to be extravagant; for he will begrudge
himself a beafsteak and a pint of port one day, that he
may roast an ox whole, broach a hogshead of ale, and
treat all his neighbours on the next.
His domestic establishment is enormously expensive:
not so much from any great outward parade, as from the
great consumption of solid beef and pudding; the vast
number of followers he feeds and clothes; and his
singular
disposition to pay hugely for small services. He is a
most kind and indulgent master, and, provided his
servants
humour his peculiarities, flatter his vanity a little
now and then, and do not peculate grossly on him before
his face, they may manage him to perfection. Every
thing that lives on him seems to thrive and grow fat.
His house servants are well paid, and pampered, and
have little to do. His horses are sleek and lazy, and
prance slowly before his state carriage; and his house
dogs sleep quietly before his door, and will hardly bark
at a house-breaker.
His family mansion is an old castellated manor-house,
grey with age, and of a most venerable, though weather
beaten appearance. It has been built upon no regular
plan, but is a vast accumulation of parts, erected in
various
tastes and ages. The centre bears evident traces of
Saxon architecture, and is as solid as ponderous stone and
old English oak can make it. Like all the relics of that
style, it is full of, obscure passages, intricate mazes, and
dusky chambers; and though these have been partially
lighted up in modern days, yet there are many places
where you must still grope in the dark. Additions have
been made to the original edifice from time to time and
great alterations have taken place; towers and
battlements
have been erected during the wars and tumults;
wings built in times of peace; and out-houses, lodges,
and offices, run up according to the whim or convenience
of different generations: until it has become one of the
most spacious, rambling tenements imaginable. An
entire
wing is taken up with a family chapel; a reverend
pile that must once have been exceedingly sumptuous,
and, indeed, in spite of having been altered and
simplified
at various periods, has still a look of solemn religious
pomp. Its walls within are storied with the monuments
of John's ancestors; and it is snugly fitted up with soft
cushions and well-lined chairs, where such of his family
as are inclined to church services, may doze comfortably
in the discharge of their duties.
To keep up this chapel has cost John much money;
but he is staunch in his religion, and piqued in his zeal,
from the circumstance that many dissenting chapels have
been erected in his vicinity, and several of his neighbours,
with whom he has had quarrels, are strong papists.
To do the duties of the chapel he maintains, at a large
expense, a pious and portly family chaplain. He is a
most learned and decorous personage, and a truly well
bred Christian, who always backs the old gentleman in
his opinions, winks discreetly at his little peccadilloes,
rebukes
the children when refractory, and is of great use in
exhorting the tenants to read their bibles, say their
prayers
,
and, above all, to pay their rents punctually, and
without grumbling.
The family apartments are in a very antiquated taste,
somewhat heavy, and often inconvenient, but full of the
solemn magnificence of former times; fitted up with rich
though faded tapestry, unwieldy furniture, and loads of
massy gorgeous old plate. The vast fire-places, ample
kitchens, extensive cellars, and sunptuous banqueting
hallsall speak of the roaring hospitality of days of yore,
of which the modern festivity at the manor-house is but
a shadow. There are, however, complete suites of rooms
apparently deserted and time worn; and towers and
turrets
that are tottering to decay; so that in high winds
there is a danger of their tumbling about the ears of the
household.
11*
John has frequently been advised to have the old
edifice
thoroughly overhauled; and to have some of the
useless
parts pulled down, and the others strengthened with
their materials; but the old gentleman always grows
testy on this subject. He swears the house is an
excellent
housethat it is tight and weather proof, and not
to be shaken by tempeststhat it has stood for several
hundred years, and, therefore, is not likely to tumble
down nowthat as to its being inconvenient, his family
is accustomed to the inconveniences, and would not be
comfortable without themthat as to its unwieldy size
and irregular construction, these result from its being the
growth of centuries, and being improved by the wisdom
of every generationthat an old family like his, requires
a large house to dwell in; new upstart families may live
in modern cottages and snug boxes, but an old English
family should inhabit an old English manor-house. If
you point out any part of the building as superfluous, he
insists that it is material to the strength or decoration of
the rest, and the harmony of the whole; and swears that
the parts are so built into each other, that, if you pull
down one, you run the risk of having the whole about your
ears.
The secret of the matter is, that John has a great
disposition
to protect and patronize. He thinks it
indispensible
to the dignity of an ancient and honourable family,
to be bounteous in its appointments, and to be eaten up
by dependants; and so, partly from pride, and partly from
kind-heartedness, he makes it a rule always to give
shelter
and maintainance to his superannuated servants.
The consequence is, that, like many other venerable
family establishments, his manor is encumbered by old
retainers whom he cannot turn off, and an old style which
he cannot lay down. His mansion is like a great
hospital
of invalids, and, with all its magnitude, is not a whit
too large for its inhabitants. Not a nook or a corner but
is of use in housing some useless personage. Groups
of veteran beef-eaters, gouty pensioners, and retired
heroes of the buttery and the larder, are seen lolling
about its walls, crawling over its lawns, dozing under its
trees, or sunning themselves upon the benches at its
doors. Every office and out-house is garrisoned by these
supernumeraries and their families; for they are
amazingly
prolific, and when they die off, are sure to leave
John a legacy of hungry mouths to be provided for. A
mattock cannot be struck against the most mouldering
tumble-down tower, but out pops, from some cranny or
loop-hole, the grey pate of some superannuated hanger-on,
who has lived at John's expense all his life, and makes
the most grievous outcry, at their pulling down the roof
from over the head of a worn-out servant of the family.
This is an appeal that John's honest heart never can
withstand
;
so that a man, who has faithfully eaten his beef
and pudding all his life, is sure to be rewarded with a
pipe and tankard in his old days.
A great part of his park, also, is turned into paddocks
where his broken down chargers are turned loose to graze
undisturbed for the remainder of their existencea
worthy
example of grateful recollection, which, if some of
his neighbours were to imitate, would not be to their
discredit
.
Indeed, it is one of his greatest pleasures to
point out these old steeds to his visiters, to dwell on their
good qualities, extol their past services, and boast with
some little vain-glory, of the perilous adventures and
hardy exploits, through which they have carried him.
He is given, however, to indulge his veneration for
family usages, and family incumbrances, to a whimsical
extent. His manor is infested by gangs of gipsies; yet
he will not suffer them to be driven off, because they
have infested the place time out of mind, and been
regular
poachers upon every generation of the family. He
will scarcely permit a dry branch to be lopped from the
great trees that surround the house, lest it should molest
the rooks, that have bred there for centuries. Owls
have taken possession of the dovecote; but they are
hereditary
owls, and must not be disturbed. Swallows
have nearly choked up every chimney with their nests;
martins build in every frieze and cornice; crows flutter
about the towers, and perch on every weathercock; and
old grey-headed rats may be seen in every quarter of the
house, running in and out of their holes undauntedly, in
broad daylight. In short, John has such a reverence for
every thing that has been long in the family, that he will
not hear even of abuses being reformed, because they are
good old family abuses.
All these whims and habits have concurred wofully
to drain the old gentleman's purse; and as he prides
himself on punctuality in money matters, and wishes to
maintain his credit in the neighbourhood, they have
caused him great perplexity in meeting his engagements.
This, too, has been increased, by the altercations and
heart-burnings which are continually taking place in his
family. His children have been brought up to different
callings, and are of different ways of thinking; and as
they have always been allowed to speak their mind
freely
,
they do not fail to exercise the privilege most
clamorously
in the present posture of his affairs. Some stand
up for the honour of the race, and are clear that the old
establishment should be kept up in all its state, whatever
may be the cost; others, who are more prudent and
considerate
,
entreat the old gentleman to retrench his
expenses
,
and to put his whole system of housekeeping on
a more moderate footing. He has, indeed, at times,
seemed inclined to listen to their opinions, but their
wholesome advice has been completely defeated by the
obstreperous conduct of one of his sons. This is a noisy
rattle-pated fellow, of rather low habits, who neglects
his business to frequent ale-housesis the orator of
village
clubs, and a complete oracle, among the poorest of
his father's tenants. No sooner does he hear any of his
brothers mention reform or retrenchment, than up he
jumps, takes the words out of their mouths, and roars
out for an overturn. When his tongue is once going,
nothing can stop it. He rants about the room; hectors
the old man about his spendthrift practices; ridicules his
tastes and pursuits; insists that he shall turn the old
servants out of doors; give the broken down horses to
the hounds; send the fat chaplain packing, and take a
field preacher in his placenay, that the whole family
mansion shall be levelled with the ground, and a plain
one of brick and mortar built in its place. He rails at
every social entertainment and family festivity, and
skulks away growling to the ale-house whenever an
equipage
drives up to the door. Though constantly
complaining
of the emptiness of his purse, yet he scruples
not to spend all his pocket-money in these tavern
convocations
,
and even runs up scores, for the liquor over
which he preaches about his father's extravagance.
It may readily be imagined how little such thwarting
agrees with the old cavalier's fiery temperament. He
has become so irritable, from repeated crossings, that the
mere mention of retrenchment or reform is a signal for
a brawl between him and the tavern oracle. As the
latter
is too sturdy and refractory for paternal discipline,
having grown out of all fear of the cudgel, they have
frequent
scenes of wordy warfare, which at times run so
high, that John is fain to call in the aid of his son Tom,
an officer who was served abroad, but is at present living
at home, on half pay. This last is sure to stand by the
old gentleman, right or wrong; likes nothing so much
as a racketing roystering life; and is ready, at a wink or
nod, to out sabre, and flourish it over the orator's head,
if he dares to array himself against paternal authority.
These family dissensions, as usual, have got abroad,
and are rare food for scandal in John's neighbourhood.
People begin to look wise, and shake their heads,
whenever
his affairs are mentioned. They all hope that
matters are not so bad with him as represented; but
when a man's own children begin to rail at his
extravagance
,
things must be badly managed. They understand
he is mortgaged over head and ears, and is continually
dabbling with money lenders. He is certainly an
open-handed
old gentleman, but they fear he has lived too
fast; indeed, they never knew any good come of this
fondness for hunting, racing, revelling, and prize-fighting.
In short, Mr. Bull's estate is a very fine one, and
has been in the family a long while; but for all that, they
have known many finer estates come to the hammer.
What is worst of all, is the effect which these
pecuniary
embarrassments and domestic feuds have had on
the poor man himself. Instead of that jolly round
corporation
,
and snug rosy face, which he used to present,
he has of late become as shrivelled and shrunk as a
frost-bitten
apple. His scarlet gold-laced waistcoat, which
bellied out so bravely in those prosperous days when he
sailed before the wind, now hangs loosely about him like
a mainsail in a calm. His leather breeches are all in folds
and wrinkles, and apparently have much ado to hold up
the boots that yawn on both sides of his once sturdy
legs.
Instead of strutting about as formerly, with his
three-cornered
hat on one side; flourishing his cudgel, and
bringing it down every moment with a hearty thump
upon the ground; looking every one sturdily in the face,
and trolling out a stave of a catch or a drinking song;
he now goes about whistling thoughtfully to himself,
with his head drooping down, his cudgel tucked under
his arm, and his hands thrust to the bottom of his breeches
pockets, which are evidently empty.
Such is the plight of honest John Bull at present; yet
F 2
for all this the old fellow's spirit is as tall and as gallant
as ever. If you drop the least expression of sympathy
or concern, he takes fire in an instant; swears that he is
the richest, and stoutest fellow in the country; talks of
laying out large sums to adorn his house or to buy
another estate; and, with a valiant swagger and grasping
of his cudgel, longs exceedingly to have another bout at
quarterstaff.
Though there may be something rather whimsical in
all this, yet I confess I cannot look upon John's situation
without strong feelings of interest. With all his odd
humours and obstinate prejudices, he is a sterling
hearted
old blade. He may not be so wonderfully fine a
fellow
as he thinks himself, but he is at least twice as good
as his neighbours represent him. His virtues are all
his own; all plain, home-bred and unaffected. His very
faults smack of the raciness of his good qualities. His
extravagance savours of his generosity; his
quarrelsomeness
of his courage; his credulity of his open faith; his
vanity of his pride; and his bluntness of his sincerity.
They are all the redundancies of a rich and liberal
character
.
He is like his own oak; rough without, but
sound and solid within; whose bark abounds with
excrescences
in proportion to the growth and grandeur of
the timber; and whose branches make a fearful groaning
and murmuring in the least storm, from their very
magnitude
and luxuriance. There is something, too, in the
appearance of his old family mansion, that is extremely
poetical and picturesque; and, as long as it can be
rendered
comfortably habitable, I should almost tremble to
see it meddled with during the present conflict of tastes
and opinions. Some of his advisers are no doubt good
architects that might be of service; but many I fear are
mere levellers, who, when they had once got to work
with their mattocks on the venerable edifice, would never
stop until they had brought it to the ground, and
perhaps
buried themselves among the ruins. All that I
wish is, that John's present troubles may teach him
more prudence in future. That he may cease to distress
his mind about other people's affairs; that he may give
up the fruitless attempt to promote the good of his
neighbours
,
and the peace and happiness of the world, by dint
of the cudgel; that he may remain quietly at home;
gradually get his house into repair; cultivate his rich
estate
according to his fancy; husband his incomeif he
thinks proper; bring his unruly children into orderif
he can; renew the jovial scenes of ancient prosperity; and
long enjoy, on his paternal lands, a green, an honourable,
and a merry old age.
CONSEQUENCE.
The
doctor now felt all the dignity of a landholder
rising
within him. He had a little of the German pride
of territory in his composition, and almost looked upon
himself as owner of a principality. He began to
complain
of the fatigue of business; and, was fond of riding
out to look at his estate. His little expeditions to his
lands were attended with a bustle and parade that
created
a sensation throughout the neighbourhood. His
wall-eyed horse stood stamping, and whisking off the
flies, for a full hour before the house. Then the doctor's
saddle-bags would be brought out and adjusted; then,
after a little while, his cloak would be rolled up and
strapped to the saddle; then his umbrella would be
buckled to the cloak; while, in the mean time, a group of
ragged boys, that observant class of beings would gather
before the door. At length the doctor would issue forth,
in a pair of jack-boots that reached above his knees, and
a cocked hat flapped down in front. As he was a short,
fat man, he took some time to mount into the saddle;
and when there, he took some time to have the saddle and
stirrups properly adjusted, enjoying the wonder and
admiration
of the urchin crowd. Even after he had set
off, he would pause in the middle of the street, or trot
back two or three times to give some parting orders which
were answered by the housekeeper from the door, or
Dolph from the study, or the black cook from the cellar,
or the chambermaid from the garret window; and there
were generally some last words bawled after him, just as
he was turning the corner.
The whole neighbourhood would be aroused by this
pomp and circumstance. The cobler would leave his
last; the barber would thrust out his frizzed head, with
a comb sticking in it; a knot would collect at the
grocer's
door, and the word would be buzzed from one end
of the street to the other, The Doctor's riding out to
his country seat.
THE COCKLOFT FAMILY.
The
Cockloft family, of which I have made such
frequent
mention, is of great antiquity, if there be any truth
in the genealogical tree which hangs up in my cousin's
library. They trace their descent from a celebrated
Roman
Knight, cousin to the progenitor of his Majesty of
Britain, who left his native country on occasion of some
disgust; and coming into Wales, became a great favourite
of Prince Madoc, and accompanied that famous argonaut
in the voyage which ended in the discovery of this
continent
.Though
a member of the family, I have
sometimes
ventured to doubt the authenticity of this portion
of their annals, to the great vexation of cousin
Christopher
,
who is looked up to as the head of our house; and
who, though as orthodox as a bishop, would sooner give
up the whole decalogue than lop off a single limb of the
family tree. From time immemorial, it has been the rule
for the Cocklofts to marry one of their own name; and
as they always bred like rabbits, the family has
increased
and multiplied like that of Adam and Eve. In truth
their number is almost incredible; and you can hardly
go into any part of the country without starting a warren
of genuine Cocklofts. Every person of the least
observation
,
or experience, must have observed that where
this practice of marrying cousins, and second cousins,
prevails in a family, every member, in the course of a
few generations, becomes queer, humourous, and original;
as much distinguished from the common race of mongrels
as if he were of a different species. This has happened in
our family, and particularly in that branch of it of which
Christopher Cockloft, Esq. is the headChristopher, is,
in fact, the only married man of the name who resides in
town; his family is small, having lost most of his
children
when young, by the excessive care he took to bring
them up like vegetables. This was one of the first
whim-whams
,
and a confounded one it was; as his children
might have told, had they not fallen victims to his
experiment
before they could talk. He had got from some
quack philosopher or other, a notion that there was a
complete analogy between children and plants, and that
they ought to be both reared alike. Accordingly he
sprinkled
them every morning with water, laid them out in the
sun, as he did his geraniums; and if the season was
remarkably
dry, repeated this wise experiment three or
four times of a morning. The consequence was, the
poor little souls died one after another, except Jeremy
and his two sisters; who, to be sure, are a trio of as odd,
runty, mummy-looking originals as ever Hogarth fancied
in his most happy moments. Mrs. Cockloft, the larger
if not the better half of my cousin, often remonstrated
against this vegetable theory;and even brought the
parson
of the parish, in which my cousin's country house is
situated, to her aid; but in vain, Christopher persisted,
and attributed the failure of his plan to its not having
been exactly conformed to. As I have mentioned Mrs.
Cockloft, I may as well say a little more about her while I
am in the humour. She is a lady of wonderful
notability
,
a warm admirer of shining mahogany, clean hearths
and her husband: whom she considers the wisest man in
the world, bating Will Wizard and the parson of our
parish; the last of whom is her oracle on all occasions.
She goes constantly to church every Sunday and saint's
day, and insists upon it that no man is entitled to ascend
a pulpit unless he has been ordained by a bishop; nay,
so far does she carry her orthodoxy, that all the
arguments
in the world will never persuade her that a
Presbyterian
or Baptist, or even a Calvinist, has any possible
chance of going to heaven. Above every thing else,
however
,
she abhors Paganism; can scarcely refrain from
laying
violent hands on a Pantheon when she meets with it;
and was very nigh going into hysterics, when my
cousin
insisted that one of his boys should be christened after
our laurcate, because the parson of the parish had told
her that Pindar was the name of a Pagan writer, famous
for his love of boxing-matches, wrestling, and
horse-racing
.
To sum up all her qualifications in the shortest
possible way, Mrs. Cockloft is, in the true sense of the
phrase, a good sort of a woman; and I often
congratulate
my cousin on possessing her. The rest of the family
consists of Jeremy Cockloft, the younger, who has
already
been mentioned, and the two Miss Cocklofts, or rather
the young ladies, as they have been called by the servants
time out of mind; not that they are really young, the
younger being somewhat on the shady side of thirty
but it has ever been the custom to call every member of
the family young under fifty. In the south-east corner
of the house, I hold quiet possession of an old-fashioned
12
apartment, where myself and my elbow chair are suffered
to amuse ourselves undisturbed, save at meal times. This
apartment old Cockloft has facetiously denominated
Cousin
Launce's Paradise; and the good old gentleman has
two or three favourite jokes about it, which are served up
as regularly as the standing family dish of beefsteaks and
onions, which every day maintains its station at the foot
of the table, in defiance of mutton, poultry, or even venison
itself.
Though the family is apparently small, yet, like most
old establishments of the kind, it does not want for
honorary
members. It is the city rendezvous of the
Cocklofts
;
and we are continually enlivened by the company
of half a score of uncles, aunts, and cousins in the fortieth
remove, from all parts of the county, who profess a
wonderful
regard for Cousin Christopher; and overwhelm
every member of his household, down to the cook in the
kitchen, with their attentions. We have for three weeks
past been greeted with the company of two worthy old
spinsters, who came down from the country to settle a
law suit. They have done little else but retail stories of
their village neighbours, knit stockings, and take snuff,
all the time they have been here: the whole family are
bewildered
with church-yard tales of sheeted ghosts, white
horses without heads, and with large goggle eyes in their
buttocks; and not one of the old servants dare budge an
inch after dark without a numerous company at his heels.
My cousin's visiters, however, always return his
hospitality
with due gratitude, and now and then remind him
of their fraternal regard, by a present of a pot of apple
sweetmeats, or a barrel of sour cider at Christmas.
Jeremy displays himself to great advantage among his
country relations, who all think him a prodigy, and
often
stand astounded, in gaping wonderment, at his
natural philosophy. He lately frightened a simple old
uncle almost out of his wits, by giving it as his opinion
that the earth would one day be scorched to ashes by the
eccentric gambols of the famous comet, so much talked
of; and positively asserted that this world revolved round
the sun, and that the moon was certainly inhabited.
The family mansion bears equal marks of antiquity
with its inhabitants. As the Cocklofts are remarkable
for their attachment to every thing that has remained
long in the family, they are bigoted towards their old
edifice, and I dare say would sooner have it crumble
about their ears than abandon it. The consequence is,
it has been so patched up and repaired, that it has
become
as full of whims and oddities as its tenants;
requires
to be nursed and humoured like a gouty old
codger
of an alderman; and reminds one of the famous ship
in which a certain admiral circumnavigated the globe,
which was so patched and timbered, in order to preserve
so great a curiosity, that at length not a particle of
the original remained. Whenever the wind blows,
the old mansion makes a most perilous groaning; and
every storm is sure to make a day's work for the
carpenter
,
who attends upon it as regularly as the family
physician
.
This predilection for every thing that has been
long in the family shows itself in every particular. The
domestics are all grown grey in the service of our house.
We have a little, old, crusty, grey-headed negro, who has
lived through two or three generations of the Cocklofts,
and, of course, has become a personage of no little
importance
in the household. He calls all the family by their
christian names; tells long stories about how he dandled
them on his knee when they were children: and is a
complete
Cockloft chronicle for the last seventy years.
The family carriage was made in the last French war,
and the old horses were most indubitably foaled in
Noah's arkresembling marvellously, in gravity of
demeanour
,
those sober animals which may be seen any day
of the year in the streets of Philadelphia, walking their
snail's pace, a dozen in a row, and harmoniously
jingling
their bells. Whim-whams are the inheritance of
the Cocklofts, and every member of the household is a
humourist
sui generis
, from the master down to the
footman
.
The very cats and dogs are humourists; and we
have a little runty scoundrel of a cur, who, whenever the
church bells ring, will run to the street door, turn up his
nose in the wind and howl most piteously. Jeremy
insists
that this is owing to a peculiar delicacy in the
organization
of his ears, and supports his position by many
learned arguments which nobody can understand: but
I am of opinion that it is a mere Cockloft whim-wham,
which the little cur indulges, being descended from a
race of dogs which has flourished in the family ever since
the time of my grandfather. A propensity to save every
thing that bears the stamp of family antiquity has
accumulated an abundance of trumpery and rubbish
with which the house is encumbered, from the cellar to
the garret; and every room, and closet, and corner, is
crammed with three-legged chairs, clocks without hands,
swords without scabbards, cocked hats, broken
candle-sticks
,
and looking glasses with frames carved into
fantastic
shapes, of feathered sheep, woolly birds, and other
animals that have no name except in books of heraldry.
The ponderous mahogany chairs in the parlour are of
such unwieldy proportions, that it is quite a serious
undertaking
to gallant one of them across the room; and
sometimes make a most equivocal noise when you sit down
in a hurry: the mantle-piece is decorated with little
lacquered earthen shepherdessessome of which are
without
toes, and others without noses; and the fire-place
is garnished out with Dutch tiles, exhibiting a great
variety
of Scripture pieces, which my good old soul of a
cousin takes infinite delight in explaining. Poor Jeremy
hates them as he does poison; for while a younker, he
was obliged by his mother to learn the history of a tile
every Sunday morning before she would permit him to
join his play-mates: this was a terrible affair for
Jeremy
,
who by the time he had learned the last had
forgotten
the first, and was obliged to begin again. He assured
me the other day, with a round college oath, that if the
old house stood out till he inherited it he would have
these tiles taken out, and ground into powder, for the
perfect
hatred he bore them.
My cousin Christopher enjoys unlimited authority in
the mansion of his forefathers; he is truly what may be
termed a hearty old bladehas a florid, sunshiny
countenance
,
and, if you will only praise his wine, and laugh
at his long stories, himself and his house are heartily at
your service. The first condition is indeed easily
complied
with, for, to tell the truth, his wine is excellent;
but his stories, being not of the best, and often repeated,
are apt to create a disposition to yawn, being, in addition
to their other qualities, most unreasonably long. His
prolixity is the more afflicting to me, since I have all his
stories by heart; and when he enters upon one, it
reminds
me of Newark causeway, where the traveller sees
the end at the distance of several miles. To the great
misfortune of all his acquaintance cousin Cockloft is
blessed with a most provoking retentive memory, and
can give day and date, and name and age and
circumstance
,
with most unfeeling precision. These, however,
are but trivial foibles, forgotten, or remembered only
with a kind of tender respectful pity, by those who know
with what a rich redundant harvest of kindness and
generosity
his heart is stored. It would delight you to see
with what social gladness he welcomes a visiter into his
house; and the poorest man that enters his door never
leaves it without a cordial invitation to sit down and
drink a glass of wine. By the honest farmers round his
country seat, he is looked up to with love and
reverence
;
they never pass him by without his inquiring after
the welfare of their families, and receiving a cordial shake
of his liberal hand. There are but two classes of people
who are thrown out of the reach of his hospitalityand
these are Frenchmen and Democrats. The old
gentleman
considers it treason against the majesty of good
breeding to speak to any visiter with his hat on; but the
moment a Democrat enters his door, he forthwith bids
his man Pompey bring his hat, puts it on his head, and
salutes him with, an appalling Well, sir, what do you
want with me?
He has a profound contempt for Frenchmen, and
firmly believes that they eat nothing but frogs and
soupmaigre
in their own country. This unlucky prejudice
is partly owing to my great aunt Pamelia having been,
many years ago, run away with by a French Count, who
turned out to be the son of a generation of barbers; and
partly to a little vivid spark of toryism, which burns in
a secret corner of his heart. He was a loyal subject of
the crown; has hardly yet recovered the shock of
independence
;
and, though he does not care to own it, always
does honour to his majesty's birth day, by inviting a few
cavaliers, like himself, to dinner; and gracing his
table with more than ordinary festivity. If by chance
the revolution is mentioned before him, my cousin shakes
his head; and you may see, if you take good note, a
lurking
smile of contempt in the corner of his eye, which
marks a decided disapprobation of the sound. He once,
in the fullness of his heart, observed to me that green
peas were a month later than they were under the old
government. But the most eccentric manifestation of
loyalty
he ever gave was making a voyage to Halifax for no
other reason under heaven but to hear his majesty prayed
for in church, as he used to be here formerly. This he
never could be brought fairly to acknowledge, but it is
a certain fact I assure you.It is not a little singular
that a person, so much given to long story-telling as my
12*
cousin, should take a liking to another of the same
character
;
but so it is with the old gentlemanhis prime
favourite
and companion is Will Wizard, who is almost a
member of the family, and will sit before the fire, with
his feet on the massy handirons, and smoke his cigar, and
screw his phiz, and spin away tremendous long stories
of his travels, for a whole evening, to the great delight
of the old gentleman and lady, and especially of the
young ladies, who, like Desdemona, do seriously
incline
,
and listen to him with innumerable O dears,
is it possibles, good graciouses, and look upon him
as a second Sinbad the sailor.
The Miss Cocklofts, whose pardon I crave for not
having particularly introduced them before, are a pair of
delectable damsels; who having purloined and locked
up the family-bible, pass for just what age they please to
plead guilty to. Barbara, the eldest, has long since
resigned
the character of a belle, and adopted that staid,
sober, demure, snuff-taking air, becoming her years and
discretion. She is a good-natured soul, whom I never
saw in a passion but once; and that was occasioned by
seeing an old favourite beau of hers kiss the hand of a
pretty blooming girl; and, in truth she only got angry
because, as she very properly said, it would spoil the
child. Her sister Margery, or Maggie, as she is
familiarly
termed, seemed disposed to maintain her post as a
belle, until a few months since; when accidentally
hearing
a gentleman observe that she broke very fast, she
suddenly left off going to the assembly, took a cat into
high favour, and began to rail at the forward pertness of
young misses. From that moment I set her down for
an old maid; and so she is, by the hand of my body.
The young ladies are still visited by some half dozen of
veteran beaux, who grew and flourished in the
haut ton
,
when the Miss Cocklofts were quite children, but have
been brushed rather rudely by the hand of time, who,
to say the truth, can do almost any thing but make
people
young. They are, notwithstanding, still warm
candidates
for female favour; look venerably tender, and
repeat
over and over the same honeyed speeches and
sugared
sentiments to the little belles that they poured so
profusely into the ears of their mothers. I beg leave
here to give notice, that by this sketch I mean no
reflection
on old bachelors; on the contrary, I hold, that next
to a fine lady, the
ne plus ultra
, an old bachelor is the
most charming being upon earth; inasmuch as by living
in single blessedness, he of course does just as he
pleases; and if he has any genius must acquire a
plentiful
stock of whims, and oddities, and whalebone habits:
without which I esteem a man to be mere beef without
mustard, good for nothing at all, but to run on errands
for ladies, take boxes at the theatre, and act the part of
a screen at tea-parties, or a walking stick in the streets.
I merely speak of those old boys who infest public walks,
pounce upon the ladies from every corner of the street,
and worry and frisk and amble, and caper before, behind,
and round about the fashionable belles, like old ponies
in a pasture, striving to supply the absence of youthful
whim and hilarity, by grimaces and grins, and artificial
vivacity. I have sometimes seen one of these reverend
youths endeavouring to elevate his wintry passions into
something like love, by basking in the sunshine of
beauty
;
and it did remind me of an old moth attempting to
fly through a pane of glass towards a light without ever
approaching near enough to warm itself, or scorch its
wings.
Never I firmly believe, did there exist a family that
went more by tangents than the Cocklofts.Every thing
is governed by whim; and if one member starts a new
freak, away all the rest follow like wild geese in a string.
As the family, the servants, the horses, cats, and dogs,
have all grown old together, they have accommodated
themselves to each other's habits completely; and though
every body of them is full of odd points, angles,
rhomboids
,
and ins and outs, yet somehow or other, they
harmonize
together like so many straight lines; and it is truly
a grateful and refreshing sight to see them agree so well.
Should one, however, get out of tune, it is like a cracked
fiddle, the whole concert is ajar; you perceive a cloud over
every brow in the house, and even the old chairs seem to
creak affettuoso. If my cousin, as he is rather apt to do,
betray any symptons of vexation or uneasiness no matter
about what, he is worried to death with inquiries, which
answer no other end but to demonstrate the good will of
the inquirer, and put him in a passion; for every body
knows how provoking it is to be cut short in a fit of the
blues, by an impertinent question about what is the
matter? when a man can't tell himself. I remember a
few months ago the old gentleman came home in quite
a squall; kicked poor Csar, the mastiff, out of his way
as he came through the hall; threw his hat on the table
with most violent emphasis, and pulling out his box,
took three huge pinches of snuff, and threw a fourth
into the cat's eyes as he sat purring his astonishment by
the fire-side. This was enough to set the body politic
going; Mrs. Cockloft began my dearing it as fast as
tongue could move; the young ladies took each a stand
at an elbow of his chair: Jeremy marshalled in rear;
the servants came tumbling in; the mastiff put up an
inquiring
nose; and even grimalkin, after he had cleansed
his whiskers and finished sneezing, discovered indubitable
signs of sympathy. After the most affectionate inquiries
on all sides, it turned out that my cousin, in crossing,
the street, had got his silk stockings bespattered with
mud by a coach which it seems belonged to a dashing
gentleman who had formerly supplied the family with
hot rolls and muffins! Mrs. Cockloft thereupon turned
up her eyes, and the young ladies their noses; and it
would have edified a whole congregation to hear the
conversation which took place concerning the insolence
of upstarts, and the vulgarity of would be gentlemen and
ladies, who strive to emerge from low life by dashing
about in carriages to pay a visit two doors off, giving
parties
to people who laugh at them, and cutting all their old
friends.
CONVERSION OF THE AMERICANS.
But
the most important branch of civilization, and which
has most strenuously been extolled, by the zealous and
pious fathers of the Romish Church, is the introduction
of the Christian faith. It was truly a sight that might
well inspire horror, to behold these savages, stumbling
among the dark mountains of paganism, and guilty of
the most horrible ignorance of religion. It is true, they
neither stole nor defrauded; they were sober, frugal,
continent, and faithful to their word; but though they
acted right habitually, it was all in vain, unless they
acted so from precept. The new comers therefore used
every method to induce them to embrace and practise
the true religionexcept indeed that of setting them the
example.
But notwithstanding all these complicated labours for
their good, such was the unparalleled obstinacy of these
stubborn wretches, that they ungratefully refused to
acknowledge
the strangers as their benefactors, and
persisted
in disbelieving the doctrines they endeavoured to
inculcate
;
most insolently alleging that from their conduct,
the advocates of Christianity did not seem to believe in
it themselves. Was not this too much for human
patience
?would
not one suppose, that the benign visitants
from Europe, provoked at their incredulity, and
disconraged
,
by their stiff-necked obstinacy, would forever have
abandoned their shores, and consigned them to their
original
ignorance and misery? But noso zealous were
they to effect the temporal comfort and eternal salvation
of these pagan infidels, that they even proceeded from
the milder means of persuasion to the more painful and
troublesome one of persecutionlet loose among them
whole troops of fiery monks and furious blood-hounds
purified
them by fire and sword, by stake and faggot; in
consequence
of which indefatigable measures the cause of
Christian love and charity was so rapidly advanced that,
in a very few years not one fifth of the number of
unbelievers
existed in South America, that were found there
at the time of its discovery.
What stronger right need the European settlers
advance
to the country than this? Have not whole nations
of uninformed savages been made acquainted with a
thousand imperious wants and indispensable comforts, of
which they were before wholly ignorant? Have they
not been literally hunted and smoked out of the dens and
lurking places of ignorance and infidelity, and absolutely
scourged into the right path? Have not the temporal
things, the vain baubles and filthy lucre of this world,
which were too apt to engage their worldly and selfish
thoughts, been benevolently taken from them; and have
they not instead thereof, been taught to set their
affections
on things above? And, finally, to use the words of
a Reverend Spanish Father, in a letter to his superior in
SpainCan any one have the presumption to say, that
these savage Pagans have yielded any thing more than an
inconsiderable recompense to their benefactors, in
surrendering
to them a little pitiful tract of this dirty sublunary
planet, in exchange for a glorious inheritance in the
kingdom
of Heaven!
Here, then, are three complete and undeniable sources
of right established, any one of which was more than am
ple to establish a property in the newly discovered regions
of America. Now, so it has happened in certain parts
of this delightful quarter of the globe that the right of
discovery has been so strenuously asserted, the influence
of cultivation so industriously extended, and the progress
of salvation and civilization so zealously prosecuted; that,
what with their attendant wars, persecutions, oppressions,
diseases, and other partial evils that often hang on the
skirts of great benefits, the savage aborigines have, some
how or another, been utterly annihilated; and this all at
once brings me to a fourth right, which is worth all the
others put together; for the original claimants to the soil
being all dead and buried, and no one remaining to
inherit
or dispute the soil, the Spaniards as the next
immediate
occupants, entered upon the possession as clearly as
the hangman succeeds to the clothes of the malefactor
and as they have Blackstone,
[11]
[11]
Bl. Com. b. ii. c. 1.
and all the learned
expounders
of the law on their side, they may set all actions of
ejectment at defianceand this last right may be entitled
the RIGHT BY EXTERMINATION, or in other words the
RIGHT BY GUNPOWDER.
But, lest any scruples of conscience should remain on
this head, and to settle the question of right for ever, his
holiness Pope Alexander VI. issued a mighty bull, by
which he generously granted the newly discovered
quarter
of the globe to the Spaniards and Portuguese; who,
thus having law and gospel on their side, and being
inflamed
with great spiritual zeal, showed the Pagan
savages
neither favour nor affection, but prosecuted the work
of discovery, colonization, civilization, and extermination,
with ten times more fury than ever.
Thus were the European worthies who first discovered
America clearly entitled to the soil; and not only entitled
to the soil, but likewise to the eternal thanks of these
infidel savages, for having come so far, endured so many
perils by sea and land, and taken such unwearied pains,
for no other purpose but to improve their forlorn,
uncivilized
,
and heathenish conditionfor having made them
acquainted with the comforts of lifefor having
introduced
among them the light of religion; and finally, for
having hurried them out of the world, to enjoy its
reward
!
TOM STRADDLE.
Will's
great crony for some time was Tom Straddle,
to whom he really took a great liking. Straddle had
just arrived in an importation of hardware, fresh from
the city of Birmingham, or rather as the most learned
English would call it
Brummagen
, so famous for its
manufactories of gimlets, pen-knives, and pepper-boxes,
and where they make buttons and beaux enough to
inundate
our whole country. He was a young man of
considerable standing in the manufactory at Birmingham;
sometimes had the honour to hand his master's daughter
into a tim-whisky, was the oracle of the tavern he
frequented
on Sundays, and could beat all his associates, if
you would take his word for it, in boxing,
beer-drinking
,
jumping over chairs, and imitating cats in a gutter,
and opera-singers. Straddle was, moreover, a member
of a catch-club, and was a great hand at ringing
bob-majors
;
he was, of course, a complete connoisseur in music,
and entitled to assume that character at all performances
in the art. He was likewise a member of a
spouting-club
;
had seen a company of strolling actors perform in
a barn, and had even, like Abel Drugger, enacted the
part of Major Sturgeon with considerable applause; he
was consequently a profound critic, and fully authorized
to turn up his nose at any American performances. He
had twice partaken of annual dinners, given to the head
manufacturers at Birmingham, where he had the good
fortune to get a taste of turtle and turbot, and a smack
of Champaign and Burgundy; and he had heard a vast
deal of the roast beef of Old England;he was
therefore
epicure sufficient to dn every dish and every glass
of wine he tasted in America, though at the same time
he was as voracious an animal as ever crossed the
Atlantic
.
Straddle had been splashed half a dozen times by
the carriages of nobility, and had once the superlative
felicity of being kicked out of doors by the footman of a
noble duke; he could, therefore, talk of nobility, and
despise
the untitled plebeians of America. In short,
Straddle
was one of those dapper, bustling, florid, round,
self-important
gemmen
, who bounce upon us half-beau,
half-button-maker; undertake to give us the true polish
of the
bon-ton
and endeavour to inspire us with a
proper
and dignified contempt of our native country.
Straddle was quite in raptures when his employers
determined to send him to America as an agent. He
considered himself as going among a nation of barbarians,
where he could be received as a prodigy: he anticipated,
with a proud satisfaction, the bustle and confusion his
arrival would occasion; the crowd that would throng to
gaze at him as he passed through the streets; and had
little doubt but that he should excite as much curiosity
as an Indian chief or a Turk in the streets of
Birmingham
.
He had heard of the beauty of our women, and
chuckled at the thought of how completely he should
eclipse their unpolished beaux, and the number of
despairing
lovers that would mourn the hour of his arrival.
I am even informed by Will Wizard, that he put good
store of beads, spike-nails, and looking-glasses in his
trunk, to win the affections of the fair ones as they
paddled
about in their bark canoes. The reason Will gave
for this error of Straddle's respecting our ladies was, that
he had read in Guthrie's Geography that the aborigines
of America were all savages; and not exactly
understanding
the word aborigines, he applied to one of his
fellow-apprentices, who assured him that it was the Latin
word for inhabitants.
Wizard used to tell another anecdote of Straddle,
which always put him in a passion:Will swore that
the captain of the ship told him, that when Straddle
heard they were off the banks of Newfoundland, he
insisted
upon going on shore there to gather some good
cabbages
,
of which he was excessively fond. Straddle,
however, denied all this, and declared it to be a
mischievous
quiz of Will Wizard, who indeed often made
himself
merry at his expense. However this may be,
certain
it is he kept his tailor and shoemaker constantly
employed
for a month before his departure; equipped
himself
with a smart crooked stick about eighteen inches long,
a pair of breeches of most unheard-of length, a little short
pair of Hoby's white-topt boots, that seemed to stand
on tiptoe to reach his breeches, and his hat had the true
transatlantic declination towards his right ear. The fact
wasnor did he make any secret of ithe was determined
to
astonish the natives a few!
Straddle was not a little disappointed on his arrival,
to find the Americans were rather more civilized than
he had imagined:he was suffered to walk to his
lodgings
unmolested by a crowd, and even unnoticed by a
single individual;no love-letters came pouring in
upon
him;no rivals lay in wait to assassinate him;his
very dress excited no attention, for there were many fools
dressed equally ridiculous with himself. This was
mortifying
indeed to an aspiring youth, who had come out
with the idea of astonishing and captivating. He was
equally unfortunate in his pretentions to the character
of critic, connoisseur and boxer; he condemned our whole
dramatic corps, and every thing appertaining to the
theatre; but his critical abilities were ridiculed;he
found fault with old Cockloft's dinner, not even sparing
his wine, and was never invited to the house afterwards;
he scoured the streets at night and was cudgelled by a
sturdy watchman;he hoaxed an honest mechanic, and
was soundly kicked. Thus disappointed in all his
attempts
at notoriety, Straddle hit on the expedient which
was resorted to by the Giblets;he determined to take
the town by storm. He accordingly bought horses and
equipages, and forthwith made a furious dash at style in
a gig and tandem.
As Straddle's finances were but limited, it may easily
be supposed that his fashionable career infringed a little
upon his consignments, which was indeed the casefor
to use a true cockney phrase,
Brummagen suffered
. But
this was a circumstance that made little impression upon
Straddle, who was now a lad of spiritand lads of
spirit
alway despise the sordid cares of keeping another man's
money. Suspecting this circumstance, I never could
witness
any of his exhibitions of style without some
whimsical
association of ideas. Did he give an entertainment
to a host of guzzling friends, I immediately fancied them
gormandizing heartily at the expense of poor Birmingham,
and swallowing a consignment of hand-saws and razors.
Did I behold him dashing through Broadway in his gig,
I saw him, in my mind's eye, driving tandem on a
nest of tea-boards; nor could I ever contemplate his
cockney exhibitions of horsemanship, but my
mischievous
imagination would picture him spurring a cask of
hardware, like rosy Bacchus bestriding a beer-barrel, or
the little gentleman who be-straddles the world in the
front of Hutching's Almanack.
Straddle was equally successful with the Giblets, as
may well be supposed; for though pedestrian merit may
13
strive in vain to become fashionable in Gotham, yet a
candidate in an equipage is always recognized, and like
Philip's ass, laden with gold will gain admittance every
where. Mounted in his curricle or his gig, the
candidate
is like a statue elevated on a high pedestal; his merits
are discernable from afar, and strike the dullest optics.
Oh! Gotham, Gotham! most enlightened of cities! how
does my heart swell with delight when I behold your
sapient inhabitants lavishing their attention with such
wonderful discernment!
Thus Straddle became quite a man of ton, and was
caressed, and courted, and invited to dinners and balls.
Whatever was absurd or ridiculous in him before was
now declared to be the style. He criticized our theatre,
and was listened to with reverence. He pronounced our
musical entertainments barbarous; and the judgment of
Apollo himself would not have been more decisive. He
abused our dinners; and the god of eating, if there be
any such deity, seemed to speak through his organs. He
became at once a man of tastefor he put his
malediction
on every thing; and his arguments were
conclusive
for
he supported every assertion with a bet. He
was likewise pronounced by the learned in the
fashionable
world a young man of great research and deep
observation
,for
he had sent home, as natural curiosities,
an ear of Indian corn, a pair of moccasons, a belt of
wampum, and a four-leafed clover. He had taken great
pains to enrich this curious collection with an Indian, and
a cataract, but without success. In fine, the people talked
of Straddle and his equipage, and Straddle talked of his
horses, until it was impossible for the most critical
observer
to pronounce whether Straddle or his horses were
most admired, or whether Straddle admired himself or his
horses most.
Straddle was now in the zenith of his glory. He
swaggered about parlours and drawing-rooms with the
same unceremonious confidence he used to display in the
taverns at Birmingham. He accosted a lady as he would
a bar-maid; and this was pronounced a certain proof
that he had been used to better company in Birmingham.
He became the great man of all the taverns between
New-York and Harlem; and no one stood a chance of
being accommodated until Straddle and his horses were
perfectly satisfied. He dd the landlords and waiters,
with the best air in the world, and accosted them with
gentlemanly familiarity. He staggered from the
dinner-table
to the play, entered the box like a tempest, stayed
long enough to be bored to death, and to bore all those
who had the misfortune to be near him. From thence
he dashed off to a ball, time enough to flounder through
a cotilion, tear half a dozen gowns, commit a number of
other depredations, and make the whole company
sensible
of his infinite condescension in coming amongst them.
The people of Gotham thought him a prodigious fine
fellow
;
the young bucks cultivated his acquaintance with
the most persevering assiduity, and his retainers were
sometimes complimented with a seat in his curricle, or a
ride on one of his fine horses. The belles were delighted
with the attentions of such a fashionable gentleman, and
struck with astonishment at his learned distinctions
between
wrought scissors and those of cast steel: together
with his profound dissertations on buttons and horse-flesh.
The rich merchants courted his acquaintance because he
was an Englishman, and their wives treated him with
great deference because he had come from beyond seas.
I cannot help here observing that your saltwater is a
marvellous great sharpener of men's wits, and I intend to
recommend it to some of my acquaintance in a
particular
essay.
Straddle continued his brilliant career for only a short
time. His prosperous journey over the turnpike of
fashion
was checked by some of those stumbling-blocks in
the way of aspiring youth called creditorsor duns:a
race of people who as a celebrated writer observes, are
hated by the gods and men. Consignments slackened,
whispers of distant suspicion floated in the dark, and
those pests of society the tailors and shoemakers, rose in
rebellion against Straddle. In vain were all his
remonstrances
;
in vain did he prove to them, that though he
had given them no money, yet he had given them more
custom, and as many promises as any young man in the
city. They were inflexible; and the signal of danger
being given, a host of other prosecutors pounced upon his
back. Straddle saw there was but one way for it: he
determined to do the thing genteely, to go to smash like
a hero, and dashed into the limits in high style; being
the fifteenth gentleman I have known to drive tandem
to the
ne plus ultra
the dl.
Unfortunate Straddle! may thy fate be a warning to
all young gentlemen who come from Birmingham to
astonish the natives!I should never have taken the
trouble to delineate his character, had he not been a
genuine
Cockney, and worthy to be the representative of his
numerous tribe. Perhaps my simple countrymen may
hereafter be able to distinguish between the real
English
gentlemen and individuals of the cast I have
heretofore
spoken of, as mere mongrels, springing at one
bound from contemptible obscurity at home to daylight
and splendour in this good-natured land. The true-born
and true-bred English gentleman is a character I hold in
great respect; and I love to look back to the period when
our forefathers flourished in the same generous soil, and
hailed each other as brothers. But the Cockney!
when I contemplate him as springing too from the same
source, I feel ashamed of the relationship, and am
tempted
to deny my origin.In the character of Straddle is
traced the complete outline of a true Cockney of English
growth, and a descendant of that individual facetious
character mentioned by Shakespeare, who in pure
kindness to his horse, buttered his hay.
SLEEPY HOLLOW.
In
the bosom of one of those spacious coves which indent
the eastern shore of the Hudson, at that broad expansion
of the river denominated by the ancient Dutch navigators
the Tappan Zee, and where they always prudently
shortened
sail, and implored the protection of St. Nicholas
when they crossed, there lies a small market-town or
rural port, which by some is called Greensburgh, but
which is more generally and properly known by the name
of Tarry Town. This name was given, we are told, in
former days, by the good house-wives of the adjacent
country, from the inveterate propensity of their husbands
to linger about the village tavern on market days. Be
that as it may, I do not vouch for the fact, but merely
advert to it, for the sake of being precise and authentic.
Not far from this village, perhaps about three miles, there
is a little valley, or rather lap of land, among high hills,
which is one of the quietest places in the whole world. A
small brook glides through it, with just murmur enough
to lull one to repose; and the occasional whistle of a quail,
or tapping of a woodpecker, is almost the only sound that
ever breaks in upon the uniform tranquillity.
I recollect that, when a stripling, my first exploit in
squirrel shooting was in a grove of tall walnut trees that
shades one side of the valley. I had wandered into it
at noon time, when all nature is peculiarly quiet, and
was startled by the roar of my own gun, as it broke the
sabbath stillness around, and was prolonged and
reverberated
by the angry echoes. If ever I should wish for a
retreat, whither I might steal from the world and its
distractions, and dream quietly away the remnant of a
troubled life, I know of none more promising than this
little valley.
From the listless repose of the place, and the peculiar
character of its inhabitants, who are descendants from
the original Dutch settlers, this sequestered glen has long
been known by the name of
Sleepy Hollow
, and its
rustic lads are called the Sleepy Hollow Boys
throughout
all the neighbouring country. A drowsy, dreamy
influence seems to hang over the land, and to pervade the
very atmosphere. Some say that the place was bewitched
by a high German doctor during the early days of the
settlement; others, that an old Indian chief, the prophet
or wizard of his tribe, held his powwows there before
the country was discovered by Master Hendrick Hudson.
Certain it is, the place still continues under the sway of
some witching power, that holds a spell over the minds
of the good people, causing them to walk in a continual
reverie. They are given to all kinds of marvellous
beliefs
;
are subject to trances and visions; and frequently
see strange sights, and hear music and voices in the air.
The whole neighbourhood abounds with local tales,
haunted spots, and twilight superstitions; stars shoot and
meteors glare oftener across the valley than in any other
part of the country, and the night-mare, with her whole
nine fold, seems to make it the favourite scene of her
gambols
.
The dominant spirit, however, that haunts this
enchanted
region, and seems to be commander-in-chief of
all the powers of the air, is the apparition of a figure on
horseback without a head. It is said by some to be
the ghost of a Hessian trooper, whose head had been
carried
away by a cannon ball, in some nameless battle
during
the revolutionary war; and who is ever and anon
13*
seen by the country folk, hurrying along in the gloom of
night, as if on the wings of the wind. His haunts are
not confined to the valley, but extend at times to the
adjacent
roads, and especially to the vicinity of a church
that is at no great distance. Indeed, certain of the most
authentic historians of those parts, who have been careful
in collecting and collating the floating facts concerning
this spectre, allege that, the body of the trooper having
been burried in the church-yard, the ghost rides forth to
the scene of battle in nightly quest of his head; and that
the rushing speed with which he sometimes passes along
the Hollow, like a midnight blast, is owing to his being
belated, and in a hurry to get back to the church-yard
before day-break.
Such is the general purport of this legendary
superstition
,
which has furnished materials for many a wild story
in that region of shadows; and the spectre is known, at
all the country firesides, by the name of the Headless
Horseman of Sleepy Hollow.
It is remarkable that the visionary propensity I have
mentioned is not confined to the native inhabitants of
the valley, but is unconsciously imbibed by every one
who resides there for a time. However wide awake they
may have been before they entered that sleepy region,
they are sure, in a little time, to inhale the witching
influence
of the air, and begin to grow imaginativeto
dream dreams, and see apparitions.
I mention this peaceful spot with all possible laud; for
it is in such little retired Dutch valleys, found here and
there, embosomed in the great state of New York, that
population
,
manners, and customs, remain fixed; while the
great torrent of migration and improvement, which is
making such incessant changes in other parts of this
restless
country, sweeps by them unobserved. They are like
those little nooks of still water which border a rapid
stream; where we may see the straw and bubble riding
quietly at anchor, or slowly revolving in their mimic
harbour
,
undisturbed by the rush of the passing current.
Though many years have elapsed since I trod the drowsy
shades of Sleepy Hollow, yet I question whether I should
not still find the same trees and the same families
vegetating
in its sheltered bosom.
ICHABOD CRANE.
In
this by-place of nature there abode, in a remote
period of American history, that is to say, some thirty
years since, a worthy wight of the name of Ichabod
Crane; who sojourned, or, as he expressed it, tarried,
in Sleepy Hollow, for the purpose of instructing the
children
of the vicinity. He was a native of Connecticut:
a state which supplies the Union with pioneers for the
mind as well as for the forest, and sends forth yearly its
legions of frontier woodmen and country schoolmasters.
The cognomen of Crane was not inapplicable to his
person
.
He was tall, but exceedingly lank, with narrow
shoulders, long arms and legs, hands that dangled a mile
out of his sleeves, feet that might have served for shovels,
and his whole frame most loosely hung together. His
head was small and flat at top, with huge ears, large
green glassy eyes, and a long snipe nose, so that it looked
like a weathercock, perched upon his spindle neck, to tell
which way the wind blew. To see him striding along
the profile of a hill on a windy day, with his clothes
bagging
and fluttering about him, one might have mistaken
him for the genius of famine descending upon the earth,
or some scarecrow eloped from a cornfield.
His school-room was a low building of one large room,
rudely constructed of logs; the windows partly glazed,
and partly patched with leaves of old copy books. It
was most ingeniously secured at vacant hours, by a withe
twisted in the handle of the door, and stakes set against
the window shutters; so that though a thief might get
in with perfect ease, he would find some embarrassment
in getting out; an idea most probably borrowed by the
architect, Yost Van Houten, from the mystery of an
eelpot
.
The school-house stood in a rather lonely but
pleasant
situation, just at the foot of a woody hill, with a
brook running close by, and a formidable birch tree
growing
at one end of it. From hence the low murmur of
his pupils' voices, conning over their lessons, might be
heard in a drowsy summer's day, like the hum of a
beehive
;
interrupted now and then by the authoritative
voice of the master, in a tone of menace or command;
or, peradventure, by the appalling sound of the birch, as
he urged some tardy loiterer along the flowery path of
knowledge. Truth to say, he was a conscientious man,
that ever bore in mind the golden maxim, Spare the
rod and spoil the child.Ichabod Crane's scholars
certainly
were not spoiled.
I would not have it imagined, however, that he was
one of those cruel potentates of the school, who joy in the
smart of their subjects; on the contrary he administered
justice with discrimination rather than severity; taking
the burthen off the backs of the weak, and laying it on
those of the strong. Your mere puny stripling, that
winced at the least flourish of the rod, was passed by with
indulgence; but the claims of justice were satisfied, by
inflicting a double portion on some little, tough,
wrong-headed
,
broad-skirted Dutch urchin, who skulked and
swelled, and grew dogged, and sullen beneath the birch.
All this he called doing his duty by their parents;
and he never inflicted a chastisement, without following
it by the assurance, so consolatory to the smarting urchin,
that he would remember it and thank him for it the
longest day he had to live.
When school hours were over, he was even the
companion
and playmate of the larger boys; and on holyday
afternoons would convoy some of the smaller ones home,
who happened to have pretty sisters, or good housewives
for mothers, noted for the comforts of the cupboard.
Indeed
it behoved him to keep on good terms with his
pupils
.
The revenue arising from his school was small,
and would have been scarcely sufficient to furnish
him with daily bread, for he was a huge feeder, and
though lank, had the dilating powers of an Anaconda;
but to help out his maintainance, he was, according to
country custom in those parts, boarded and lodged at the
houses of the farmers, whose children he instructed.
With these he lived successively a week at a time; thus
going the rounds of the neighbourhood, with all his
worldly effects tied up in a cotton handkerchief.
That all this might not be too onerous on the purses
of his rustic patrons, who are apt to consider the costs
of schooling a grievous burden, and schoolmasters, as mere
drones, he had various ways of rendering himself both
useful
and agreeable. He assisted the farmers occasionally in
the lighter labours of their farms; helped to make hay;
mended the fences; took the horses to water; drove the
cows from pasture; and cut wood for the winter fire.
He laid aside, too, all the dominant dignity and absolute
sway with which he lorded it in his little empire, the
school, and become wonderfully gentle and ingratiating.
He found favour in the eyes of the mothers, by petting
the children, particularly the youngest; and like the
lion bold, which whilome so magnanimously the lamb
did hold, he would sit with a child on one knee and
rock a cradle for whole hours together.
In addition to his other vocations, he was the
singing-master
of the neighbourhood, and picked up many bright
shillings by instructing the young folks in psalmody.
It was a matter of no little vanity to him on Sundays,
to take his station in front of the church gallery, with a
band of chosen singers; where, in his own mind, he
completely
carried away the palm from the parson. Certain
it is, his voice resounded far above all the rest of the
congregation; and there are peculiar quivers still to be
heard in that church, and may still be heard half-a-mile
off, quite to the opposite side of the mill-pond, on a still
Sunday morning, which are said to be legitimately
descended
from the nose of Ichabod Crane. Thus, by divers
little makeshifts, in that ingenious way which is
commonly
denominated by hook and by crook, the worthy
pedagogue got on tolerably enough, and was thought, by
all who understood nothing of the labour of headwork, to
have a wonderful easy life of it.
SUPERSTITION.
But
all these were nothing to the tales of ghosts and
apparitions
that succeeded. The neighbourhood is rich in
legendary treasures of the kind. Local tales and
superstitions
thrive best in these sheltered long settled retreats;
but are trampled under foot by the shifting throng that
forms the population of most of our country places.
Besides
there is no encouragement for ghosts in most of our
villages, for they have scarcely had time to finish their
first nap, and turn themselves in their graves, before their
surviving friends have travelled away from the
neighbourhood
;
so that when they turn out at night to walk their
rounds, they have no acquaintance left to call upon. This
is perhaps the reason why we so seldom hear of ghosts
except
in our long established Dutch communities.
The immediate cause, however, of the prevalence of
supernatural stories in these parts, was doubtless owing
to the vicinity of Sleepy Hollow. There was a
contagion
in the very air that blew from that haunted region;
it breathed forth an atmosphere of dreams and fancies
infecting all the land. Several of the Sleepy Hollow
people
were present at Van Tassal's, and, as usual, were
doling
out their wild and wonderful legends. Many dismal
G 2
tales were told about funeral trains, and mourning cries
and wailings heard and seen about the great tree where the
unfortunate Major Andre was taken, and which stood in
the neighbourhood. Some mention was made also of the
woman in white, that haunted the dark glen at Raven
Rock, and was often heard to shriek on winter nights
before
a storm, having perished there in the snow. The
chief part of the stories, however, turned upon the
favourite
spectre of Sleepy Hollow, the headless horseman,
who had been heard several times of late, patrolling the
country; and, it was said, tethered his horse nightly
among the graves in the churchyard.
The sequestered situation of this church seems always
to have made it a favoured haunt of troubled spirits. It
stands on a knoll, surrounded by locust trees and lofty
elms, from among which, its decent whitewashed walls
shine modestly forth, like Christian purity, beaming
through the shades of retirement. A gentle slope
descends
from it to a silver sheet of water, bordered by
high trees, between which, peeps may be caught at the
blue hills of the Hudson. To look upon its grass grown
yard, there the sunbeams seem to sleep so quietly, one
would think that there at least the dead might rest in
peace. On one side of the church extends a wide woody
dell, along which raves a large brook among broken rocks
and trunks of fallen trees. Over a deep black part of
the stream, not far from the church, was formerly thrown
a wooden bridge; the road that led to it, and the bridge
itself, were thickly shaded by overhanging trees, which
cast a gloom about it, even in the day-time; but
occasioned
a fearful darkness at night. Such was one of the
favourite haunts of the headless horseman, and the place
where he was most frequently encountered. The tale
was told of old Brouwer, a most heretical disbeliever in
ghosts, how he met the horseman returning from his
foray
into Sleepy Hollow, and was obliged to get up behind
him; how they galloped over bush and brake, over hill
and swamp, until they reached the bridge; when the
horseman suddenly turned into a skeleton, threw old
Brouwer into the brook, and sprang away over the tree
tops with a clap of thunder.
THE BROKEN HEART.
It
is a common practice with those who have outlived
the susceptibility of early feeling, or have been brought
up in the gay heartlessness of dissipated life, to laugh at
all love stories, and to treat the tales of romantic passion
as mere fictions of novelists and poets. My observations
on human nature have induced me to think otherwise.
They have convinced me, that however the surface of the
character may be chilled and frozen by the cares of the
world, or cultivated into mere smiles by the arts of
society
,
still there are dormant fires lurking in the depths of
the coldest bosom, which, when once enkindled, become
impetuous, and are sometimes desolating in their effects.
Indeed, I am a true believer in the blind deity, and go to
the full extent of his doctrines. Shall I confess it!I
believe in broken hearts, and the possibility of dying of
disappointed love. I do not, however, consider it a
malady
often fatal to my own sex; but I firmly believe
that it withers down many a lovely woman into an early
grave.
Man is the creature of interest and ambition. His
nature
leads him forth into the struggle and bustle of the
world. Love is but the embellishment of his early life,
or a song piped in the intervals of the acts. He seeks for
fame, for fortune, for space in the world's thought, and
dominion
over his fellow men. But a woman's whole life
is a history of the affections. The heart is her world: it is
there her ambition strives for empires; it is there her
avarice seeks for hidden treasures. She sends forth her
sympathies on adventure; she embarks her whole soul in
the traffic of affection; and if shipwrecked, her case is
hopeless
for
it is a bankruptcy of the heart.
To a man the disappointment of love may occasion some
bitter pangs: it wounds some feelings of tendernessit
blasts some prospects of felicity; but he is an active being
he may dissipate his thoughts in the whirl of varied
occupation
,
or may plunge into the tide of pleasure; or, if the
scene of disappointment be too full of painful associations,
he can shift his abode at will, and taking as it were the
wings of the morning, can fly to the uttermost parts of
the earth, and be at rest.
But woman's is comparatively a fixed, a secluded, and a
meditative life. She is more the companion of her own
thoughts and feelings; and if they are turned to ministers
of sorrow, where shall she look for consolation? Her lot
is to be wooed and won; and if unhappy in her love, her
heart is like some fortress that has been captured, and
sacked, and abandoned and left desolate.
How many bright eyes grow dimhow many soft
cheeks grow palehow many lovely forms fade away into
the tomb, and none can tell the cause that blighted their
loveliness! As the dove will clasp its wings to its side,
and cover and conceal the arrow that is preying on
its vitals, so it is the nature of woman to hide from the
world the pangs of wounded affection. The love of a
delicate female is always shy and silent. Even when
fortunate, she scarcely breathes it to herself; but when
otherwise, she buries it in the recesses of her bosom, and
there lets it cower and brood among the ruins of her peace.
With her the desire of the heart has failed. The great
charm of existence is at an end. She neglects all the
cheerful excercises which gladden the spirits, quicken the
pulses, and send the tide of life in healthful currents
through the veins. Her rest is brokenthe sweet
refreshment
of sleep is poisoned by melancholy dreams
dry sorrow drinks her blood, until her enfeebled frame
sinks under the slightest external injury. Look for her,
after a little while, and you will find friendship weeping
over her untimely grave, and wondering that one who
but lately glowed with all the radiance of health and
beauty, should so speedily be brought down to
darkness
and the worm. You will be told of some wintry
chill, some casual indisposition, that laid her low;but
no one knows of the mental malady that previously
sapped
her strength, and made her so easy a prey to the
spoiler.
She is like some tender tree, the pride and beauty of
the grove; graceful in its form, bright in its foliage, but
with the worm preying at its heart. We find it
suddenly
withering, when it should be most fresh and
luxuriant
.
We see it drooping its branches to the earth, and
shedding leaf by leaf; until, wasted and perished away,
it falls even in the stillness of the forest; and, as we muse
over the beautiful ruin, we strive in vain to recollect the
blast or thunderbolt that could have smitten it with
decay
.
I have seen many instances of women running to waste
and self-neglect, and disappearing gradually from the
earth, almost as if they had been exhaled to heaven; and
have repeatedly fancied that I could trace their death
through the various declensions of consumption, cold,
debility
,
languor, melancholy, until I reached the first
sympton
of disappointed love. But an instance of the kind
was lately told to me; the circumstances are well known
in the country where they happened, and I shall but give
them in the manner as they were related.
Every one must recollect the tragical story of young
E, the Irish patriot; it was too touching to be soon
forgotten. During the troubles in Ireland he was tried,
condemned, and executed on a charge of treason. His
fate made a deep impression on public sympathy. He
was so youngso intelligentso generousso braveso
every thing that we are apt to like in a young man. His
conduct under trial, too, was so lofty and intrepid. The
noble indignation with which he repelled the charge of
treason against his countrythe eloquent vindication of
his nameand his pathetic appeal to posterity, in the
hopeless hour of condemnationall these entered deeply
into every generous bosom, and even his enemies lamented
the stern policy that dictated his execution.
[12]
[12]
This ill-starred youth was the son of Dr. Emmet, a gentleman
of fortune and family, whose mind was deeply imbued with
republican
principles, which he was but too successful in impressing upon
his children. His eldest son, Thomas Addis Emmit, being a suspected
character, in 1798 he accepted the terms offered by Government,
and retired to France, from thence he proceeded to New-York,
where he held the first place at the bar of that city, highly respected
as a lawyer and esteemed as a man. Robert, the person alluded to
by our author, either possessing more enthusiasm or less prudence
than his brother, became involved in a series of insurrections, which
at last attracted the attention of Government, and the unfortunate
man was arrested while he lingered in his flight, in expectation of
a last meeting with the lady to whom he was engaged. This amiable
female, whose hard fate is described with so much pathos by our
author, was the daughter of the celebrated John Philpot Curran.
The following address was delivered by Emmet on his trial.
14
But there was one heart, whose anguish it would be
impossible to describe. In happier days and fairer
fortunes
,
he had won the affections of a beautiful and
interesting
girl, the daughter of a late celebrated Irish barrister.
She loved him with the disinterested fervour of a
woman's
first and early love. When every worldly maxim
arrayed itself against him; when blasted in fortune, and
disgrace and danger darkened around his name, she
loved
him the more ardently for his very sufferings. If,
then, his fate could awaken the sympathy even of his
foes, what must have been the agony of her, whose whole
soul was occupied by his image! Let those tell who have
had the portals of the tomb suddenly closed between them
and the being they most loved on earthwho have sat
at its threshold, as one shut out in a cold and lonely
world, from whence all that was most lovely and loving
had departed.
But then the horrors of such a grave! so frightful, so
dishonoured! There was nothing for memory to dwell
on that could sooth the pang of separationnone of
those tender, though melancholy circumstances, that
endear
the parting scenenothing to melt sorrow into
those blessed tears, sent, like the dews of heaven, to
revive
the heart in the parting hour of anguish.
To render her widowed situation more desolate, she
had incurred her father's displeasure by her unfortunate
attachment, and was an exile from the paternal roof.
But could the sympathy and kind offices of friends have
reached a spirit so shocked and driven in by horror, she
would have experienced no want of consolation, for the
Irish are a people of quick and generous sensibilities.
The most delicate and cherishing attentions were paid her
by families of wealth and distinction. She was led into
society, and they tried by all kinds of occupation and
amusement to dissipate her grief, and wean her from the
tragical story of her loves. But it was all in vain.
There are some strokes of calamity that scathe and scorch
the soulthat penetrate to the vital seat of happiness
and blast it, never again to put forth bud or blossom.
She never objected to frequent the haunts of pleasure,
but she was as much alone there as in the depths of
solitude
.
She walked about in a sad reverie, apparently
unconscious
of the world around her. She carried with
her an inward woe that mocked at all the blandishments
of friendship, and heeded not the song of the charmer,
charm he never so wisely.
The person who told me her story had seen her at a
masquerade. There can be no exhibition of far-gone
wretchedness more striking and painful than to meet it
in such a scene. To find it wandering like a spectre,
lonely and joyless, where all around is gayto see it
dressed out in the trappings of mirth, and looking so wan
and woe-begone, as if it had tried in vain to cheat the
poor heart into a momentary forgetfulness of sorrow.
After strolling through the splendid rooms and giddy
crowd with an air of utter abstraction, she sat herself
down on the steps of an orchestra, and looking about for
some time with a vacant air, that showed her
insensibility
to the garish scene, she began, with the
capriciousness
of a sickly heart, to warble a little plaintive air.
She had an exquisite voice; but on this occasion it was
so simple, so touching, it breathed forth such a soul of
wretchedness, that she drew a crowd mute and silent around
her, and melted every one into tears.
The story of one so true and so tender could not but
excite
great interest in a country remarkable for
enthusiasm
.
It completely won the heart of a brave officer,
who paid his addresses to her, and thought that one so
true to the dead could not but prove affectionate to the
living. She declined his attentions, for her thoughts
were irrevocably engrossed by the memory of her former
lover. He, however, persisted in his suit. He solicited
not her tenderness, but her esteem. He was assisted by
her conviction of his worth, and her sense of her own
destitute and dependent situation, for she was existing
on the kindness of friends. In a word, he at length
succeeded
in gaining her hand, though with the solemn
assurance
,
that her heart was unalterably another's.
He took her with him to Sicily, hoping that a change
of scene might wear out the remembrance of early woes.
She was an amiable and exemplary wife, and made an
effort
to be a happy one; but nothing could cure the silent
and devouring melancholy that had entered into her very
soul. She wasted away in a slow, but hopeless
decline
,
and at length sunk into the grave, the victim of a
broken heart.
[13]
[13]
It was on her, says our Author, that Moore, the distinguished
Irish Poet, composed the following lines:
`I am asked if I have any thing to say why sentence of death
should not be pronounced upon me. Was I to suffer only death,
after
being adjudged guilty, I should bow in silence; but a man in my
situation has not only to combat with the difficulties of fortune, but
also the difficulties of prejudice: the sentence of the law which
delivers
over his body to the executioner consigns his character to
obloquy
.
The man dies, but his memory lives; and that mine may
not forfeit all claim to the respect of my countrymen, I use this
occasion
to vindicate myself from some of the charges advanced against
me.
`I am charged with being an emissary of France'tis false! I am
no emissaryI did not wish to deliver up my country to a foreign
power, and least of all, to France. No! never did I entertain the
idea of establishing French power in IrelandGod forbid. On the
contrary, it is evident from the introductory paragraph of the address
of the Provisional Government, that every hazard attending an
independent
effort was deemed preferable to the more fatal risk of
introducing
a French army into the country. Small would be our claims
to patriotism and to sense, and palpable our affectation of the love
of liberty, if we were to encourage the profanation of our shores by
a people who are slaves themselves, and the unprincipled and
abandoned
instruments of imposing slavery on others.
`If such an inference be drawn from any part of the proclamation
of the Provisional Government, it calumniates their views, and is
not warranted by the fact. How could they speak of freedom to
their countrymen? How assume such an exalted motive, and
meditate
the introduction of a power which has been the enemy of
freedom
in every part of the globe? Reviewing the conduct of France
to other countries, could we expect better towards us? No! Let
not, then, any man attaint my memory by believing that I could
have hoped for freedom through the aid of France, and betrayed
the sacred cause of liberty by committing it to the power of her most
determined foe: had I done so, I had not deserved to live; and
dying
with such a weight upon my character, I had merited the
honest
execrations of that country which gave me birth, and to which
I would have given freedom.
`Had I been in Switzerland. I would have fought against the
Frenchin the dignity of freedom, I would have expired on the
threshold of that country, and they should have entered it only by
passing over my lifeless corpse. Is it then to be supposed that I
would be slow to make the same sacrifice to my native land? Am
I, who lived but to be of service to my country, and who would
subject myself to the bondage of the grave to give her independence
am I to be loaded with the foul and grievous calumny of being an
emissary of France?
`My lords, it may be part of the system of angry justice, to bow a
man's mind, by humiliation to meet the ignominy of the scaffold;
but worse to me than the scaffold's shame, or the scaffold's terrors,
would be the imputation of having been the agent of French
despotism
and ambition; and while I have breath, I will call upon my
countrymen not to believe me guilty of so foul a crime against their
liberties and their happiness.
`Though you, my lord, sit there a judge, and I stand here a
culprit
,
yet you are but a man and I am another. I have a right
therefore
to vindicate my character and motives from the aspersions of
calumny; and, as a man, to whom fame is dearer than life, I will
make the last use of that life in rescuing my name and my memory
from the afflicting imputation of having been an emissary of France,
or seeking her interference in the internal regulation of our affairs.
`Did I live to see a French army approach this country, I would
meet it on the shore, with a torch in one hand and a sword in the
other; I would receive them with all the destruction of war! I
would animate my countrymen to immolate them in their very
boats; and before our native soil should be polluted by a foreign
foe, if they succeeded in landing, I would burn every blade of grass
before them, raze every house, contend to the last for every inch of
ground; and the last spot on which the hope of freedom should
desert
me, that spot I would make my grave! What I cannot do, I
leave a legacy to my country because I feel conscious that my death
were unprofitable, and all hopes of liberty extinct, the moment a
French army obtained a footing in this land. God forbid that I
should see my country under the hands of a foreign power. If the
French should come as a foreign enemy. Oh! my countrymen! meet
them on the shore with a torch in one hand and a sword in the
other: receive them with all the destruction of war; immolate them
in their boats, before our native soil shall be polluted by a foreign
foe! If they succeed in landing, fight them on the strand, burn
every blade of grass before them as they advanceraze every
house; and if you are driven to the centre of your country, collect
your provisions, your property, your wives and your daughters;
form a circle around themfight while but two men are left; and
when but one remains, let that man set fire to the pile, and
release
himself, and the families of his fallen countrymen, from the
tyranny of France.
`My lamp of life is nearly expiredmy race is finished: the grave
opens to receive me, and I sink into its bosom All I request then,
at parting from the world, is the charity of its silence. Let no man
write my epitaph, for as no man, who knows my motives, dare
vindicate
them let not prejudice or ignorance asperse them: let them
and me repose in obscurity and peace, and my tomb remain
uninscribed
,
till other times and other men can do justice to my character.'
She is far from the land where her young hero sleeps,
And lovers around her are sighing;
But coldly she turns from their gaze and weeps.
For her heart in his grave is lying.
She sings the wild songs of her dear native plains,
Every note which he lov'd awaking
Ah! little they think, who delight in her strains,
How the heart of the minstrel is breaking!
He had lived for his lovefor his country he died,
They were all that to life had entwined him
Nor soon shall the tears of his country be dried,
Nor long will his love stay behind him!
Oh! make her a grave where the sun-beams rest,
When they promise a glorious morrow;
They'll shine o'er her sleep like a smile from the west,
From her own lov'd island of sorrow!
14*
A WRECK AT SEA.
We
one day descried some shapeless object drifting at a
distance. At sea, every thing that breaks the monotony
of the surrounding expanse attracts attention. It proved
to be the mast of a ship that must have been completely
wrecked; for there were the remains of handkerchiefs,
by which some of the crew had fastened themselves to
this spar, to prevent their being washed off by the waves.
There was no trace by which the name of the ship could
be ascertained. The wreck had evidently drifted about
for many months; clusters of shell fish had fastened about
it, and long sea weeds flaunted at its sides. But where,
thought I, is the crew? Their struggle has long been
overthey have gone down amidst the roar of the
tempest
their
bones lie whitening among the caverns of the
deep. Silence, oblivion, like the waves, have closed over
them, and no one can tell the story of their end. What
sighs have been wafted after that ship! what prayers
offered
up at the deserted fireside of home! How often has
the mistress, the wife, the mother, pored over the daily
news, to catch some casual intelligence of this rover of the
deep! How has expectation darkened into anxiety
anxiety into dreadand dread into despair! Alas! not
one memento shall ever return for love to cherish. All
that shall ever be known, is, that she sailed from her port,
and was never heard of more!
The sight of this wreck, as usual, gave rise to many
dismal anecdotes. This was particularly the case in the
evening, when the weather which had hitherto been fair,
began to look wild and threatening, and gave indications of
one of those sudden storms that will sometimes break in
upon the serenity of a summer voyage. As we sat round
the dull light of a lamp in the cabin, that made the gloom
more ghastly, every one had his tale of shipwreck and
disaster. I was particularly struck with a short one
related
by the captain.
As I was sailing, said he, in a fine stout ship,
across the banks of Newfoundland, one of those heavy
fogs that prevail in those parts rendered it impossible for
us to see far ahead even in the day-time; but at night
the weather was so thick that we could not distinguish
any object at twice the length of the ship. I kept lights
at the mast head, and a constant watch forward to look
out for fishing smacks, which are accustomed to lie at
anchor
on the banks. The wind was blowing a smacking
breeze, and we were going at a great rate through the
water. Suddenly the watch gave the thrilling alarm of
`a sail-a-head!'it was scarcely uttered before we were
upon her. She was a small schooner, at anchor, with
her broadside towards us. The crew were all asleep, and
had neglected to hoist a light. We struck her just
a-midships
.
The force, the size, and weight of our vessel bore
her down below the waves; we passed over her and were
hurried on our course. As the crashing wreck was
sinking
beneath us, I had a glimpse of two or three half
naked
wretches rushing from her cabin; they just started
from their beds to be swallowed shrieking by the waves.
I heard their drowning cry mingling with the wind.
The blast that bore it to our ears swept us out of all
further
hearing. I shall never forget that cry! it was
some time before we could put the ship about, she was
under such head-way. We returned, as nearly as we
could guess, to the place where the smack had anchored.
We cruised about for several hours in the dense fog.
We fired signal guns, and listened if we might hear the
halloo of any survivors: but all was silentwe never
saw or heard any thing of them more.
LAND.
It was a fine sunny morning when the thrilling cry of
land! was given from the mast head. None but
those who have experienced it, can form an idea of the
delicious throng of sensations which rush into an
American's
bosom, when he first comes in sight of Europe.
There is a volume of associations with the very name.
It is the land of promise, teeming with every thing of
which his childhood has heard, or on which his studious
years have pondered.
From that time until the moment of arrival, it was
all feverish excitement. The ships of war, that prowled
like guardian giants along the coast; the headlands of
Ireland, stretching out into the channel; the Welsh
mountains
,
towering into the clouds; all were objects of intense
interest. As we sailed up the Mersey, I reconnoitred
the shores with a telescope. My eye dwelt with delight
on neat cottages, with their trim shrubberies and green
grass plots. I saw the mouldering ruin of an abbey
overrun with ivy, and the taper spire of a village church
rising from the brow of a neighbouring hillall were
characteristic of England.
The tide and wind were so favourable, that the ship
was enabled to come at once to the pier. It was thronged
with people; some idle lookers-on, others eager
expectants
of friends or relatives. I could distinguish the
merchant
to whom the ship was consigned. I knew him by
his calculating brow and restless air. His hands were
thrust into his pockets; he was whistling
thoughtfully
,
and walking to and fro, a small space having been
accorded him by the crowd, in deference to his
temporary
importance. There were repeated cheerings and
salutations
interchanged between the shore and ship, as friends
happened to recognize each other. I particularly noticed
one young woman of humble dress, but interesting
demeanour
.
She was leaning forward from among the
crowd; her eye hurried over the ship as it neared the
shore, to catch some wished-for countenance. She
seemed
disappointed and agitated; when I heard a faint voice
call her name.It was from a poor sailor, who had been
ill all the voyage, and had excited the sympathy of every
one on board. When the weather was fine, his
messmates
had spread a mattress for him on deck in the shade,
but of late his illness had so increased, that he had taken
to his hammock, and only breathed a wish that he might
see his wife before he died. He had been helped on deck
as we came up the river, and was now leaning against
the shrouds, with a countenance so wasted, so pale, so
ghastly, that it was no wonder even the eye of
affection
did not recognize him. But at the sound of his
voice, her eye darted on his features; it read, at once, a
whole volume of sorrow; she clasped her hands, uttered
a faint shriek, and stood wringing them in silent agony.
GENIUS.
It
is interesting to notice how some minds seem almost
to create themselves, springing up under every
disadvantage
,
and working their solitary but irresistible way
through a thousand obstacles. Nature seems to delight
in diappointing the assiduities of art, with which it would
rear legitimate dullness to maturity; and to glory in the
vigour and luxuriance of her chance productions. She
scatters the seeds of genius to the winds, and though
some may perish among the stony places of the world, and
some be choaked by the thorns and brambles of early
adversity
,
yet others will now and then strike root even in
the clefts of the rock, struggle bravely up into sunshine,
and spread over their sterile birth-place all the beauties of
vegetation.
A CONTRAST.
I was
yet a stranger in England, and curious to notice
the manners of its fashionable classes. I found, as usual,
that there was the least pretension where there was the
most acknowledged title to respect. I was particularly
struck, for instance, with the family of a nobleman of
high rank, consisting of several sons and daughters.
Nothing could be more simple and unassuming than their
appearance. They generally came to church in the
plainest
equipage, and often on foot. The young ladies would
stop and converse in the kindest manner with the
peasantry
,
caress the children, and listen to the stories of the
humble cottagers. Their countenances were open and
beautifully fair with an expression of high refinement,
but, at the same time, a frank cheerfulness, and an
engaging
affability. Their brothers were tall and elegantly
formed. They were dressed fashionably, but simply;
with strict neatness and propriety, but without any
mannerism
or foppishness. Their whole demeanour was easy
and natural, with that lofty grace, and noble frankness,
which bespeak free-born souls that have never been
checked
in their growth by feelings of inferiority. There is a
healthful hardiness about real dignity, that never dreads
contact and communication with others, however humble,
It is only spurious pride that is morbid and sensitive, and
shrinks from every touch. I was pleased to see the
manner
in which they would converse with the peasantry
about those rural concerns and field-sports, in which the
gentlemen of this country so much delight. In these
conversations, there was neither haughtiness on the one
part, nor servility on the other; and you were only
reminded
of the difference of rank by the habitual respect of the
peasant.
In contrast to these, was the family of a wealthy
citizen
who had amassed a vast fortune; and, having
purchased
the estate and mansion of a ruined nobleman in
the neighbourhood, was endeavouring to assume all the
style and dignity of an hereditary lord of the soil. The
family always come to church
en prince
. They were
rolled majestically along in a carriage emblazoned with
arms. The crest glittered in silver radiance from every
part of the harness where a crest could possibly be placed.
A fat coachman in a three-cornered hat, richly laced, and
a flaxen wig, curling close round his rosy face, was seated
on the box, with a sleek Danish dog beside him. Two
footmen
,
in gorgeous liveries, with huge bouquets, and
gold-headed
canes, lolled behind. The carriage rose and sunk
on its long springs with peculiar stateliness of motion.
The very horses champed their bits, arched their necks,
and glanced their eyes more proudly than common horses;
either because they had got a little of the family feeling,
or were reined up more tightly than ordinary.
I could not but admire the style with which this
splendid
pageant was brought up to the gate of the
church-yard
.
There was a vast effect produced at the turning
of an angle of the wall;a great smacking of the whip;
straining and scrambling of the horses; glistening of
harness
,
and flashing of wheels through gravel. This was
the moment of triumph and vainglory to the coachman.
The horses were urged and checked until they were fretted
into a foam. They threw out their feet in a prancing
trot, dashing about pebbles at every step. The crowd of
villagers, sauntering quietly to church, opened precipitately
to the right and left, gaping in vacant admiration. On
reaching the gate the horses were pulled up with a
suddenness
that produced an immediate stop, and almost threw
them on their haunches.
There was an extraordinary hurry of the footmen to
alight, open the door, pull down the steps, and prepare
every thing for the descent on earth of this august family.
The old citizen first emerged his round red face from out
the door, looking about him with the pompous air of a man
accustomed to rule on 'Change, and shake the Stock
Market
with a nod. His consort, a fine, fleshy, comfortable
dame, followed him. There seemed, I must confess, but
little pride in her composition. She was the picture of a
broad, honest, vulgar enjoyment. The world went well
with her; and she liked the world. She had fine clothes,
a fine house, a fine carriage, fine children, every thing was
fine about her: it was nothing but driving about, and
visiting
and feasting. Life was to her a perpetual revel; it
was one long Lord Mayor's day.
Two daughters succeeded to this goodly couple. They
certainly were handsome; but had a supercilious air, that
chilled admiration, and disposed the spectator to be critical.
They were ultra-fashionable in dress; and, though no one
could deny the richness of their decorations, yet their
appropriateness
might be questioned amidst the simplicity of
a country church. They descended loftily from the
carriage
,
and moved up the line of peasantry with a step that
seemed dainty of the soil it trod on. They cast an
excursive
glance around, that passed coldly over the burly faces
of the peasantry, until they met the eyes of the nobleman's
family, when their countenances immediately brightened
into smiles, and they made the most profound and elegant
courtesies; which were returned in a manner that showed
they were but slight acquaintances.
I must not forget the two sons of this aspiring citizen,
who came to church in a dashing curricle, with outriders.
They were arrayed in the extremity of the mode, with all
that pedantry of dress which marks the man of
questionable
pretensions to style. They kept entirely by themselves,
eyeing every one askance that came near them, as if
measuring
his claims to respectability; yet they were without
conversation, except the exchange of an occasional cant
phrase. They even moved artificially; for their bodies, in
compliance with the caprice of the day, had been disciplined
into the absence of all ease and freedom. Art had done
every thing to accomplish them as men of fashion, but
nature
had denied them the nameless grace. They were
vulgarly
shaped, like men formed for the common purposes of
life, and had that air of supercilious assumption which is
never seen in the true gentleman.
I have been rather minute in drawing the pictures of
these two families, because I considered them specimens of
what is often to be met with in this countrythe
unpretending
great, and the arrogant little. I have no respect
for titled rank, unless it be accompanied with true nobility
of soul; but I have remarked in all countries where
artificial
distinctions exist, that the very highest classes are
always
the most courteous and unassuming. Those who
are well assured of their own standing, are least apt to
trespass
on that of others; whereas, nothing is so offensive as
the aspirings of vulgarity, which thinks to elevate itself by
humiliating its neighbour.
As I have brought these families into contrast, I must
notice
their behaviour in church. That of the nobleman's
family was quiet, serious, and attentive. Not that they
appeared
to have any fervour of devotion, but rather a respect
for sacred things, and sacred places, inseparable from good
breeding. The others, on the contrary, were in a
perpetual
flutter and whisper; they betrayed a continual
consciousness
of finery, and a sorry ambition of being the
wonders
of a rural congregation.
The old gentleman was the only one really attentive to
the service. He took the whole burden of family devotion
upon himself, standing bolt upright and uttering the
responses
with a loud voice that might be heard all over the
church. It was evident that he was one of those thorough
church and king men, who connect the idea of devotion and
loyalty; who consider the Deity, somehow or other, of the
government party, and religion a very excellent sort of
thing, that ought to be countenanced and kept up.
When he joined so loudly in the service, it seemed more
by way of example to the lower orders, to show them, that,
though so great and wealthy, he was not above being
religious
;
as I have seen a turtle-fed Alderman swallow
publicly
a basin of charity soup, smacking his lips at every
mouthful, and pronouncing it excellent food for the poor.
When the service was at an end, I was curious to
witness
the several exits of my groups. The young noblemen
and their sisters, as the day was fine, preferred strolling
home across the fields, chatting with the country people as
they went. The others departed as they came, in grand
parade. Again were the equipages wheeled up to the
gate. There was again the smacking of whips, the
clattering
of hoofs, and the glittering of harness. The horses
started off almost at a bound; the villagers again hurried
to right and left; the wheels threw up a cloud of dust;
and the aspiring family was wrapt out of sight in a
whirlwind
.
LETTER
FROM MUSTAPHA RUB-A-DUB KELI KHAN,
To Asem Hacchem, principal Slave-driver to his Highness
the Bashaw of Tripoli
.
Sweet
, O Asem! is the memory of distant friends!
Like the mellow ray of a departing sun, it falls tenderly
yet sadly on the heart. Every hour of absence from my
native land rolls heavily by, like the sandy wave of the
desert
;
and the fair shores of my country rise blooming to
my imagination, clothed in the soft illusive charms of
distance
.
I sigh, yet no one listens to the sigh of the captive:
I shed the bitter tear of recollection, but no one sympathises
in the tear of the turbaned stranger!Think not, however,
thou brother of my soul, that I complain of the horrors of
my situation; think not that my captivity is attended with
the labours, the chains, the scourges, the insults, that
render
slavery, with us, more dreadful than the pangs of
hesitating
,
lingering death. Light, indeed, are the restraints
on the personal freedom of thy kinsman; but who can enter
into the afflictions of the mind? who can describe the
agonies
of the heart? They are mutable as the clouds of the
air; they are countless as the waves that divide me from
my native country.
I have, of late, my dear Asem, laboured under an
inconvenience
singularly unfortunate, and am reduced to a
dilemma
most ridiculously embarrassing. Why should I
hide it from the companion of my thoughts, the partner of
my sorrows and my joys? Alas! Asem, thy friend
Mustapha
,
the invincible captain of a ketch, is sadly in want of
a pair of breeches! Thou wilt, doubtless smile, O most
grave Mussulman, to hear me indulge in such ardent
lamentations
about a circumstance so trivial, and a want
apparently
so easy to be satisfied: but little canst thou know
of the mortifications attending my necessities, and the
astonishing
difficulty of supplying them. Honoured by the
smiles and attentions of the beautiful ladies of this city,
who have fallen in love with my whiskers and my turban;
courted by the bashaws and the great men, who delight to
have me at their feasts; the honour of my company eagerly
15
solicited by every fiddler who gives a concert; think of my
chagrin at being obliged to decline the host of invitations
that daily overwhelm me, merely for want of a pair of
breeches! Oh, Allah! Allah! that thy disciples could
come into the world all be-feathered like a bantam, or with a
pair of leather breeches like the wild deer of the forest;
surely, my friend, it is the destiny of man to be for ever
subjected to petty evils, which, however trifling in
appearance
,
prey in silence on this little pittance of enjoyment,
and poison these moments of sunshine, which might
otherwise be consecrated to happiness.
The want of a garment, thou wilt say, is easily
supplied
;
and thou mayest suppose need only be mentioned,
to be remedied at once by any tailor of the land. Little
canst thou conceive the impediments which stand in the
way of my comfort, and still less art thou acquainted
with the prodigious great scale on which every thing is
transacted in this country. The nation moves most
majestically
slow and clumsy in the most trivial affairs, like
the unwieldy elephant which makes a formidable
difficulty
of picking up a straw! When I hinted my necessities
to the officer who has charge of myself and my
companions
,
I expected to have been forthwith relieved; but he
made an amazingly long facetold me that we were
prisoners of statethat we must therefore be clothed at
the expense of the government; that as no provision has
been made by the Congress for an emergency of the kind,
it was impossible to furnish me with a pair of breeches,
until all the sages of the nation had been convened to talk
over the matter, and debate upon the expediency of
granting
my request. Sword of the immortal Khalid, thought
I, but this is great!this is truly sublime! All the
sages
in an immense logocracy assembled together to talk
about my breeches!Vain mortal that I am! I cannot
but own I was somewhat reconciled to the delay which
must necessarily attend this method of clothing me, by
the consideration that if they made the affair a national
act, my name must of course be embodied in history,
and myself and my breeches flourish to immortality in the
annals of this mighty empire!
But pray, sir, said I, how does it happen that a
matter so insignificant should be erected into an object of
such importance as to employ the representative wisdom
of the nation? and what is the cause of their talking so
much about a trifle!Oh, replied the officer, who
acts as our slave-driver; it all proceeds from economy.
If the government did not spend ten times as much
money
in debating whether it was proper to supply you with
breeches as the breeches themselves would cost, the
people
,
who govern the bashaw and his divan, would
straightway begin to complain of their liberties being
infringed
the
national finances squanderednot a
hostile
slang-whanger throughout the logocracy but would
burst forth like a barrel of combustionand ten chances
to one but the bashaw and the sages of his divan would
all be turned out of office together. My good
Mussulman
,
continued he, the administration have the good
of the people too much at heart to trifle with their pockets;
and they would sooner assemble and talk away ten
thousand
dollars than expend fifty silently out of the treasury
such is the wonderful spirit of economy that pervades
every branch of this government. But, said I, how
is it possible they can spend money in talking: surely
words cannot be the current coin of this country?
Truly, cried he, smiling, your question is pertinent
enough, for words indeed often supply the place of cash
among us, and many an honest debt is paid in promises;
but the fact is, the grand bashaw and the members of
Congress, or grand talkers of the nation, either receive a
yearly salary or are paid by the day.By the nine
hundred tongues of the great beast in Mahomet's vision,
but the murder is out! it is no wonder these honest men
talk so much about nothing, when they are paid for
talking like day-labourers. You are mistaken, said
my driver; it is nothing but economy.
I remained silent for some minutes, for this
inexplicable
word economy always discomfits me;and when
I flatter myself I have grasped it, it slips through my
fingers like a jack-o'lantern. I have not, nor perhaps
ever shall acquire, sufficient of the philosophic policy of
this government, to draw a proper distinction between an
individual and a nation. If a man was to throw away
a pound in order to save a beggarly penny, and boast at
the same time of his economy, I should think him on a
par with the fool in the fable of Alfangi; who, in
skinning
a flint worth a farthing, spoiled a knife worth fifty
times the sum, and thought he had acted wisely. The
shrewd fellow would doubtless have valued himself much
more highly on his economy, could he have known that
his example would one day be followed by the bashaw
of America, and the sages of his divan.
This economic disposition, my friend, occasions much
fighting of the spirit, and innumerable contests of the
tongue in this talking assembly. Wouldst thou believe
it? they were actually employed for a whole week in a
most strenuous and eloquent debate about patching up a
hole in the wall in the room appropriated to their
meetings
!
A vast profusion of nervous argument and
pompous
declamation was expended on this occasion. Some
of the orators, I am told, being rather waggishly inclined
were most stupidly jocular on the occasion; but their
waggery gave great offence, and was highly reprobated
by the more weighty part of the assembly; who hold all
wit and humour in abomination, and thought the
business
in hand much too solemn and serious to be treated
lightly. It was supposed by some that this affair would
have occupied a whole winter, as it was a subject upon
which several gentlemen spoke who had never been
known to open their lips in that place except to say yes
and no.These silent members are by way of distinction
denominated orator mums, and are highly valued in this
country on account of their great talents for silence;
a qualification extremely rare in a logocracy.
Fortunately for the public tranquility, in the hottest
part of the debate, when two rampant Virginians, brim
full of logic and philosophy, were measuring tongues,
and syllogistically cudgelling each other out of their
unreasonable
notions, the president of the divan, a knowing
old gentleman, one night slyly sent a mason with a hod
of mortar, who in the course of a few minutes closed up
the hole, and put a final end to the argument. Thus
did this wise old gentleman, by hitting on a most simple
expedient, in all probability, save his country as much
money as would build a gun-boat, or pay a hireling
slang-whanger
for a whole volume of words. As it happened,
only a few thousand dollars were expended in paying
these men, who are denominated, I suppose in derision,
legislators.
Another instance of their economy I relate with
pleasure
,
for I really begin to feel a regard for these poor
barbarians. They talked away the best parts of a whole
winter before they could determine not to expend a few
dollars in purchasing a sword to bestow on an
illustrious
warrior: yes, Asem, on that very hero who
frightened
all our poor old women and young children at
Derne, and fully proved himself a greater man than the
mother that bore him.
[14]
[14]
General Eaton.
Thus, my friend, is the whole
collective wisdom of this mighty logocracy employed in
somniferous debates about the most trivial affairs; as I
have sometimes seen a Herculean mountebank exerting
all his energies in balancing a straw upon his nose.
Their sages behold the minutest object with the
microscopic
eyes of a pismire; mole-hills swell into mountains,
and a grain of mustard-seed will set the whole ant-hill
in a hubbub. Whether this indicates a capacious vision,
or a diminutive mind, I leave thee to decide; for my
part I consider it as another proof of the great scale on
which every thing is transacted in their country.
I have before told thee that nothing can be done
without
consulting the sages of the nation, who compose the
assembly called the Congress. This prolific body may
not improperly be called the mother of inventions; and
a most fruitful mother it is, let me tell thee, though its
children are generally abortions. It has lately laboured
with what was deemed the conception of a mighty navy.
All the old women and the good wives that assist the
bashaw in his emergencies hurried to head-quarters to be
busy, like midwives, at the delivery.All was anxiety,
fidgeting, and consultation; when after a deal of
groaning
and struggling, instead of formidable first-rates and
gallant frigates, out crept a litter of sorry little gun-boats.
These are most pitiful little vessels, partaking vastly of
the character of the grand bashaw, who has the credit
of begetting them; being flat shallow vessels that can
only
sail before the wind;must always keep in with the
land;are continually foundering or running on shore;
and in short, are only fit for smooth water. Though
intended
for the defence of the maritime cities, yet the cities
are obliged to defend them; and they require as much
nursing as so many rickety little bantlings. They are,
however, the darling pets of the grand bashaw, being the
children of his dotage, and, perhaps from their
diminutive
size and palpable weakness, are called the infant
navy of America. The art that brought them into
existence
was almost deified by the majority of the people
as a grand stroke of economy.By the beard of
Mahomet
,
but this word is truly inexplicable!
To this economic body therefore was I advised to
address
my petition, and humbly to pray that the august
15 *
assembly of sages would, in the plenitude of their wisdom
and the magnitude of their powers, munificently bestow
on an unfortunate captive a pair of cotton breeches!
Head of the immortal Amrou, cried I, but this
would be presumptuous to a degree:What! after these
worthies have thought proper to leave their country
naked
and defenceless, and exposed to all the political storms
that rattle without, can I expect that they will lend a
helping hand to comfort the extremities of a solitary
captive
?
My exclamation was only answered by a smile,
and I was consoled by the assurance that, so far from
being neglected, it was every way probable my breeches
might occupy a whole session of the divan, and set several
of the longest heads together by the ears. Flattering as
was the idea of a whole nation being agitated about my
breeches, yet I own I was somewhat dismayed at the idea
of remaining in
querpo
, until all the national gray-beards
should have made a speech on the occasion, and given
their consent to the measure. The embarrassment and
distress of mind which I experienced were visible in my
countenance, and my guard, who is a man of infinite
good-nature, immediately suggested, as a more
expeditious
plan of supplying my wants, a benefit at the theatre.
Though profoundly ignorant of his meaning, I agreed to
his proposition, the result of which I shall disclose to thee
in another letter.
Fare thee well, dear Asem; in thy pious prayers to
our great prophet, never forget to solicit thy friend's
return
;
and when thou numberest up the many blessings
bestowed on thee by all-bountiful Allah, pour forth thy
gratitude that he has cast thy nativity in a land where
there is no assembly of legislative chatterers;no great
bashaw, who bestrides a gun-boat for a hobby-horse;
where the word economy is unknown;and where an
unfortunate captive is not obliged to call upon the whole
nation to cut him out a pair of breeches.
A warlike Portrait of the great Peterand how General
Von Poffenburgh distinguished himself at Fort Cassimir.
Hitherto
, most venerable and courteous reader, have
I shown thee the administration of the valorous
Stuyvesant
under the mild moonshine of peace, or rather the
grim tranquility of awful expectation; but now the
war-drum
rumbles from afar, the brazen trumpet brays its
thrilling note, and the rude clash of hostile arms speaks
fearful prophecies of coming troubles. The gallant
warrior
starts from soft repose, from golden visions, and
voluptuous
ease; where, in the dulcet piping time of peace,
he sought sweet solace after all his toils. No more in
beauty's
siren lap reclined, he weaves fair garlands for his
lady's
brows; no more entwines with flowers his shining
sword; nor through the live long lazy summer's day, chants
forth his lovesick soul in madrigals. To manhood roused,
he spurns the amorous lute; doffs from his brawny back
the robe of peace, and clothes his pampered limbs in
panoply
of steel. O'er his dark brow, where late the myrtle
wavedwhere wanton roses breathed enervate lovehe
rears the beaming casque and nodding plume; grasps the
bright shield, and shakes the ponderous lance; or mounts
with eager pride the fiery steed, and burns for deeds of
glorious
chivalry.
But soft, worthy reader! I would not have you
imagine
,
that any
preux chevalier
, thus hideously begirt with
iron, existed in the city of New-Amsterdam. This is but
a lofty and gigantic mode in which heroic writers always
talk of war, thereby to give it a noble and imposing
aspect
;
equipping our warriors with bucklers, helmets, and
lances, and such like outlandish and obsolete weapons,
the like which perchance they had never seen or heard
of; in the same manner that a cunning statuary arrays a
modern general or an admiral in the accoutrements of a
Csar or an Alexander. The simple truth then of all
this oratorical flourish is thisthat the valiant Peter
Stuyvesant, all of a sudden, found it necessary to scour
his trusty blade, which too long had rusted in its
scabbard
,
and prepare himself to undergo the hardy toils of
war, in which his mighty soul so much delighted.
Methinks I at this moment behold him in my
imagition
or
rather, I behold his goodly portrait, which still
hangs up in the family mansion of the Stuyvesants,
arrayed
in all the terrors of a true Dutch General. His
regimental coat of German blue, gorgeously decorated
with a goodly show of large brass buttons, reaching from
his waistband to his chin. The voluminous skirts turned
up at the corners and separating gallantly behind, so as
to display the seat of a sumptuous pair of brimstone
coloured trunk breechesa graceful style still prevalent
among the warriors of our day, and which is in
conformity
to the custom of ancient heroes, who scorned to
defend
themselves in rear. His face rendered exceeding
terrible and warlike by a pair of black mustachios; his
hair strutting out on each side in stiffly pomatumed
ear-locks
,
and descending in a rat-tail queue below his waist;
a shining stock of black leather supporting his chin, and a
little, but fierce cocked hat, stuck with a gallant and fiery
air over his left eye. Such was the chivalric port of
Peter the Headstrong; and when he made a sudden halt,
planted himself firmly on his solid supporter, with his
wooden leg inlaid with silver, a little in advance, in order
to strengthen his position, his right hand grasping a
gold-headed
cane, his left resting upon the pummel of his
sword; his head dressing spiritedly to the right with a
most appalling and hard favoured frown upon his brow
he presented altogether one of the most commanding,
bitter looking and soldierlike figures that ever strutted
upon canvass. Proceed we now to inquire the cause of
this warlike preparation.
The encroaching disposition of the Swedes, on the
south or Delaware river, has been duly recorded in the
chronicles of the reign of William the Testy. These
encroachments, having been endured with that heroic
magnanimity which is the corner stone, or, according to
Aristotle, the left hand neighbour of true courage, had
been repeated and wickedly aggravated.
The Swedes who were of that class of cunning
pretenders
to Christianity, who read the Bible upside down,
whenever it interferes with their interests, inverted the
golden
maxim; and when their neighbour suffered them to
smite him on the one cheek, they generally smote him on
the other also, whether turned to them or not. Their
repeated
aggressions had been among the numerous sources
of vexation that conspired to keep the irritable sensibilities
of Wilhelmus Kieft in a constant fever; and it was only
owing to the unfortunate circumstance that he had always
a hundred things to do at once, that he did not take such
unrelenting vengeance as their offences merited. But they
had now a chieftain of a different character to deal with;
and they were soon guilty of a piece of treachery, that
threw his honest blood in a ferment and precluded all
further
sufferance.
Printz, the governor of the province of New-Sweden,
being either deceased or removed, for of this fact some
uncertainty exists, was succeeded by Jan Risingh, a
gigantic
Swede; and who, had he not been rather knockneed
and splay-footed, might have served for the model of a
Samson
or a Hercules. He was no less rapacious than mighty,
and withal as crafty as he was rapacious; so that, in fact,
there is very little doubt, had he lived some four or five
centuries
before, he would have been one of those wicked
giants
,
who took such a cruel pleasure in pocketting
distressed
damsels, when gadding about in the world; and locking
them up in enchanted castles, without a toilet, a change of
linen, or any other convenience. In consequence of which
enormities, they fell under the high displeasure of chivalry,
and all true, loyal, and gallant knights, were instructed to
attack and slay outright any miscreant they might happen
to find, above six feet high; which is doubtless one reason
that the race of large men is nearly extinct, and the
generations
of latter ages so exceeding small.
No sooner did Governor Risingh enter upon his office
than he immediately cast his eyes upon the important
post of Fort Casimer, and formed the righteous resolution
of taking it into his possession. The only thing that
remained
to consider was the mode of carrying his
resolulution
into effect; and here I must do him the justice to say,
that he exhibited a humanity rarely to be met with
among leaders, and which I have never seen equalled in
modern times, excepting among the English, in their
glorious
affair at Copenhagen. Willing to spare the effusion
of blood, and the miseries of open warfare, he benevolently
shunned every thing like avowed hostility or regular
siege, and resorted to the less glorious but more merciful
expedient of treachery.
Under pretence, therefore of paying a neighbourly visit
to General Von Poffenburgh, at his new post of Fort
Casimir, he made requisite preparation, sailed in great
state up the Delaware, displayed his flag with the most
ceremoneous punctilio, and honoured the fortress with a
royal salute previous to dropping anchor. The unusual
noise awakened a veteran Dutch sentinel, who was
napping
faithfully at his post, and who having suffered his
match to go out, contrived to return the compliment, by
discharging his rusty musket with the spark of a pipe,
which he borrowed from one of his comrades. The salute
indeed would have been answered by the guns of the fort,
had they not been unfortunately out of order, and the
magazine
deficient in ammunitionaccidents to which forts
have in all ages been liable, and which were the more
excusable
in the present instance, as Fort Casimir had only
been erected about two years, and General Von
Poffenburgh
,
its mighty commander had been fully occupied
with matters of much greater importance.
Risingh, highly satisfied with this courteous reply to
his salute, treated the fort to a second, for he well knew
its commander was marvellously delighted with these little
ceremonials, which he considered as so many acts of
homage
paid unto his greatness. He then landed in great
state, attended by a suite of thirty mena prodigious and
vainglorious retinue, for a petty governor of a petty
settlement
,
in those days of primitive simplicity; and to the full
as great an army as generally swells the pomp and marches
in the rear of our frontier commanders at the present
day.
The number in fact might have awakened suspicion, had
not the mind of the great Von Poffenburgh been so
completely
engrossed with an all-pervading idea of himself, that he
had not room to admit a thought besides. In fact, he
considered
the concourse of Risingh's followers as a compliment to
himselfso apt are great men to stand between themselves
and the sun, and completely eclipse the truth by their own
shadow.
It may readily be imagined how much General Von
Poffenburgh was flattered by a visit from so august a
personage; his only embarrassment was, how he should
receive him in such a manner as to appear to the greatest
advantage, and make the most advantageous impression.
The main guard was ordered immediately to turn out,
and the arms and regimentals (of which the garrison
possessed
full half a dozen suits) were equally distributed
among the soldiers. One tall lank fellow appeared in a
coat intended for a small man, the skirts of which reached
a little below his waist, the buttons were between his
shoulders, and the sleeves half way to his wrists, so that
his hands looked like a couple of huge spades; and the
coat not being large enough to meet in front, was linked
together by loops, made of a pair of red worsted garters.
Another had an old cocked hat, stuck on the back of his
head, and decorated with a bunch of cock's tailsa third
had a pair of rusty gaiters, hanging about his heelswhile
a fourth, who was a short duck-legged little Trojan, was
equipped in a huge pair of the general's cast off breeches,
which he held up with one hand, while he grasped his
firelock with the other. The rest were accoutred in
similar
style, excepting three graceless ragamuffins, who had
no shirts, and but a pair and a half of breeches between
them, wherefore they were sent to the black-hole to keep
them out of view. There is nothing in which the talents
of a prudent commander are more completely testified than
in thus setting matters off to the greatest advantage; and it
is for this reason that our frontier posts at the present day
(that of Niagara for example,) display their best suit of
regimentals
on the back of the sentinel who stands in sight of
travellers.
His men being thus gallantly arrayedthose who
lacked muskets shouldering spades and pickaxes, and
every man being ordered to tuck in his shirt tail and pull
up his brogues, General Von Poffenburgh first took a
sturdy
draught of foaming ale, which, like the magnanimous
More of Morehall, was his invariable practice on all great
occasions; which done, he put himself at their head,
ordered
the pine planks which served as a draw bridge, to be
laid down, and issued forth from his castle, like a mighty
giant, just refreshed with wine. But when the two
heroes
met, then began a scene of warlike parade, and
chivalric
courtesy that beggars all description. Risingh, who,
as I before hinted, was a shrewd, cunning politician, and
had grown gray much before his time, in consequence of
his craftiness, saw at one glance the ruling passion of the
great Von Poffenburgh, and humoured him in all his
valorous
fantasies.
Their detachments were accordingly drawn up in front
of each other; they carried arms, and they presented arms;
they gave the standing salute and the passing salute:they
rolled their drums, they flourished their fifes, and they
waved
their coloursthey faced to the left, and they faced to
the right, and they faced to the right about:they wheeled
forward, and they wheeled backward, and they wheeled into
echelon:
they marched and they counter-marched by
grand divisions, by single divisions, and by subdivisions,
by platoons, by sections, and by files,to quick time, in
slow time, and in no time at all: for, having gone through all
the evolutions of two great armies, including the eighteen
manuvres of Dundas; having exhausted all that they could
recollect or imagine of military tactics, including sundry
strange and irregular evolutions, the like of which were never
seen before or since, excepting among certain of our newly
raised militiathe two great commanders and their
respective
troops came at length to a dead halt, completely
exhausted
by the toils of war. Never did two valiant train band
captains
,
or two buskined theatric heroes, in the renowned
tragedies
of Pizarro, Tom Thumb, or any other heroical and
fighting tragedy, marshal their gallows-looking,
duck-legged
heavy-heeled myrmidons, with more glory and
self-admiration
.
These military compliments being finished, General
Von Poffenburgh escorted his illustrious visiter, with
great ceremony, into the fort; attended him throughout
the fortifications; showed him the horn-works,
crown-works
,
half-moons, and various other out works; or rather
the places where they ought to be erected; and where
they might be erected if he pleased; plainly demonstrating
that it was a place of great capability, and though
at present but a little redoubt, yet that it evidently was
a formidable fortress in embryo. This survey over, he
next had the whole garrison put under arms, exercised
and reviewed, and concluded by ordering the three
bridewell
birds to be hauled out of the black hole, brought up
to the halberts, and soundly flogged for the amusement
of his visiter and to convince him that he was a great
disciplinarian.
There is no error more dangerous than for a
commander
to make known the strength, or, as in the present
case, the weakness of his garrison; this will be
exemplified
before I have arrived to the end of my present story,
which thus carries its moral, like a roasted goose his
pudding, in the very middle. The cunning Risingh,
while he pretended to be struck dumb outright, with the
puissance of the great Von Poffenburgh, took silent note
of the incompetency of his garrison, of which he gave a
hint to his trusty followers, who tipped each other the
wink, and laughed most obstreperouslyin their sleeves.
The inspection, review, and flogging being concluded,
the party adjourned to the table; for among his other
great qualities, the general was remarkably addicted to
huge entertainments, or rather carousals; and in one
afternoon's campaign would leave more
dead men
on the
field than ever he did in the whole course of his military
career. Many bulletins of these bloodless victories do
still remain on record; and the whole province was once
thrown in amaze by the return of one of his campaigns;
wherein it was stated, that though, like Captain Bobadil,
he had only twenty men to back him, yet, in the short
space of six months, he had conquered and utterly
annihilated
sixty oxen, ninety hogs, one hundred sheep, ten
thousand cabbages, one thousand bushels of potatoes, one
hundred and fifty kilderkins of small beer, two thousand
seven hundred and thirty-five pipes, seventy-eight pounds
of sugar plums, and forty bars of iron, besides sundry
small meats, game, poultry, and garden stuffs. An
achievement unparalleled since the days of Pantagruel
and his all-devouring army; and which showed that it
was only necessary to let bellipotent Von Poffenburgh
and his garrison loose in an enemy's country, and in a
little while they would breed a famine, and starve all the
inhabitants.
No sooner, therefore, had the general received the
first intimation of the visit of Governor Risingh, than he
ordered a great dinner to be prepared; and privately sent
out a detachment of his most experienced veterans to rob
all the hen roosts in the neighbourhood, and lay the
pigsties
under contributiona service to which they had
been long inured, and which they discharged with such
incredible zeal and promptitude, that the garrison table
groaned under the weight of their spoils.
I wish, with all my heart, my readers could see the
valiant Von Poffenburgh, as he presided at the head of
the banquet. It was a sight worth beholding:there he
sat, in his greatest glory, surrounded by his soldiers, like
that famous wine-bibber, Alexander, whose thirsty
virtues
he did most ably imitate; telling astonishing stories
of his hair-breadth adventures and heroic exploits, at
which, though all his auditors knew them to be most
incontinent and outrageous gasconades, yet did they cast
up their eyes in admiration, and utter many interjections
of astonishment. Nor could the general pronounce any
thing that bore the remotest resemblance to a joke but
the stout Risingh would strike his brawny fist upon the
table, till every glass rattled again, throwing himself
back in his chair, and uttering gigantic peals of laughter,
swearing most horribly it was the best joke he ever
heard in his life. Thus all was rout and revelry and
hideous carousal within Fort Casimir; and so lustily did
Von Poffenburgh ply the bottle that in less than four
short hours he made himself and his whole garrison, who
all sedulously emulated the deeds of their chieftain, dead
drunk, in singing songs, quaffing bumpers, and drinking
patriotic toasts, none of which but was as long as a Welsh
pedigree, or a plea at Chancery.
16
No sooner did things come to this pass than the crafty
Risingh and his Swedes, who had cunningly kept
themselves
sober, rose on their entertainers, tied them neck
and heels, and took formal possession of the fort, and all
its dependencies, in the name of Queen Christina of
Sweden; administering, at the same time, an oath of
allegiance to all the Dutch soldiers who could be made
sober enough to swallow it. Risingh then put the
fortifications in order, appointed his discreet and vigilant
friend Suen Scutz, a tall, wind-dried, water-drinking,
Swede, to the command; and departed, bearing with
him this truly amiable garrison and their puissant
commander
,
who, when brought to himself by a sound
drubbing, bore no small resemblance to a deboshed fish,
or bloated sea monster, caught upon dry land.
The transportation of the garrison was done to prevent
the transmission of intelligence to New-Amsterdam; for
much as the cunning Risingh exulted in his stratagem,
he dreaded the vengeance of the sturdy Peter Stuyvesant,
whose name spread as much terror in the neighbourhood
as did whilome that of the unconquerable Scanderberg
among his scurvy enemies the Turks.
THE
MUTABILITY OF LITERATURE,
A COLLOQUY IN WESTMINSTER ABBEY.
There
are certain half-dreaming moods of mind, in which
we naturally steal away from noise and glare, and seek
some quiet haunt, where we may indulge our reveries,
and build our air castles undisturbed. In such a mood,
I was loitering about the old gray cloisters of
Westminster
Abbey, enjoying that luxury of wandering thought
which one is apt to dignify with the name of reflection;
when suddenly an irruption of madcap boys from
Westminster
school, playing at foot-ball, broke in upon the
monastic stillness of the place, making the vaulted
passages
and mouldering tombs echo with their merriment.
I sought to take refuge from their noise by penetrating
still deeper into the solitudes of the pile, and applied to
one of the vergers for admission to the library. He
conducted
me through a portal rich with the crumbling
sculpture
of former ages, which opened upon a gloomy
passage
leading to the Chapter-house, and the chamber in
which Doomsday Book is deposited. Just within the
passage is a small door on the left. To this the verger
applied a key; it was double locked, and opened with
some difficulty, as if seldom used. We now ascended a
dark narrow staircase, and passing through a second door,
entered the library.
I found myself in a lofty antique hall, the roof
supported
by massive joists of old English oak. It was
soberly lighted by a row of Gothic windows at a
considerable
height from the floor, and which apparently
opened upon the roofs of the cloisters. An ancient
picture
of some reverend dignitary of the church in his
robes hung over the fire-place. Around the hall and in
a small gallery were the books, arranged in carved
oaken cases. They consisted principally of old polemical
writers, and were much more worn by time than use.
In the centre of the library was a solitary table, with
two or three books on it, an inkstand without ink, and
a few pens parched by long disuse. The place seemed
fitted
for quiet study and profound meditation. It was
buried
deep among the massive walls of the abbey, and shut
up from the tumult of the world, I could only hear now
and then the shouts of the schoolboys faintly swelling from
the cloisters, and the sound of a bell tolling for prayers, that
echoed soberly along the roofs of the abbey. By degrees
the shouts of merriment grew fainter and fainter, and at
length died away. The bell ceased to toll, and a profound
silence reigned through the dusky hall.
I had taken down a little thick quarto, curiously bound
in parchment, with brass clasps, and seated myself at the
table in a venerable elbow chair. Instead of reading,
however
,
I was beguiled by the solemn monastic air, and lifeless
quiet of the place, into a train of musing. As I looked
around upon the old volumes in their mouldering covers,
thus ranged on the shelves, and apparently never disturbed
in their repose, I could not but consider the library a kind of
literary catacomb, where authors, like mummies, are
piously
entombed, and left to blacken and moulder in dusty
oblivion
.
How much, thought I, has each of these volumes, now
thrust aside with such indifference, cost some aching
head! how many weary days! how many sleepless
nights! How have their authors buried themselves in
the solitude of cells and cloisters; shut themselves up from
the face of man, and the still more blessed face of
nature
;
and devoted themselves to painful research and
intense
reflection! And all for what? to occupy an inch
of dusty shelfto have the title of their works read now
and then in a future age, by some drowsy churchman or
casual straggler like myself; and in another age to be
lost, even in remembrance. Such is the amount of this
boasted immortality. A mere temporary rumour, a local
sound; like the tone of that bell which has just tolled
among these towers, filling the ear for a moment
lingering
transiently in echoand then passing away like a
thing that was not!
BOOK MAKING.
There
was one dapper little gentleman in bright coloured
clothes, with a chirping gossiping expression of
countenance
,
who had all the appearance of an author on good
terms with his bookseller. After considering him
attentively
,
I recognized in him a diligent getter up of
miscellaneous
works, which bustled off well with the trade. I
was curious to see how he manufactured his wares. He
made more stir and show of business than any of the
others; dipping into various books, fluttering over the
leaves of manuscripts, taking a morsel out of one, a
morsel
out of another, line upon line, precept upon precept,
here a little and there a little. The contents of his book
seemed to be as heterogeneous as those of the witches'
caldron in Macbeth. It was here a finger and there a
thumb, toe of frog and blind worm's sting, with his own
gossip poured in, like baboon's blood, to make the
medley
slab and good.
After all, thought I, may not this pilfering disposition
be implanted in authors for wise purposes; may it not
be the way in which Providence has taken care that the
seeds of knowledge and wisdom shall be preserved from
age to age, in spite of the inevitable decay of the works
in which they were first produced? We see that nature
has wisely, though whimsically, provided for the
conveyance
of seeds from clime to clime, in the maws of certain
birds; so that animals, which, in themselves, are little
better than carrion, and apparently the lawless plunderers
of the orchard and the corn field, are, in fact, Nature's,
carriers to disperse and perpetuate her blessings. In like
manner, the beauties and fine thoughts of ancient and
obsolete authors are caught up by these flights of
predatory
writers, and cast forth again to flourish and bear
fruit in a remote and distant tract of time. Many of
their works, also, undergo a kind of metemphsychosis, and
spring up under new forms. What was formerly a
ponderous
history, revives in the shape of a romancean old
legend changes into a modern playand a sober
philosophical
treatise furnishes the body for a whole series of
bouncing and sparkling essays. Thus it is in the
clearing
of our American woodlands; where we burn down
a forest of stately pines, a progeny of dwarf oaks start up
16*
in their place: and we never see the prostrate trunk of
tree mouldering into soil, but it gives birth to a whole tribe
of fungi.
Let us not, then, lament over the decay and
oblivion
into which ancient writers descend; they do but
submit to the great law of nature, which declares that
all sublunary shapes of matter shall be limited in their
duration, but which decrees, also, that their elements
shall never perish. Generation after generation, both
in animal and vegetable life, passes away, but the vital
principle is transmitted to posterity, and the species
continue
to flourish. Thus, also, do authors beget authors,
and having produced a numerous progeny, in a good old
age they sleep with their fathers, that is to say, with the
authors
who preceded themand from whom they had stolen.
Whilst I was indulging in these rambling fancies, I had
leaned my head against a pile of reverend folios.
Whether
it was owing to the soporific emanations from these
works; or to the profound quiet of the room; or to the
lassitude arising from much wandering; or to an unlucky
habit of napping at improper times and places, with which
I am grievously afflicted, so it was, that I fell into a
doze. Still, however, my imagination continued busy,
and indeed the same scene remained before my mind's
eye, only a little changed in some of the details. I dreamt
that the chamber was still decorated with the portraits
of ancient authors, but the number was increased. The
long tables had disappeared, and in place of the sage
magi
,
I beheld a ragged, threadbare throng, such as may be
seen plying about the great repository of cast-off clothes,
Monmouth Street. Whenever they seized upon a book,
by one of those incongruities common to dreams,
methought
it turned into a garment of foreign or antique
fashion, with which they proceeded to equip themselves.
I noticed, however, that no one pretended to clothe
himself
from any particular suit, but took a sleeve from one,
a cape from another, a skirt from a third, thus decking
himself out piecemeal, while some of his original rags
would peep out from among his borrowed finery.
There was a portly, rosy, well-fed parson, whom I
observed ogling several mouldy polemical writers through
an eye-glass. He soon contrived to slip on the
voluminous
mantle of one of the old fathers, and having
purloined
the gray beard of another, endeavoured to look
exceedingly wise; but the smirking common place of his
countenance set at nought all the trappings of wisdom.
One sickly looking gentleman was busied embroidering
a very flimsy garment with gold thread drawn out of
several old court dresses of the reign of Queen Elizabeth.
Another had trimmed himself magnificently from an
illuminated
manuscript, had stuck a nosegay in his bosom,
culled from The Paradise of dainty devices, and
having
put Sir Philip Sidney's hat on one side of his head,
strutted off with an exquisite air of vulgar elegance. A
third, who was but of puny dimensions, had bolstered
himself out bravely with the spoils from several obscure
tracts of philosophy, so that he had a very imposing front;
but he was lamentably tattered in rear, and I perceived
that he had patched his small-clothes with scraps of
parchment
from a Latin author.
There were some well dressed gentlemen, it is true,
who only helped themselves to a gem or so, which sparkled
among their own ornaments, without eclipsing them.
Some, too, seemed to contemplate the costumes of the old
writers, merely to imbibe their principles of taste, and
to catch their air and spirit; but I grieve to say, that
too many were apt to array themselves from top to toe,
in the patchwork manner I have mentioned. I shall
not omit to speak of one genius, in drab breeches and
gaiters, and an Arcadian hat, who had a violent
propensity
to the pastoral, but whose rural wanderings had been
confined to the classic haunts of Primrose Hill, and the
solitudes of the Regent's Park. He had decked himself
in wreaths and ribands from all the old pastoral poets,
and hanging his head on one side, went about with a
fantastical lack-a-daisical air, babbling about green
fields. But the personage that most struck my
attention
was a pragmatical old gentleman, in clerical robes
with a remarkably large and square, but bald head. He
entered the room wheezing and puffing, elbowed his way
through the throng, with a look of sturdy self-confidence,
and having laid hands upon a thick Greek quarto,
clapped
it upon his head, and swept majestically away in a
formidable frizzled wig.
In the height of this literary masquerade, a cry
suddenly
resounded from every side, of Thieves! thieves!
I looked, and lo! the portraits about the wall became
animated
!
The old authors thrust out, first a head, then a
shoulder from the canvass, looked down curiously, for an
instant, upon the motley throng, and then descended, with
fury in their eyes, to claim their rifled property. The
scene of scampering and hubbub that ensued baffles all
description. The unhappy culprits endeavoured in vain
to escape with the plunder. On one side might be seen
half a dozen old monks, stripping a modern professor; on
another, there was sad devastation carried into the ranks
of modern dramatic writers. Beaumont and Fletcher,
side by side, raged round the field like Castor and Pollux,
and sturdy Ben Jonson enacted more wonders than when
a volunteer with the army in Flanders. As to the dapper
little compiler of farragos, mentioned some time since, he
had arrayed himself in as many patches and colours as
Harlequin, and there was as fierce a contention of
claimants
about him, as about the dead body of Patroclus. I
was grieved to see many men, to whom I had been
accustomed
to look upon with awe and reverence, fain to steal
off with scarce a rag to cover their nakedness. Just then
my eye was caught by the pragmatical old gentleman in
the Greek frizzled wig, who was scrambling away sore
affrighted
with half a score of authors in full cry after him.
They were close upon his haunches; in a twinkling off
went his wig; at every turn some strip of raiment was
peeled away; until in a few moments, from his
domineering
pomp, he shrunk into a little, pursy, chopp'd bald
shot, and made his exit with only a few tags and bags
fluttering at his back.
There was something so ludicrous in the catastrophe
of this learned Theban, that I burst into an immoderate
fit of laughter, which broke the whole illusion. The
tumult
and the scuffle were at an end. The chamber
resumed
its usual appearance. The old authors shrunk back
into their picture-frames, and hung in shadowy solemnity
along the walls. In short, I found myself wide awake in
my corner, with the whole assemblage of book worms gazing
at me with astonishment. Nothing of the dream had been
real but my burst of laughter, a sound never before heard
in that grave sanctuary, and so abhorrent to the ears of
wisdom, as to electrify the fraternity.
The librarian now stepped up to me, and demanded
whether I had a card of admission. At first I did not
comprehend him, but I soon found that the library was a
kind of literary preserve, subject to game laws, and that
no one must presume to hunt there without special license
and permission. In a word, I stood convicted of being an
arrant poacher, and was glad to make a precipitate retreat,
lest I should have a whole pack of authors let loose upon
me.
A DUTCH SETTLER'S DREAM.
And
the sage Oloffe dreamed a dreamand lo, the
good St. Nicholas came riding over the tops of the trees
in that selfsame waggon wherein he brings his yearly
presents to children; and he came and descended hard by
where the heroes of Communipaw had made their late
repast. And the shrewd Van Kortland knew him by his
broad hat, his long pipe, and the resemblance which he
bore to the figure on the brow of the Goede Vrouw. And
he lit his pipe by the fire, and he sat himself down and
smoked; and as he smoked, the smoke from his pipe
ascended into the air and spread like a cloud overhead.
And the sage Oloffe bethought him, and he hastened and
climbed up to the top of one of the tallest trees, and saw
that the smoke spread over a great extent of country; and
as he considered it more attentively, he fancied that the
great volume of smoke assumed a variety of marvellous
forms, where in dim obscurity he saw shadowed out
palaces
and domes and lofty spires, all of which lasted but a
moment, and then faded away, until the whole rolled off,
and nothing but the green woods were left. And when
St. Nicholas had smoked his pipe, he twisted it in his
hatband
,
and laying his finger beside his nose, gave the
astonished
Van Kortlandt a very significant look; then
mounting his waggon, he returned over the tree tops and
disappeared.
And Van Kortlandt awoke from his sleep greatly
instructed
,
and he aroused his companions and related to
them his dream: and interpreted it, that it was the will
of St. Nicholas that they should settle down and build the
city here. And that the smoke of the pipe was a type
how vast should be the extent of the city; inasmuch as the
volumes of its smoke should spread over a vast extent of
country. And they all with one voice assented to this
interpretation excepting Mynheer Tenbroeck, who declared
the meaning to be that it should be a city wherein a little
fire should occasion a great smoke, or in other words, a
very vapouring little cityboth which interpretations have
strangely come to pass.
THE PRIDE OF THE VILLAGE.
In
the course of an excursion through one of the remote
counties of England, I had struck into one of those cross
roads that lead through the more secluded parts of the
country, and stopped one afternoon at a village, the
situation
of which was beautifully rural and retired. There
was an air of primitive simplicity about its inhabitants,
not to be found in the villages which lie on the great
coach roads. I determined to pass the night there, and
having taken an early dinner, strolled out to enjoy the
neighbouring scenery.
My ramble, as is usually the case with travellers, soon
led me to the church, which stood at a little distance
from the village. Indeed, it was an object of some
curiosity
,
its old tower being completely overrun with ivy, so
that only here and there a jutting buttress, an angle of
gray wall, or a fantastically carved ornament, peered
through the verdant covering. It was a lovely evening.
The early part of the day had been dark and showery,
but in the afternoon it had cleared up; and though
sullen
clouds still hung over head, yet there was a broad
tract of golden sky in the west, from which the setting
sun gleamed through the dripping leaves, and lit up all
nature into a melancholy smile. It seemed like the
parting
hour of a good Christian, smiling on the sins and
sorrows of the world, and giving, in the serenity of his
decline, an assurance that he will rise again in glory.
I had seated myself on a half sunken tombstone, and
was musing, as one is apt to do at this sober-thoughted
hour, on past scenes and early friendson those who
were distant and those who were deadand indulging
in that kind of melancholy fancying, which has in it
something sweeter even than pleasure. Every now and
then, the stroke of a bell from the neighbouring tower
fell on my ear; its tones were in unison with the scene,
and, instead of jarring, chimed in with my feelings; and
it was some time before I recollected, that it must be
tolling
the knell of some new tenant of the tomb.
Presently I saw a funeral train moving across the
village green; it wound slowly along a lane; was lost,
and re-appeared through the breaks of the hedges, until
it passed the place where I was sitting. The pall was
supported by young girls, dressed in white; and another,
about the age of seventeen, walked before, bearing a
chaplet
of white flowers; a token that the deceased was a
young and unmarried female. The corpse was followed
by the parents. They were a venerable couple of the
better order of peasantry. The father seemed to repress
his feelings; but his fixed eye, contracted brow, and
deeply-furrowed
face, showed the struggle that was passing
within. His wife hung on his arm, and wept aloud
with the convulsive bursts of a mother's sorrow.
I followed the funeral into the church. The bier was
placed in the centre aisle, and the chaplet of white flowers,
with a pair of white gloves, were hung over the seat
which the deceased had occupied.
Every one knows the soul-subduing pathos of funeral
service; for who is so fortunate as never to have followed
some one he has loved to the tomb? but when performed
over the remains of innocence and beauty, thus laid low
in the bloom of existencewhat can be more affecting?
At that simple, but most solemn consignment of the body
to the graveEarth to earthashes to ashesdust to
dust!the tears of the youthful companions of the
deceased
flowed unrestrained. The father still seemed to
struggle with his feelings, and to comfort himself with
the assurance, that the dead are blessed which die in the
Lord; but the mother only thought of her child as a
flower of the field cut down and withered in the midst
of its sweetness: she was like Rachel, mourning over
her children, and would not be comforted.
On returning to the inn I learnt the whole story of
the deceased. It was a simple one, and such as has
often
been told. She had been the beauty and pride of the
village. Her father had once been as opulent farmer,
but was reduced in circumstances. This was an only
child, and brought up entirely at home, in the simplicity
of rural life. She had been the pupil of the village
pastor
,
the favourite of his little flock. The good man
watched
over her education with paternal care; it was limited,
and suitable to the sphere in which she was to move;
for he only sought to make her an ornament to her
station
in life, not to raise her above it. The tenderness
and indulgence of her parents, and the exemption from
all ordinary occupations, had fostered a natural grace and
delicacy of character, that accorded with the fragile
loveliness
of her form. She appeared like some tender plant
of the garden, blooming accidentally amid the hardier
natives of the fields.
The superiority of her charms was felt and
acknowledged
by her companions, but without envy; for it was
surpassed by the unassuming gentleness and winning
kindness of her manners. It might be truly said of her:
This is the prettiest low-born lass, that ever
Ran on the green-sward: nothing she does or seems,
But smacks of something greater than herself;
Too noble for this place.
The village was one of those sequestered spots, which
still retain some vestiges of old English customs. It
had its rural festivals and holyday pastimes, and still
kept up some faint observance of the once popular rites
of May. These, indeed, had been promoted by its
present
pastor; who was a lover of old customs, and one of
those simple Christians that think their mission fulfilled
by promoting joy on earth and good-will among
mankind
.
Under his auspices the may-pole stood from year
to year in the centre of the village green: on May-day it
was decorated with garlands and streamers; and a queen
or lady of the May was appointed, as in former times, to
preside at the sports, and distribute the prizes and
rewards
.
The picturesque situation of the village, and the
fancifulness of its rustic fetes, would often attract the
notice of casual visiters. Among these, on one May-day
was a young officer, whose regiment had been recently
quartered in the neighbourhood. He was charmed with
the native taste that pervaded this village pageant; but,
above all, with the dawning loveliness of the queen of
May. It was the village favourite, who was crowned
with flowers, and blushing and smiling in all the
beautiful
confusion of girlish diffidence and delight. The
artlessness
of rural habits enabled him readily to make her
acquaintance; he gradually won his way into her
intimacy
;
and paid his court to her in that unthinking way
in which young officers are too apt to trifle with rustic
simplicity.
There was nothing in his advances to startle or alarm.
He never even talked of love: but there are modes of
making it more eloquent than language, and which
convey
it subtilely and irresistibly into the heart. The
beam of the eye, the tone of the voice, the thousand
tendernesses
which emanate from every word, and look, and
actionthese form the true eloquence of love, and can
almost be felt and understood, but never described. Can
we wonder that they should readily win a heart young,
guileless, and susceptible? As to her, she loved almost
unconsciously; she scarcely inquired what was the
growing
passion that was absorbing every thought and feeling
or what were to be its consequences. She, indeed,
looked
not to the future. When present, his looks and words
occupied her whole attention; when absent, she thought,
but of what had passed at their recent interview. She
would wander with him through the green lanes and
rural
scenes of the vicinity. He taught her to see new
beauties
in nature; he talked in the language of polite and
cultivated life, and breathed into her ear the witcheries of
romance and poetry.
Perhaps there could not have been a passion, between
the sexes, more pure than this innocent girl's. The
gallant
figure of her youthful admirer, and the splendour of
his military attire, might at first have charmed her eye;
but it was not these that had captivated her heart. Her
attachment had something in it of idolatry. She looked
up to him as to a being of a superior order. She felt in
his society the enthusiasm of a mind naturally delicate and
poetical, and now first awakened to a keen perception of
the beautiful and grand. Of the sordid distinctions of
rank and fortune she thought nothing; it was the difference
of intellect, of demeanour, of manners, from those of the
rustic society to which she had been accustomed, that
elevated him in her opinion. She would listen to him
with charmed ear and downcast look of mute delight, and
her cheek would mantle with enthusiasm: or if ever she
ventured a shy glance of timid admiration, it was as
quickly
withdrawn, and she would sigh and blush at the idea
of her comparative unworthiness.
Her lover was equally impassioned; but his passion was
mingled with feelings of a coarser nature. He had begun
the connexion in levity; for he had often heard his
brother
officers boast of their village conquests, and thought
some triumph of the kind necessary to his reputation as a
man of spirit. But he was too full of youthful fervour.
His heart had not yet been rendered sufficiently cold and
selfish by a wandering and a dissipated life: it caught fire
from the very flame it sought to kindle; and before he
was aware of the nature of his situation, he became really
in love.
17
What was he to do? There were the old obstacles
which so incessantly occur in these heedless attachments.
His rank in lifethe prejudices of titled connexions
his dependence upon a proud and unyielding fatherall
forbade him to think of matrimony:but when he looked
down upon this innocent being, so tender and confiding,
there was a purity in her manners, a blamelessness in her
life, and a beseeching modesty in her looks that awed
down every licentious feeling. In vain did he try to
fortify
himself by a thousand heartless examples of men of
fashion; and to chill the glow of generous sentiment, with
that cold derisive levity with which he had heard them
talk of female virtue; whenever he came into her presence,
she was still surrounded by that mysterious, but
impressive
charm of virgin purity, in whose hallowed sphere no
guilty thought can live.
The sudden arrival of orders for the regiment to repair
to the continent completed the confusion of his mind. He
remained for a short time in a state of the most painful
irresolution
;
he hesitated to communicate the tidings, until
the day of marching was at hand; when he gave her the
intelligence in the course of an evening ramble.
The idea of parting had never before occurred to her.
It broke at once upon her dream of felicity; she looked
upon it as a sudden and insurmountable evil, and wept
with the guileless simplicity of a child. He drew her to
his bosom, and kissed the tears from her soft cheek; nor
did he meet with a repulse; for there are moments of
mingled sorrow and tenderness, which hallow the caresses
of affection. He was naturally impetuous; and the sight
of beauty, apparently yielding in his arms; the confidence
of his power over her; and the dread of losing her for
ever; all conspired to overwhelm his better feelingshe
ventured to propose that she should leave her home, and
be the companion of his fortunes.
He was quite a novice in seduction, and blushed and
faltered at his own baseness; but so innocent of mind
was his intended victim, that she was at first at a loss to
comprehend his meaning; and why she should leave her
native village and the humble roof of her parents? When
at last the nature of his proposal flashed upon her pure
mind, the effect was withering. She did not weep
she did not break forth into reproachshe said not a word
but she shrunk back aghast as from a viper; gave him a
look of anguish that pierced to his very soul; and
clasping
her hands in agony, fled, as if for refuge, to her
father's
cottage.
The officer retired, confounded, humiliated, and
repentant
.
It is uncertain what might have been the result
of the conflict of his feelings, had not his thoughts been
diverted by the bustle of departure. New scenes, new
pleasures, and new companions, soon dissipated his
self-reproach
,
and stifled his tenderness; yet, amidst the stir
of camps, the revelries of garrisons, the array of armies,
and even the din of battles, his thoughts would sometimes
steal back to the scene of rural quiet and village
simplicity
the
white cottagethe footpath along the silver
brook and up the hawthorn hedge, and the little village
maid loitering along it, leaning on his arm, and listening
to him with eyes beaming with unconscious affection.
The shock which the poor girl had received, in the
destruction of all her ideal world, had indeed been cruel.
Faintings and hysterics, had at first shaken her tender
frame, and were succeeded by a settled and pining
melancholy
.
She had beheld from her window the march of
the departing troops. She had seen her faithless lover
borne off, as if in triumph, amidst the sound of drum and
trumpet, and the pomp of arms. She strained a last
aching
gaze after him, as the morning sun glittered about his
figure, and his plume waved in the breeze: he passed
away like a bright vision from her sight and left her all
in darkness.
It would be trite to dwell on the particulars of her
after-story. It was, like other tales of love, melancholy.
She avoided society, and wandered out alone in the walks
she had most frequented with her lover. She sought,
like the stricken deer, to weep in silence and loneliness,
and brood over the barbed sorrow that rankled in her
soul. Sometimes she would be seen late of an evening
sitting in the porch of the village church; and the
milkmaids
,
returning from the fields, would now and then
overhear her, singing some plaintive ditty in the
hawthorn
walk. She became fervent in her devotions at
church: and as the old people saw her approach, so
wasted away, yet with a hectic bloom, and that hallowed
air which melancholy diffuses round the form, they would
make way for her, as for a thing spiritual, and, looking
after her, would shake their heads in gloomy foreboding.
She felt a conviction that she was hastening to the
tomb, but looked forward to it as a place of rest. The
silver cord that had bound her to existence was loosed,
and there seemed to be no more pleasure under the sun.
If ever her gentle bosom had entertained resentment
against her lover, it was extinguished. She was
incapable
of angry passions; and in a moment of saddened
tenderness
,
she penned him a farewell letter. It was
couched
in the simplest language; but touching from its very
simplicity. She told him that she was dying, and did
not conceal from him that his conduct was the cause.
She even depicted the sufferings which she had
experienced
;
but concluded with saying, that she could not die
in peace, until she had sent him her forgiveness and her
blessing,
By degrees her strength declined, so that she could no
longer leave the cottage. She could only totter to the
window, where, propped up in her chair, it was her
enjoyment
to sit all day and look out upon the landscape.
Still she uttered no complaint, nor imparted to any one
the malady that was preying upon her heart. She never
even mentioned her lover's name; but would lay her
head on her mother's bosom and weep in silence. Her
poor parents hung in mute anxiety over this fading
blossom of their hopes, still flattering themselves that it
might again revive to freshness, and that the bright
unearthly
bloom which sometimes flushed her cheek might
be the promise of returning health.
In this way she was seated between them one Sunday
afternoon; her hands were clasped in theirs, the lattice
was thrown open, and the soft air that stole in brought
with it the fragrance of the clustering honeysuckle which
her own hands had trained round the window.
Her father had just been reading a chapter in the Bible:
it spoke of the vanity of worldly things and of the joys
of heaven: it seemed to have diffused comfort and
serenity
through her bosom. Her eye was fixed on the
distant village church; the bell had tolled for the evening
service; the last villager was lagging into the porch
and every thing had sunk into that hallowed stillness
peculiar to the day of rest. Her parents were gazing on
her with yearning hearts. Sickness and sorrow, which
pass so roughly over some faces, had given her's the
expression
of a seraph's. A tear trembled in her soft blue
eye. Was she thinking of her faithless lover?or were
her thoughts wandering to that distant church-yard, into
whose bosom she might soon be gathered?
Suddenly the clang of hoofs was hearda horseman
galloped to the cottagehe dismounted before the
window
the
poor girl gave a faint exclamation, and sunk
back in her chair;it was her repentant lover! He
rushed into the house, and flew to clasp her to his
bosom
;
but her wasted formher death-like countenance
so wan, yet so lovely in its desolation,smote him to
the soul, and he threw himself in an agony at her feet.
She was too faint to riseShe attempted to extend her
trembling handher lips moved as if she spoke, but no
word was articulatedshe looked down upon him with
a smile of unutterable tenderness,and closed her eyes
for ever!
Such are the particulars which I gathered of this
village
story. They are but scanty, and I am conscious
have little novelty to recommend them. In the present
rage also for strange incident and high-seasoned narrative,
they may appear trite and insignificant, but they
interested
me strongly at the time; and, taken in connexion
with the affecting ceremony which I just witnessed, left
a deeper impression on my mind than many
circumstances
of a more striking nature. I have passed through
the place since, and visited the church again, from a
better
motive than mere curiosity. It was a wintry
evening
;
the trees were stripped of their foliage; the
church-yard
looked naked and mournful, and the wind rustled
coldly through the dry grass. Evergreens, however, had
been planted about the grave of the village favourite, and
osiers were bent over it to keep the turf uninjured.
The church door was open, and I stepped in. There
hung the chaplet of flowers and the gloves as on the day
of the funeral: the flowers were withered, it is true, but
care seemed to have been taken that no dust should soil
their whiteness. I have seen many monuments, where
art has exhausted its powers to awaken the sympathy of
the spectator; but I have met with none that spoke more
touchingly to my heart, than this simple, but delicate
memento of departed innocence.
DOMESTIC SCENE.
The
family meeting was warm and affectionate; as the
evening was far advanced, the Squire would not permit
17*
us to change our travelling dresses, but ushered us at once
to the company, which was assembled in a large
old-fashioned
hall. It was composed of different branches of
a numerous family connexion, where there were the
usual proportion of old uncles and aunts, comfortable
married dames, superannuated spinsters, blooming
country
cousins, half-fledged striplings, and bright-eyed
boarding
school hoydens. They were variously occupied;
some at a round game of cards; others conversing around
the fire-place; at one end of the hall was a group of the
young folks, some nearly grown up, others of a more
tender
and budding age, fully engrossed by a merry game;
and a profusion of wooden horses, penny trumpets, and
tattered dolls about the floor, showed traces of a troop of
little fairy beings, who having frolicked through a happy
day, had been carried off to slumber through a peaceful
night.
MASTER SIMON.
The
mirth of the company was greatly promoted by the
humours of an eccentric personage whom Mr.
Bracebridge
always addressed with the quaint appellation of
Master Simon. He was a tight brisk little man, with the
air of an arrant old bachelor. His nose was shaped like
the bill of a parrot; his face slightly pitted with the small
pox, with a dry perpetual bloom on it, like a frost-bitten
leaf in autumn. He had an eye of great quickness and
vivacity, with a drollery and lurking waggery of
expression
that was irresistible. He was evidently the wit of
the family, dealing very much in sly jokes and
innuendoes
with the ladies, and making infinite merriment by
harpings upon old themes; which, unfortunately, my
ignorance
of the family chronicles did not permit me to
enjoy. It seemed to be his great delight during supper
to keep a young girl next him in a continual agony of
stifled laughter, in spite of her awe of the reproving looks
of her mother, who sat opposite. Indeed, he was the
idol of the younger part of the company, who laughed at
every thing he said or did, and at every turn of his
countenance
.
I could not wonder at it; for he must have
been a miracle of accomplishments in their eyes. He
could imitate Punch and Judy; make an old woman of
his hand, with the assistance of a burnt cork and pocket
handkerchief: and cut an orange into such a ludicrous
caricature, that the young folks were ready to die with
laughing.
PERSEVERANCE.
Like
as a mighty grampus, who, though assailed and
buffeted by roaring waves and brawling surges, still keeps
on an undeviating course; and though overwhelmed by
boisterous billows, still emerges from the troubled deep,
spouting and blowing with tenfold violenceso did the
inflexible Peter pursue, unwavering, his determined
career
,
and rise contemptuous above the clamours of the
rabble.
A DOLEFUL DISASTER OF ANTHONY
THE TRUMPETER.
Resolutely
bent, however, upon defending his beloved
city, in despite even of itself, he called unto him his trusty
Van Corlear, who was his right-hand man in all times of
emergency. Him did he adjure to take his
war-denouncing
trumpet, and mounting his horse, to beat up the
country, night and daysounding the alarm along the
pastoral borders of the Bronxstartling the wild
solitudes
of Crotonarousing the rugged yeomanry of
Wee-hawk
and Hobokenthe mighty men of battle of
Tappan
Bay
[15]
[15]
A corruption of Top paun; so called from a tribe of Indians
which boasted of 150 fighting men. See Ogilvie's History.
;and the brave boys of Tarry town and Sleepy
hollowtogether with all the other warriors of the
country
round about; charging them one and all, to sling their
powder horns, shoulder their fowling-pieces, and march
merrily down to the Manhattoes.
Now there was nothing in all the world, the divine sex
excepted, that Anthony Van Corlear loved better than
errands of this kind. So, just stopping to take a lusty
dinner, and bracing to his side his junk-bottle, well charged
with heart-inspiring Hollands, he issued jollily from the
city gate that looked out upon what is at present called
Broad-way; sounding as usual a farewell strain, that
rung in sprightly echoes through the winding streets of
New-AmsterdamAlas! never more were they to be
gladdened by the melody of their favourite trumpeter!
It was a dark and stormy night when the good Anthony
arrived at the famous creek (sagely denominated
Harlem
river
) which separates the island of Manna-hata from
the main land. The wind was high, the elements were
in an uproar, and no Charon could be found to ferry the
adventurous sounder of brass across the water. For a
short time he vapoured like an impatient ghost upon the
brink, and then, bethinking himself of the urgency of his
errand, took a hearty embrace of his stone bottle, swore
most valorously, that he would swim across,
en spijt den
duyvel
(in spite of the devil!) and daringly plunged into
the stream.Luckless Anthony! scarce had he buffeted
half-way over, when he was observed to struggle violently,
as if battling with the spirit of the watersinstinctively
he put his trumpet to his mouth, and giving a vehement
blast, sunk for ever to the bottom!
The potent clangour of his trumpet, like the ivory horn
of the renowned Paladin Orlando, when expiring in the
glorious field of Roncesvalles, rung far and wide through
the country, alarming the neighbours round, who hurried
in amazement to the spot.Here an old Dutch burgher,
famed for his veracity, and who had been a witness of the
fact, related to them the melancholy affair; with the
fearful
addition (to which I am slow of giving belief,) that
he saw the duyvel, in the shape of a huge moss-bonker,
seize the sturdy Anthony by the leg, and drag him
beneath
the waves. Certain it is, the place, with the
adjoining
promontory, which projects into the Hudson, has
been called
Spijt den duyvel
or
Spiking duyvel
ever since,
the restless ghost of the unfortunate Anthony still
haunts the surrounding solitudes, and his trumpet has
often been heard by the neighbours, of a stormy night,
mingling with the howling of the blast. Nobody ever
attempts to swim over the creek after dark; on the
contrary
,
a bridge has been built to guard against such
melancholy
accidents in futureand as to moss-bonkers,
they are held in such abhorrence that no true Dutchman
will admit them to his table, who loves good fish, and
hates the devil.
Such was the end of Anthony Van Corleara man
deserving of a better fate. He lived roundly and
soundly
,
like a true and jolly bachelor, until the day of his
death; but though he was never married, yet did he leave
behind, some two or three dozen children, in different
parts of the countryfine chubby, brawling flatulent
little urchins, from whom, if legends speak true (and they
are not apt to lie,) did descend the innumerable race of
editors, who people and defend this country, and who are
bountifully paid by the people for keeping up a constant
alarmand making them miserable. Would that they
inherited the worth, as they do the wind, of their
renowned
progenitor!
THE GRIEF OF PETER STUYVESANT.
The
tidings of this lamentable catastrophe imparted a
severer pang to the bosom of Peter Stuyvesant than did
even the invasion of his beloved Amsterdam. It came
ruthlessly home to those sweet affections that grow close
around the heart, and are nourished by its warmest
current
.
As some lone pilgrim wandering in trackless
wastes while the tempest whistles through his locks, and
dreary night is gathering around, sees stretched, cold and
lifeless, his faithful dogthe sole companion of his
journeying
who
had shared his solitary meal, and so often
licked his hand in humble gratitude;so did the
generous-hearted
hero of the Manhattoes contemplate the
untimely
end of his faithful Anthony. He had been the
humble attendant of his footstepshe had cheered him
in many a heavy hour, by his honest gaiety; and had
followed him in loyalty and affection, through many a
scene of direful peril and mishap. He was gone for ever
and that too at a moment when every mongrel cur
seemed skulking from his side.
The dignified Retirement and mortal Surrender of Peter
the Headstrong.
Thus
then have I concluded this great historical
enterprise
;
but, before I lay aside my weary pen, there yet
remains to be performed one pious duty. If among the
variety of readers that may peruse this book, there should
haply be found any of those souls of true nobility, which
glow with celestial fire, at the history of the generous and
the brave, they will doubtless be anxious to know the fate
of the gallant Peter Stuyvesant. To gratify one such
sterling heart of gold I would go more lengths than to
instruct the cold-blooded curiosity of a whole fraternity of
philosophers.
No sooner had that high-mettled cavalier signed the
articles
of capitulation, than, determined not to witness the
humiliation of his favourite city, he turned his back on its
walls, and made a growling retreat to his
Bouwery
, or
country-seat, which was situated about two miles off;
where he passed the remainder of his days in patriarchal
retirement. There he enjoyed that tranquillity of mind
which he had never known amid the distracting cares of
government; and tasted the sweets of absolute and
uncontrolled
authority, which his factious subjects had so often
dashed with the bitterness of opposition.
No persuasions could ever induce him to revisit the city
on the contrary, he would always have his great
arm-chair
placed with its back to the windows which looked in
that direction; until a thick grove of trees planted by his
own hand grew up and formed a screen that effectually
excluded
it from the prospect. He railed continually at the
degenerate innovations and improvements introduced by
the conquerorsforbade a word of their detested language
to be spoken in his family, a prohibition readily obeyed,
since none of the household could speak any thing but
Dutchand even ordered a fine avenue to be cut down
in front of his house, because it consisted of English cherry
trees.
The same incessant vigilance, that blazed forth when he
had a vast province under his care, now showed itself with
equal vigour, though in narrower limits. He patrolled
with unceasing watchfulness around the boundaries of his
little territory; repelled every encroachment with intrepid
promptness; punished every vagrant depredation upon his
orchard or his farm yard with inflexible severity; and
conducted
every stray hog or cow in triumph to the pound.
But to the indigent neighbour, the friendless stranger, or
the weary wanderer, his spacious door was ever open, and
his capacious fire-place, that emblem of his own warm and
generous heart, had always a corner to receive and cherish
them. There was an exception to this, I must confess, in case
the ill-starred applicant was an Englishman or a Yankee;
to whom, though he might extend the hand of assistance,
he could never be brought to yield the rites of hospitality.
Nay, if peradventure some straggling merchant of the east,
should stop at his door, with his cart load of tin ware or
wooden bowls, the fiery Peter would issue forth like a giant
from his castle, and make such a furious clattering among
his pots and kettles, tht the vender of
notions
was fain
to betake himself to instant flight.
His ancient suit of regimentals, worn threadbare by the
brush, were carefully hung up in the state bedchamber, and
regularly aired the first fair day of every month; and his
cocked hat and trusty sword were suspended in grim
repose
over the parlour mantlepiece, forming supporters to a
full length portrait of the renowned Admiral Von Tromp.
In his domestic empire he maintained strick discipline, and
a well organized despotic government; but though his own
will was the supreme law, yet the good of his subjects was
his constant object. He watched over, not merely their
immediate comforts, but their morals, and their ultimate
welfare; for he gave them abundance of excellent
admonition
,
nor could any of them complain, that, when occasion
required, he was by any means niggardly in bestowing
wholesome correction.
The good old Dutch festivals, those periodical
demonstrations
of an overflowing heart and a thankful spirit,
which are falling into sad disuse among my fellow-citizens,
were faithfully observed in the mansion of Governor
Stuyvesant
.
New-year was truly a day of open-handed
liberality
,
of jocund revelry, and warm-hearted congratulation
when the bosom seemed to swell with genial
good-fellowship
;
and the plenteous table was attended with an
unceremonious freedom, and honest broad-mouthed
merriment
,
unknown in these days of degeneracy and
refinement
.
Paas and Pinxter were scrupulously observed
throughout his dominions; nor was the day of St. Nicholas
suffered to pass by without making presents, hanging the
stocking in the chimney, and complying with all its other
ceremonies.
Once a year, on the first day of April, he used to array
himself in full regimentals, being the anniversary of his
triumphal entry into New-Amsterdam, after the conquest
of New-Sweden. This was always a kind of Saturnalia
among the domestics, when they considered themselves at
liberty in some measure to say and do what they pleased;
for on this day their master was always observed to
unbend
,
and become exceedingly pleasant and jocose, sending
the old gray-headed negroes on April fools' errands for
pigeon's milk; not one of whom but allowed himself to be
taken in, and humoured his old master's jokes as became a
faithful and well disciplined dependant. Thus did he
reign, happily and peacefully on his own landinjuring
no manenvying no manmolested by no outward strifes
perplexed by no internal commotions; and the mighty
monarchs of the earth, who were vainly seeking to maintain
peace, and promote the welfare of mankind, by war and
desolation, would have done well to have made a voyage to
the little island of Manna-hatta, and learned a lesson in
government from the domestic economy of Peter
Stuyvesant
.
In process of time, however, the old governor, like all
other children of mortality, began to exhibit evident tokens
of decay. Like an aged oak, which, though it long has
braved the fury of the elements, and still retains its
gigantic
proportions, yet begins to shake and groan with every
blastso the gallant Peter, though he still bore the port
and semblance of what he was in the days of his
hardihood
and chivalry, yet did age and infirmity begin to sap
the vigour of his frame; but his heart, that most
unconquerable
citadel, still triumphed unsubdued. With
matchless
avidity would he listen to every article of intelligence
concerning the battles between the English and Dutch.
Still would his pulse beat high whenever he heard of the
victories of De Ruyter; and his countenance lower, and
his eyebrows knit, when fortune turned in favour of the
English. At length, as on a certain day, he had just
smoked his fifth pipe, and was napping after dinner, in his
arm-chair, conquering the whole British nation in his
dreams, he was suddenly aroused by a fearful ringing of
bells, rattling of drums, and roaring of cannon, that put all
his blood in a ferment. But when he learned that these
rejoicings were in honour of a great victory obtained by the
combined English and French fleets over the brave De
Ruyter and the younger Von Tromp, it went so much to
his heart, that he took to his bed, and in less than three
days was brought to death's door by a violent cholera
morbus
!
But even in this extremity he still displayed the
unconquerable
spirit of Peter
the Headstrong;
holding out,
to the last gasp, with the most inflexible obstinacy, against
a whole army of old women, who were bent upon driving
the enemy out of his bowels, after a true Dutch mode of
defence, by inundating the seat of war with catnip and
pennyroyal.
While he thus lay, lingering on the verge of dissolution,
news was brought him, that the brave Ruyter had suffered
but little losshad made good his retreatand meant once
more to meet the enemy in battle. The closing eye of the
old warrior kindled at the wordshe partly raised himself
in beda flash of martial fire beamed across his visage
he clenched his withered hand as if he felt within his gripe
that sword which waved in triumph before the walls of Fort
Christina, and, giving a grim smile of exultation, sunk back
upon his pillow, and expired.
Thus died Peter Stuyvesant, a valiant soldier, a loyal
subject, an upright governor, and an honest Dutchman
who wanted only a few empires to desolate to have been
immortalized as a hero!
His funeral obsequies were celebrated with the utmost
grandeur and solemnity. The town was perfectly emptied
of its inhabitants, who crowded in throngs to pay the last
sad honours to their good old governor. All his sterling
qualities rushed in full tide upon their recollections, while
the memory of his foibles and his faults had expired with
him. The ancient burghers contended who should have
the privilege of bearing the pallthe populace strove who
should walk nearest to the bierand the melancholy
procession
was closed by a number of gray-headed negroes,
who had wintered and summered in the household of their
departed master for the greater part of a century.
With sad and gloomy countenances, the multitude
gathered
round the grave. They dwelt with mournful hearts
on the sturdy virtues, the signal services, and the gallant
exploits of the brave old worthy. They recalled with
secret upbraidings, their own factious oppositions to his
governmentand many an ancient burgher, whose
phlegmatic
features had never been known to relax, nor his
eyes to moisten, was now observed to puff a pensive pipe,
and the big drop to steal down his cheekwhile he
muttered, with affectionate accent and melancholy shake
of the headWell den!Hard-Koppig Peter ben gone
at last.
His remains were deposited in the family vault, under
a chapel, which he had piously erected on his estate, and
dedicated to St. Nicholasand which stood on the
identical
18
spot at present occupied by St. Mark's Church, where
his tombstone is still to be seen. His estate, or
Bouwery
,
as it was called, has ever continued in the possession of
his descendants; who by the uniform integrity of their
conduct, and their strict adherence to the customs and
manners that prevailed in the
good old times
, have
proved themselves worthy of their illustrious ancestor.
Many a time and oft has the farm been haunted at night
by enterprising money diggers, in quest of pots of gold
said to have been buried by the old governorthough I
cannot learn that any of them have ever been enriched
by their researchesand who is there, among my
native-born
fellow citizens, that does not remember, when in
the mischievous days of his boyhood, he conceived it a
great exploit to rob Stuyvesant's orchard on a holiday
afternoon?
At this strong hold of the family may still be seen
certain
memorials of the immortal Peter. His full length
portrait frowns in martial terrors from the parlour wall
his cocked hat and sword still hang up in the best
bed-room
.
His brimstone coloured breeches were for a long
while suspended in the hall, until some years since they
occasioned a dispute between a new married couple. And
his silver mounted wooden leg is still treasured up in the
store room as an invaluable relique.
MORNING.
And
now the rosy blush of morn began to mantle in the
east, and soon the rising sun, emerging from amidst
golden
and purple clouds, shed his blythesome rays on the
tin weathercocks of Communipaw. It was that delicious
season of the year, when nature, breaking from the
chilling
thraldom of old winter, like a blooming damsel from
the tyranny of a sordid father, threw herself, blushing
with ten thousand charms, into the arms of youthful
spring. Every tufted copse and blooming grove
resounded
with the notes of hymeneal love. The very insects,
as they sipped the dew that gemmed the tender grass of
the meadows, joined in the joyous epithalaniumthe
virgin
bud timidly put forth its blushes, the voice of the
turtle was heard in the land, and the heart of man
dissolved
away in tenderness.
THE AUTHOR'S ACCOUNT OF HIS
HISTORY
OF NEW-YORK.
I am
aware that I shall incur the censure of numerous
very learned and judicious critics, for indulging too
frequently
in the bold excursive manner of my favourite
Herodotus. And to be candid, I have found it
impossible
always to resist the allurements of those pleasing
episodes which, like flowery banks and fragrant bowers,
beset the dusty road of the historian, and entice him to
turn aside and refresh himself from his wayfaring. But
I trust it will be found that I have always resumed my
staff, and addressed myself to my weary journey with
renovated spirits, so that both my readers and myself have
been benefited by the relaxation.
Indeed, though it has been my constant wish and
uniform endeavour to rival Polybius himself, in
observing
the requisite unity of History, yet the loose and
unconnected manner in which many of the facts herein
recorded have come to hand, rendered such an attempt
extremely difficult. This difficulty was likewise increased
by one of the grand objects contemplated in my work,
which was to trace the rise of sundry customs and
institutions
in this best of cities, and to compare them when in
the germ of infancy with what they are in the present old
age of knowledge and improvement.
But the chief merit on which I value myself, and
found my hopes for future regard, is that faithful
veracity
with which I have compiled this invaluable little
work; carefully winnowing away the chaff of
hypothesis
,
and discarding the tares of fable, which are too apt
to spring up and choke the seeds of truth and
wholesome
knowledge.Had I been anxious to captivate the
superficial throng, who skim like swallows over the
surface
of literature; or had I been anxious to commend my
writings to the pampered palates of literary epicures
I might have availed myself of the obscurity that
over-shadows
the infant years of our city, to introduce a
thousand
pleasing fictions. But I have serupulously
discarded
many a pithy tale and marvellous adventure, whereby
the drowsy air of summer indolence might be enthralled;
jealously maintaining that fidelity, gravity, and dignity
which should ever distinguish the historian.
WESTMINSTER ABBEY.
I rose
and prepared to leave the abbey. As I descended
the flight of steps which lead into the body of the
building
,
my eye was caught by the shrine of Edward the
Confessor, and I ascended the small staircase that
conducts
to it, to take from thence a general survey of this
wilderness of tombs. The shrine is elevated upon a
kind of platform, and close around it are the sepulchres
of various kings and queens. From this eminence the eye
looks down between pillars and funeral trophics to the
chapels and chambers below, crowded with tombs; where
warriors, prelates, courtiers and statesmen lie
mouldering
in their beds of darkness. Close by me stood
the great chair of coronation, rudely carved of oak, in
the barbarous taste of a remote and gothic age. The
scene seemed almost as if contrived, with theatrical
artifice
,
to produce an effect on the beholder. Here was
a type of the beginning and the end of human pomp and
power; here it was literally but a step from the throne
to the sepulchre. Would not one think that these
incongruous
mementos had been gathered together as a
lesson
to living greatness?to shew it, even in the moment
of its proudest exaltation, the neglect and dishonour to
which it must soon arrive; how soon that crown which
encircles its brow must pass away; and it must lie down
in the dust and disgraces of the tomb, and be trampled
upon by the feet of the meanest of the multitude. For,
strange to tell, even the grave is here no longer a sanctuary.
There is a shocking levity in some natures, which leads
them to sport with awful and hallowed things, and there
are base minds, which delight to revenge on the
illustrious
dead the abject homage and grovelling servility which
they pay to the living. The coffin of Edward the
Confessor
has been broken open, and his remains despoiled
of their funeral ornaments; the sceptre has been stolen
from the hand of the imperious Elizabeth, and the effigy
of Henry the Fifth lies headless. Not a royal monument
but bears some proof how false and fugitive is the homage
of mankind. Some are plundered; some mutilated; some
covered with rihaldry and insultall more or less outraged
and dishonoured!
The last beams of day were now faintly streaming
through the painted windows in the high vaults above
me; the lower parts of the abbey were already wrapped
in the obscurity of twilight. The chapels and aisles
grew darker and darker. The effigies of the kings faded
into shadows; the marble figures of the monuments
assumed
strange shapes in the uncertain light; the evening
breeze crept through the aisles like the cold breath of the
grave; and even the distant footfall of a verger,
traversing
the Poet's Corner, had something strange and dreary
in its sound. I slowly retraced my morning's walk,
and as I passed out at the portal of the cloisters, the
door, closing with a jarring noise behind me, filled the
whole building with echoes.
I endeavoured to form some arrangement in my mind
of the objects I had been contemplating, but found they
were already falling into indistinctness and confusion.
Names, inscriptions, trophies, had all become confounded
in my recollection, though I had scarcely taken my foot
from off the threshold. What, thought I, is this vast
assemblage of sepulchres but a treasury of humiliation;
a huge pile of reiterated homilies on the emptiness of
renown
,
and the certainty of oblivion! It is, indeed, the
empire of death; his great shadowy palace; where he
sits in state, mocking at the reliques of human glory, and
spreading dust and forgetfulness on the monuments of
princes. How idle a boast, after all, is the immortality
of a name! Time is ever silently turning over his pages;
we are too much engrossed by the story of the present,
to think of the characters and anecdotes that gave
interest
to the past; and each age is a volume thrown aside
to be speedily forgotten. The idol of to-day pushes the
hero of yesterday out of our recollection; and will, in
turn, be supplanted by his successor of to-morrow.
MASTER HENRY HUDSON.
In
the ever memorable year of our Lord, 1609, on a
Saturday morning, the five and twentieth day of March,
old style, did that worthy and irrecoverable discoverer
(as he has justly been called,) Master Henry Hudson,
set sail from Holland in a stout vessel called the Half
Moon, being employed by the Dutch East India
Company
,
to seek a north-west passage to China.
18*
Henry, (or as the Dutch historians call him, Hendrick)
Hudson was a seafaring man of renown, who had
learned
to smoke tobacco under Sir Walter Raleigh, and is
said to have been the first to introduce it into Holland,
which gained him much popularity in that country, and
caused him to find great favour in the eyes of their High
Mightinesses, the lords states-general, and also of the
honourable West India Company. He was a short,
square, brawny old gentleman, with a double chin, a
mastiff mouth, and a broad copper nose, which was
supposed
in those days to have acquired its fiery hue from
the constant neighbourhood of his tobacco pipe.
He wore a true Andrea Ferrara tucked in a leathern
belt, and a commodore's cocked hat on one side of his
head. He was remarkable for always jerking up his
breeches when he gave out his orders, and his voice
sounded
not unlike the brattling of a tin trumpet, owing to the
number of hard north-westers which he had swallowed
in the course of his seafaring.
Such was Hendrick Hudson, of whom we have heard
so much and know so little; and I have been thus
particular
in his description, for the benefit of modern painters
and statuaries, that they may represent him as he was;
and not, according to their common custom, with modern
heroes, make them look like Csar, or Marcus Aurelius,
or the Apolla of Belvidere.
MASTER ROBERT JUET.
As
chief mate and favourite companion, the
commodore
chose Master Robert Juet, of Limehouse, in
England
.
By some his name has been spelled
Chewit
, and
ascribed to the circumstance of his having been the first
man that ever chewed tobacco; but this I believe to be a
mere flippancy; more especially as certain of his progeny
are living at this day, who write their names Juet. He
was an old comrade and early school-mate of the great
Hudson, with whom he had often played truant and
sailed chip boats in a neighbouring pond, when they were
little boys; from whence it is said the commodore first
derived his bias towards a seafaring life. Certain it is,
that the old people about Limehouse declared Robert Juet
to be an unlucky urchin, prone to mischief, that would
one day or other come to the gallows.
He grew up as boys of that kind often grow up, a
rambling
heedless varlet, tossed about in all quarters of the
worldmeeting with more perils and wonders than did
Sinbad the sailor, without growing a whit more wise,
prudent, or ill-natured. Under every misfortune he
comforted
himself with a quid of tobacco, and the true
philosophic
maxim, that it will be all the same thing a
hundred
years hence. He was skilled in the art of carving
anchors and true lovers' knots on the bulk-heads and
quarter-railings, and was considered a great wit on board
ship, in consequence of his playing pranks on every
body around, and now and then even making a wry
face at old Hendrick, when his back was turned.
To this universal genius we are indebted for many
particulars
concerning this voyage, of which he wrote a
history, at the request of the commodore, who had an
unconquerable aversion to writing hinself, from having
received so many floggings about it when at school. To
supply the deficiencies of Master Juet's Journal which
is written with true log book brevity, I have availed
myself
of divers family traditions, handed down from my
great great grandfather, who accompanied the
expedition
in the capacity of cabin boy.
A DUTCH VOYAGE OF DISCOVERY.
Suffice
it then to say, the voyage was prosperous and
tranquilthe crew being a patient people, much given to
slumber and vacuity, and but little troubled with the
disease
of thinkinga malady of the mind, which is the sure
breeder of discontent. Hudson had laid in abundance of
gin and sour crout, and every man was allowed to sleep
quietly at his post unless the wind blew. True it is, some
slight dissatisfaction was shown on two or three
occasions
,
at certain unreasonable conduct of Commodore
Hudson. Thus, for instance, he forbore to shorten sail
when the wind was light, and the weather serene, which
was considered among the most experienced Dutch
seamen
,
as certain
weather breeders
, or prognostics, that the
weather would change for the worse. He acted,
moreover
in direct contradiction to that ancient and sage rule
of the Dutch navigators, who always took in sail at
night; put the helm aport, and turned in; by which
precaution they had a good night's rest, were sure of
knowing where they were the next morning, and stood
but little chance of running down a continent in the
dark. He likewise prohibited the seamen from wearing
more than five jackets, and six pair of breeches, under
pretence of rendering them more alert; and no man was
permitted to go aloft, and hand in sails, with a pipe in
his mouth, as is the invariable Dutch custom at the
present day. All these grievances, though they might
ruffle for a moment the constitutional tranquillity of the
honest Dutch tars, made but a transient impression; they
ate hugely, drank profusely, and slept immeasurably; and
being under the especial guidance of providence, the ship
was safely conducted to the coast of America; where,
after sundry unimportant touchings and standings off and
on, she at length, on the fourth day of September,
entered
that majestic bay, which at this day expands its ample
bosom before the city of New-York, and which had never
before been visited by any European.
LETTER
FROM MUSTAPHA RUB-A-DUB KELIKHAN,
To Asem Hacchem, principal Slave-driver to his Highness
the Bashaw of Tripoli
.
Though
I am often disgusted, my good Asem, with
the vices and absurdities of the men of this country, yet
the women afford me a world of amusement. Their
lively prattle is as diverting as the chattering of the
red-tailed
parrot, nor can the green-headed monkey of
Timandi
equal them in whim and playfulness. But,
notwithstanding
these valuable qualifications, I am sorry to
observe they are not treated with half the attention
bestowed
on the before-mentioned animals. These infidels
put their parrots in cages and chain their monkeys; but
their women, instead of being carefully shut up in
harems
and seraglios, are abandoned to the direction of their
own reason, and suffered to run about in perfect freedom,
like other domestic animals: this comes, Asem, of
treating
their women as rational beings, and allowing them
souls. The consequence of this piteous neglect may easily
be imagined;they have degenerated into all their native
wildness, are seldom to be caught at home, and, at an
early age, take to the streets and highways, where they
rove about in droves, giving almost as much annoyance
to the peaceable people as the troops of wild dogs that
infest
our great cities, or the flights of locusts that
sometimes
spread famine and desolation over whole regions of
fertility.
This propensity to relapse into pristine wildness
convinces
me of the untameable disposition of the sex, who
may indeed be partially domesticated by a long course of
confinement and restraint, but the moment they are
restored
to personal freedom, become wild as the young
partridge of this country, which, though scarcely half
hatched, will take to the fields and run about with the
shell upon its back.
Notwithstanding their wildness, however, they are
remarkably
easy of access, and suffer themselves to be
approached
,
at certain hours of the day, without any
symptoms
of apprehension; and I have even happily succeeded
in detecting them at their domestic occupations. One
of the most important of these consists in thumping
vehemently
on a kind of musical instrument, and
producing
a confused, hideous, and undefinable uproar, which
they call the description of a battlea jest, no doubt, for
they are wonderfully facetious at times, and make great
practice of passing jokes upon strangers. Sometimes they
employ themselves in painting little caricatures of
landscapes
,
wherein they will display their singular drollery
in battering nature fairly out of countenance
representing
her tricked out in all the tawdry finery of copper
skies, purple rivers, calico rocks, red grass, clouds that
look like old clothes set adrift by the tempest, and foxy
trees, whose melancholy foliage, drooping and curling
most fantastically, reminds me of an undressed periwig
that I have now and then seen hung on a stick in a
barber's
window. At other times they employ themselves
in acquiring a smattering of languages spoken by nations
on the other side of the globe, as they find their own
language
not sufficiently copious to supply their constant
demands, and express their multifarious ideas. But
their most important domestic avocation is to embroider,
on satin or muslin, flowers of a non-descript kind, in
which the great art is to make them as unlike nature as
possible; or to fasten little bits of silver, gold, tinsel, and
glass, on long stripes of muslin, which they drag after
them with much dignity whenever they go abroada
fine lady, like a bird of paradise, being estimated by the
length of her tail.
But do not, my friend, fall into the enormous error of
supposing that the exercise of these arts is attended with
any useful or profitable result; believe me, thou couldst
not indulge an idea more unjust and injurious; for it
appears to be an established maxim among the women of
this country, that a lady loses her dignity when she
condescends
to be useful, and forfeits all rank in society the
moment she can be convicted of earning a farthing.
Their labours, therefore, are directed not towards
supplying
their household, but in decking their persons, and
generous souls!they deck their persons, not so much
to please themselves, as to gratify others, particularly
strangers. I am confident thou wilt stare at this, my
good Asem, accustomed as thou art to our eastern
females
,
who shrink in blushing timidity even from the
glances of a lover, and are so chary of their favours, that
they even seem fearful of lavishing their smiles too
profusely
on their husbands. Here, on the contrary, the
stranger has the first place in female regard, and, so far
do they carry their hospitality, that I have seen a fine
lady
slight a dozen tried friends and real admirers, who
lived in her smiles and made her happiness their study,
merely to allure the vague and wandering glances of a
stranger, who viewed her person with indifference and
treated her advances with contempt.By the whiskers of
our sublime bashaw, but this is highly flattering to a
foreigner
!
and thou mayest judge how particularly pleasing
to one who is, like myself, so ardent an admirer of the
sex. Far be it from me to condemn this extraordinary
manifestation of good willlet their own countrymen
look to that.
Be not alarmed, I conjure thee, my dear Asem, lest I
should be tempted, by these beautiful barbarians, to break
the faith I owe to the three-and-twenty-wives, from whom
my unhappy destiny has perhaps severed me for ever;
no, Asem, neither time, nor the bitter succession of
misfortunes
that pursues me, can shake from my heart the
memory of former attachments. I listen with tranquil
heart to the strumming and prattling of these fair sirens;
their whimsical paintings touch not the tender chord of
my affections; and I would still defy their fascinations,
though they trailed after them trains as long as the
gorgeous
trappings which are dragged at the heels of the holy
camel of Mecca, or as the tail of the great beast in our
prophet's vision, which measured three hundred and
forty-nine
leagues, two miles, three furlongs, and a hand's
breadth in longitude.
The dress of these women is, if possible, more
eccentric
and whimsical than their deportment; and they take
an inordinate pride in certain ornaments which are
probably
derived from their savage progenitors. A woman
of this country, dressed out for an exhibition, is loaded
with as many ornaments as a Circassian slave when
brought out for sale. Their heads are tricked out with
little bits of horn or shell, cut into fantastic shapes; and
they seem to emulate each other in the number of these
singular baubles, like the women we have seen in our
journeys to Aleppo, who cover their heads with the
entire
shell of a tortoise, and thus equipped are the envy
of all their less fortunate acquaintance. They also
decorate
their necks and ears with coral, gold chains, and
glass beads, and load their fingers with a variety of rings;
though, I must confess, I have never perceived that they
wear any in their nosesas has been affirmed by
many
travellers. We have heard much of their painting
themselves most hideously, and making use of bear's
grease in great profusionbut this, I solemnly assure
thee, is a misrepresentation: civilization, no doubt,
having
gradually extirpated these nauseous practices. It is
true, I have seen two or three of these females who had
disguised their features with paint, but then it was merely
to give a tinge of red to their cheeks, and did not look
very frightful; and as to ointment, they rarely use any
now, except occasionally a little Grecian oil for their hair,
which gives it a glossy, greasy, and, as they think very
comely appearance. The last mentioned class of females,
I take it for granted, have been but lately caught and still
retain strong traits of their original savage propensities.
The most flagrant and inexcusable fault however,
which I find in those lovely savages, is the shameless and
abandoned exposure of their persons. Wilt not thou
suspect
me of exaggeration when I affirmwilt not thou blush
for them, most discreet Mussulman, when I declare to thee
that they are so lost to all sense of modesty as to expose
the whole of their faces from their forehead to the chin,
and they even go abroad with their hands uncovered!
Monstrous indelicacy!
But what I am going to disclose will doubtless appear
to thee still more incredible. Though I cannot forbear
paying a tribute of admiration to the beautiful faces of
these fair infidels, yet I must give it as my firm opinion
that their persons are preposterously unseemly. In vain
did I look around me, on my first landing, for those
divine
forms of redundant proportions, which answer to
the true standard of eastern beautynot a single fat fair
one could I behold among the multitudes that thronged
the streets: the females that passed in review before me
tripping sportively along, resembled a procession of
shadows
,
returning to their graves at the crowing of the
cock.
This meagerness I first ascribed to their excessive
volubility
,
for I have somewhere seen it advanced by a
learned doctor, that the sex were endowed with a
peculiar
activity of tongue, in order that they might practise
talking as a healthful exercise, necessary to their confined
and sedentary mode of life. This exercise, it was
natural
to suppose, would be carried to great excess in a
logocracy
.
Too true, thought I, they have converted,
what was undoubtedly meant as a beneficent gift, into a
noxious habit, that steals the flesh from their bones and
the rose from their cheeksthey absolutely talk
themselves
thin! Judge then of my surprise when I was
assured, not long since, that this meagreness was
considered
the perfection of personal beauty, and that many a
lady starved herself, with all the obstinate perseverance
of a pious dervise, into a fine figure! Nay more, said
my informer, they will often sacrifice their healths in
this eager pursuit of skeleton beauty, and drink vinegar,
eat pickles, and smoke tobacco, to keep themselves within
the scanty outlines of the fashions.Faugh! Allah
preserve
me from such beauties, who contaminate their pure
blood with noxious recipes; who impiously sacrifice the
best gifts of Heaven to a preposterous and mistaken
vanity. Ere long I shall not be surprised to see them
scarring their faces like the negroes of Congo, flattening
their noses in imitation of the Hottentots, or like the
barbarians
of Ab-al Timar, distorting their lips and ears out
of all natural dimensions. Since I received this
information
,
I cannot contemplate a fine figure, without
thinking
of a vinegar cruet; nor look at a dashing belle,
without fancying her a pot of pickled cucumbers? What
a difference, my friend, between those shades and the
plump beauties of Tripoli,what a contrast between an
infidel fair one and my favourite wife, Fatima, whom I
bought by the hundred weight, and had trundled home
in a wheelbarrow!
But enough for the present; I am promised a faithful
account of the arcana of a lady's toilettea complete
initiation
into the arts, mysteries, spells and potions, in that
the whole chemical process, by which she reduces herself
down to the most fashionable standard of insignificance;
together with specimens of the strait waistcoats, the
lacings
,
the bandages, and the various ingenious instruments
with which she puts nature to the rack, and tortures
herself
into a proper figure to be admired.
Farewell, thou sweetest of slave drivers! The echoes
that repeat to a lover's ear the song of his mistress are not
more soothing than tidings from those we love. Let thy
answer to my letters be speedy; and never, I pray thee,
for a moment, cease to watch over the prosperity of my
house, and the welfare of my beloved wives. Let them
want for nothing, my friend, but feed them plentifully
on honey, boiled rice, and water gruel; so that when I
return
to the blessed land of my fathers, if that can ever be,
I may find them improved in size and loveliness, and sleek
as the graceful elephants that range the green valley of
Abimar.
Ever thine,
Mustapha
.
AUTUMNAL REFLECTIONS.
When
a man is quietly journeying downwards into the
valley of the shadow of departed youth, and begins to
contemplate
in a shortened perspective the end of his
pilgrimage
,
he becomes more solicitous than ever that the
remainder
of his wayfaring should be smooth and pleasant,
and the evening of his life, like the evening of a summer's
day, fade away in mild uninterrupted serenity. If haply
his heart has escaped uninjured, through the dangers of
a seductive world, it may then administer to the purest of
his felicities, and its chords vibrate more musically for the
trials they have sustainedlike the viol which yields a
melody sweet in proportion to its age.
To a mind thus temperately harmonized, thus
matured
and mellowed by a long lapse of years, there is
something truly congenial in the quiet enjoyment of
our early autumn, amid the tranquillities of the country.
There is a sober and chastened air of gaiety diffused over
19
the face of nature, peculiarly interesting to an old man;
and when he views the surrounding landscape withering
under his eye, it seems as if he and nature were taking a
last farewell of each other, and parting with a melancholy
smilelike a couple of old friends, who, having sported
away the spring and summer of life together, part at the
approach of winter with a kind of prophetic fear that they
are never to meet again.
It is either my good fortune or mishap to be keenly
susceptible to the influence of the atmosphere; and I can
feel in the morning, before I open my window, whether
the wind is easterly. It will not, therefore, I presume
be considered an extravagant instance of vainglory when
I assert, that there are few men who can discriminate
more accurately in the different varieties of damps, fogs,
Scotch-mists, and north-east storms, than myself. To
the great discredit of my philosophy I confess, I seldom
fail to anathematize and excommunicate the weather,
when it sports too rudely with my sensitive system; but
then I always endeavour to atone therefore, by eulogizing
it when deserving of approbation. And as most of my
readers, simple folk! make but one distinction, to wit, rain
and sunshineliving in most honest ignorance of the
various
nice shades which distinguish one fine day from
another
I
take the trouble from time to time, of letting them
into some of the secrets of nature,so will they be the
better enabled to enjoy her beauties, with the zest of
connoisseurs
,
and derive at least as much information from
my pages as from the weather-wise lore of the almanack.
Much of my recreation, since I retreated to the Hall,
has consisted in making little excursions through the
neighbourhood; which abounds in the variety of wild,
romantic
,
and luxuriant landscape that generally
characterizes
the scenery in the vicinity of our rivers. There is
not an eminence within a circuit of many miles but
commands
an extensive range of diversified and enchanting
prospect.
Often have I rambled to the summit of some favourite
hill, and thence, with feelings sweetly tranquil as the
lucid expanse of the heavens that canopied me, have noted
the slow and almost imperceptible changes that mark the
waning year. There are many features peculiar to our
autumn, and which give it an individual character: the
green and yellow melancholy that first steals over the
landscapethe mild and steady serenity of the weather,
and the transparent purity of the atmosphere, speak not
merely to the senses but the heart,it is the season of
liberal emotions. To this succeeds fantastic gaiety, a
motley dress, which the woods assume, where green and
yellow, orange, purple, crimson and scarlet, are
whimsically
blended together.A sickly splendour this!like
the wild and broken-hearted gaiety that sometimes
precedes
dissolution, or that childish sportiveness of
superannuated
age, proceeding, not from a vigorous flow of
animal spirits, but from the decay and imbecility of the
mind. We might, perhaps, be deceived by this gaudy
garb of nature, were it not for the rustling of the falling
leaf, which, breaking on the stillness of the scene, seems
to announce, in prophetic whispers, the dreary winter
that is approaching. When I have sometimes seen a
thrifty
young oak changing its hue of sturdy vigour for a
bright but transient glow of red, it has recalled to my mind
the treacherous bloom that once mantled the cheek of a
friend who is now no more; and which, while it seemed
to promise a long life of jocund spirits was the sure
precursor
of premature decay. In a little while, and this
ostentatious foliage disappearsthe close of autumn
leaves but one wide expanse of dusky brown, save where
some rivulet steals along, bordered with little stripes of
green grassthe woodland echoes no more to the carols of
the feathered tribes that sported in the leafy covert, and
its solitude and silence are uninterrupted except by the
plaintive whistle of the quail, the barking of the squirrel,
or the still more melancholy wintry wind, which, rushing
and swelling through the hollows of the mountains, sighs
through the leafless branches of the grove, and seems to
mourn the desolation of the year.
To one who, like myself, is fond of drawing
comparisons
between the different divisions of life and those of
the seasons, there will appear a striking analogy which
connects the feelings of the aged with the decline of the
year. Often as I contemplate the mild, uniform, and
genial lustre with which the sun cheers and invigorates
us in the month of October, and the almost
imperceptible
haze which, without obscuring, tempers all the
asperities
of the landscape, and gives to every object a
character
of stillness and repose, I cannot help comparing it
with that portion of existence, when the spring of
youthful
hope and the summer of the passions having gone by,
reason assumes an undisputed sway, and lights us on
with bright but undazzling lustre, adown the hill of life.
There is a full and mature luxuriance in the fields that
fills the bosom with generous and disinterested content.
It is not the thoughtless extravagance of spring, prodigal
only in blossoms, nor the languid voluptuousness of
summer
,
feverish in its enjoyments, and teeming only with
immature abundanceit is that certain fruition of the
labours of the pastthat prospect of comfortable realities,
which those will be sure to enjoy who have improved the
bounteous smiles of Heaven, nor wasted away their
spring and summer in empty trifling or criminal
indulgence
.
Cousin Pindar, who is my constant companion in
these expeditions, and who still possesses much of the
fire and energy of youthful sentiment, and a buxom
hilarity
of the spirits, often indeed draws me from these
half-melancholy
reveries, and makes me feel young again by
the enthusiasm with which he contemplates, and the
animation
with which he eulogizes the beauties of nature
displayed before him. His enthusiastic disposition never
allows him to enjoy things by halves, and his feelings are
continally breaking out in notes of admiration and
ejaculations
that sober reason might perhaps deem extravagant.
But for my part, when I see a hale hearty old man, who
has jostled through the rough path of the world, without
having worn away the fine edge of his feelings, or
blunted
his sensibility to natural and moral beauty, I compare
him to the evergreen of the forest, whose colours, instead
of fading at the approach of winter, seem to assume
additional
lustre when contrasted with the surrounding
desolation
.
Such a man is my friend Pindar;yet sometimes,
and particularly at the approach of evening, even he
will fall in with my humour; but he soon recovers his
natural tone of spirits; and, mounting on the elasticity of
his mind, like Ganymede on the eagle's wing, he soars to
the etherial regions of sunshine and fancy.
One afternoon we had strolled to the top of a high hill
in the neighbourhood of the Hall, which commands an
almost boundless prospect; and as the shadows began to
lengthen around us, and the distant mountains to fade
into mists, my cousin was seized with a moralizing fit.
It seems to me, said he, laying his hand lightly on
my shoulder, that there is just at this season, and this
hour, a sympathy between us and the world we are now
contemplating. The evening is stealing upon nature as
well as upon us;the shadows of the opening day have
given place to those of its close; and the only difference
is, that in the morning they were before us, now they are
behind; and that the first vanished in the splendours of
noon-day, the latter will be lost in the oblivion of night.
Our `May of life,' my dear Launce, has for ever fled: our
summer is over and gone:but, continued he, suddenly
recovering himself and slapping me gaily on the shoulder,
but why should we repine?What though the
capricious
zephyrs of spring, the heats and hurricanes of
summer, have given place to the sober sunshine of autumn
and though the woods begin to assume the dappled
livery
of decay! yet the prevailing colour is still greengay,
sprightly green.
Let us then comfort ourselves with this reflection;
that though the shades of the morning have given place
to those of the evening,though the spring is past, the
summer over, and the autumn come,still you and I
go on our way rejoicing;and while, like the lofty
mountans of our Southern America, our heads are
covered
with snow, still, like them, we feel the genial warmth
of spring and summer playing upon our bosoms.
THE FAMILY OF THE LAMBS.
The
family of the Lambs had long been among the most
thriving and popular in the neighbourhood; the Miss
Lambs were the belles of Little Britain, and every body
was pleased when Old Lamb had made money enough to
shut up shop, and put his name on a brass plate on his
door. In an evil hour, however, one of the Miss Lambs
had the honour of being a lady in attendance on the
Lady
Mayoress, at her grand annual ball, on which occasion
she wore three towering ostrich feathers on her head.
The family never got over it; they were immediately
smitten with a passion for high life; set up a one horse
carriage, put a bit of gold lace round the errand boy's hat,
and have been the talk and detestation of the whole
neighbourhood
ever since. They could no longer be induced to
play at Pope-Joan or blind-man's-buff; they could
endure
no dances but quadrilles, which no body had ever
heard of in Little Britian; and they took to readimg
novels
,
talking bad French, and playing upon the piano.
19*
Their brother too, who had been articled to an attorney,
set up for a dandy and a critic, characters hitherto
unknown
in these parts, and he confounded the worthy
folks exceedingly by talking about Kean, the Opera and
the Edinbro' Review.
What was still worse, the Lambs gave a grand ball,
to which they neglected to invite any of their old
neighbours
;
but they had a great deal of genteel company from
Theobald's Road, Red-lion Square, and other parts
towards
the west. There were several beaux of the
brother's
acquaintance from Gray's Inn Lane and Hatton
Garden; and not less than three Aldermen's ladies with
their daughters. This was not to be forgotten or
forgiven
.
All Little Britian was in an uproar with the
smacking of whips, the lashing of miserable horses, and
the rattling and jingling of hackney coaches. The
gossips
of the neighbourhood might be seen popping their
night caps out at every window, watching the crazy
vehicles
rumble by; and there was a knot of virulent old
crones, that kept a look-out from a house just opposite the
retired butcher's, and scanned and criticised every one
that knocked at the door.
This dance was a cause of almost open war, and the
whole neighbourhood declared they would have nothing
more to say to the Lambs. It is true that Mrs. Lamb,
when she had no engagements with her quality
acquaintance
,
would give little hum-drum tea junkettings to some
of her old cronies, quite, as she would say, in a
friendly way: and it is equally true that her invitations
were always accepted, in spite of all previous vows to
the contrary. Nay, the good ladies would sit and be
delighted
with the music of the Miss Lambs, who would
condescend to strum an Irish melody for them on the
piano; and they would listen with wonderful interest to
Mrs. Lamb's anecdotes of Alderman Plunket's family
of Port-soken-ward, and the Miss Timberlakes, the rich
heiresses of Crutched-Friars; but then they relieved their
consciences and averted the reproach of their
confederstes
,
by canvassing at the next gossiping convocation
every
thing that had passed, and pulling the Lambs and
their rout all to pieces.
The only one of the family that could not be made
fashionable
was the retired butcher himself. Honest Lamb,
in spite of the meekness of his name, was a rough hearty
old fellow, with the voice of a lion, a head of black
hair like a shoe-brush, and a broad face mottled like his
own beef. It was in vain that the daughters always
spoke of him as the old gentleman, addressed him as
papa in tones of infinite softness, and endeavoured to
coax him into a dressing gown and slippers, and other
gentlemanly habits. Do what they might, there was no
keeping down the butcher. His sturdy nature would
break through all their glossings. He had a hearty
vulgar
good humour that was irrepressible. His very jokes
made his sensitive daughters shudder; and he persisted
in wearing his blue cotton coat of a morning, dining at
two o'clock, and having a bit of sausage with his tea.
He was doomed, however, to share the unpopularity
of his family. He found his old comrades gradually
growing cold and civil to him; no longer laughing at his
jokes; and now and then throwing out a fling at some
people and a hint about quality binding. This both
nettled and perplexed the honest butcher; and his wife
and daughters, with the consummate policy of the
shrewder
sex, taking advantage of the circumstance, at length
prevailed upon him to give up his afternoon's pipe and
tankard at Wagstaff's; to sit after dinner by himself and
take his pint of porta liquor he detestedand to nod in
his chair in solitary and dismal gentility.
The Miss Lambs might now be seen flaunting along
the streets in French bonnets, with unknown beaux; and
talking and laughing so loud that it distressed the nerves
of every good lady within hearing. They even went so
far as to attempt patronage, and actually induced a French
dancing master to set up in the neighbourhood; but the
worthy folks of Little Britain took fire at it, and did so
persecute the poor Gaul, that he was fain to pack up
fiddle
and dancing pumps, and decamp with such
precipitation
,
that he absolutely forgot to pay for his lodgings.
I had flattered myself, at first, with the idea that all
this fiery indignation on the part of the community, was
merely the overflowing of their zeal for good old English
manners, and their horror of innovation; and I
applauded
the silent contempt they were so vociferous in
expressing
,
for upstart pride, French fashions, and the Miss
Lambs. But I grieve to say that I soon perceived the
infection had taken hold; and that my neighbours, after
condemning, were beginning to follow their example. I
overheard my landlady importuning her husband to let
their daughters have one quarter at French and music,
and that they might take a few lessons in quadrille. I
even saw, in the course of a few Sundays, no less than
five French bonnets, precisely like those of the Miss
Lambs, parading about Little Britian.
BLINDMAN'S-BUFF.
After
the dinner table was removed, the hall was
given up to the younger members of the family, who,
prompted to all kind of noisy mirth by the Oxonian and
Master Simon, made its old walls ring with their
merriment
,
as they played at romping games. I delight in
witnessing the gambols of children, and particularly at
this happy holiday season, and could not help stealing
out of the drawing-room on hearing one of their peals
of laughter. I found them at the game of
blindman's-buff
.
Master Simon who was the leader of their revels,
and seemed on all occasions to fulfil the office of that
ancient
potentate, the Lord of Misrule, was blinded in the
midst of the hall. The little beings were as busy about
him as the mock fairies about Falstaff; pinching him,
plucking at the skirts of his coat, and tickling him with
straws. One fine blue-eyed girl of about thirteen, with
her flaxen hair all in beautiful confusion, her frolic face
in a glow, her frock half torn off her shoulders, a
complete
picture of a romp, was the chief tormentor; and
from the slyness with which Master Simon avoided the
smaller game, and hemmed this wild little nymph in
corners
,
and obliged her to jump shrieking over chairs, I
suspected
the rogue of being not a whit more blinded than
was convenient.
THE ANGLER.
On
parting with the old angler I inquired after his
place of abode, and happening to be in the neighbourhood
of the village a few evenings afterwards, I had the
curiosity
to seek him out. I found him living in a small
cottage, containing only one room, but a perfect curiosity
in its method and arrangement. It was on the skirts of
the village, on a green bank, a little back from the road,
with a small garden in front, stocked with kitchen herbs,
and adorned with a few flowers. The whole front of the
cottage was overrun with a honeysuckle. On the top was
a ship for a weathercock. The interior was fitted up in
a truly nautical style; his ideas of comfort and convenience
having been acquired on the birth-deck of a man of war.
A hammock was slung from the ceiling, which, in the
day-time, was lashed up so as to take but little room.
From the centre of the chamber hung a model of a ship
of his own workmanship. Two or three chairs, a table,
and a large sea chest, formed the principal moveables.
About the walls were stuck up naval ballads, such as
Admiral
Hosier's Ghost, All in the downs, and Tom
Bowline
,
intermingled with pictures of sea fights, among which
the battle of Camperdown held a distinguished place.
The mantle-piece was decorated with sea shells; over
which hung a quadrant, flanked by two wood-cuts of most
bitter looking naval commanders. His implements for
angling
were carefully disposed on nails and hooks about the
room. On a shelf was arranged his library, containing a
work on angling, much worn; a bible covered with
canvass
;
an odd volume or two of voyages; a nautical
almanack
;
and a book of songs.
His family consisted of a large black cat with one eye,
and a parrot which he had caught and tamed, and
educated
himself, in the course of one of his voyages; and
which uttered a variety of sea phrases with the hoarse
brattling
tone of a veteran boatswain. The establishment
reminded
me of that of the renowned Robinson Crusoe; it
was kept in neat order, every thing being stowed away
with the regularity of a ship of war; and he informed me
he scoured the deck every morning, and swept it
between
meals.
I found him seated on a bench before the door,
smoking
his pipe in the soft evening sunshine. His cat was
purring soberly on the threshold, and his parrot
describing
some strange evolutions in an iron ring that swung
in the centre of his cage. He had been angling all day,
and gave me a history of his sport with as much
minuteness
as a general would talk over a campaign; being
particularly
animated in relating the manner in which he had
taken
a large trout, which had completely tasked all his skill
and wariness, and which he had sent as a trophy to mine
hostess of the inn.
How comforting it is to see a cheerful and contented
old age; and to behold a poor fellow, like this, after
being
tempest tost through life, safely moored in a snug
harbour, in the evening of his days! His happiness,
however
,
sprung from within himself, and was independent
of external circumstances; for he had that inexhaustible
good-nature, which is the most precious gift of Heaven;
spreading itself like oil over the troubled sea of thought,
and keeping the mind smooth and equable in the
roughest
weather.
On inquiring further about him, I learned that he was
a universal favourite in the village, and the oracle of the
tap-room; where he delighted the rustics with his songs,
and like Sinbad, astonished them with his stories of
strange lands, and shipwrecks, and sea fights. He was
much noticed too by gentlemen sportsmen of the
neighbourhood
;
had taught several of them the art of angling;
and was a privileged visiter to their kitchens. The
whole tenor of his life was quiet and inoffensive, being
principally passed about the neighbouring streams when
the weather and season were favourable; and at other
times he employed himself at home, preparing his fishing
tackle for the next campaign, or manufacturing rods, nets,
and flies for his patrons and pupils among the gentry.
He was a regular attendant at church on Sundays,
though he generally fell asleep during the sermon. He
had made it his particular request that when he died he
should be buried on a green spot, which he could see from
his seat in church, and which he had marked out ever
since he was a boy, and had thought of when far from
home on the raging sea, in danger of being food for the
fishesit was the spot where his father and mother had
been buried.
RURAL LIFE IN ENGLAND.
Nothing
can be more imposing than the magnificence of
English park scenery. Vast lawns that extend like sheets
of vivid green, with here and there clumps of gigantic
trees, heaping up rich piles of foliage. The solemn pomp
of groves and woodland glades, with the deer trooping in
silent herds across them; the hare, bounding away to the
covert; or the pheasant, suddenly bursting upon the wing.
The brook, taught to wind in natural meanderings, or
expand into a glassy lakethe sequestered pool, reflecting
the quivering trees, with the yellow leaf sleeping on its
bosom, and the trout roaming fearlessly about its limpid
waters: while some rustic temple or sylvan statue, grown
green and dank with age, gives an air of classic sanctity to
the seclusion.
These are but a few of the features of park scenery;
but what most delights me, is the creative talent with
which the English decorate the unostentatious abodes of
middle life. The rudest habitation, the most unpromising
and scanty portion of land, in the hands of an Englishman
of taste, becomes a little paradise. With a nicely
discriminating
eye, he seizes at once upon its capabilities,
and pictures in his mind the future landscape. The
sterile
spot grows into loveliness under his hand; and yet the
operations of art which produce the effect are scarcely to be
perceived. The cherishing and training of some trees; the
cautious pruning of others; the nice distribution of flowers
and plants of tender and graceful foliage; the introduction
of a green slope of velvet turf; the partial opening to a peep
of blue distance, or silver gleam of water; all these are
managed with a delicate tact, a pervading yet quiet
assiduity
,
like the magic touchings with which a painter finishes
up a favourite picture.
The residence of people of fortune and refinement in
the country has diffused a degree of taste and elegance in
rural economy, that descends to the lowest class. The
very labourer, with his thatched cottage and narrow slip
of ground, attends to their embellishment. The trim
hedge, the grass-plot before the door, the little flower-bed
bordered with snug box, the woodbine trained up against
the wall, and hanging its blossoms about the lattice, the
pot of flowers in the window, the holly providently
planted
about the house, to cheat winter of its dreariness, and
to throw in a semblance of green summer to cheer the
fire side: all these bespeak the influence of taste, flowing
down from high sources, and pervading the lowest levels
of the public mind. If ever Love, as poets sing, delights
to visit a cottage, it must be the cottage of an English
peasant.
The fondness for rural life among the higher classes of
the English has had a great and salutary effect upon the
national character. I do not know a finer race of men
than the English gentlemen. Instead of the softness and
effeminacy which characterize the man of rank in most
countries, they exhibit a union of elegance and strength,
a robustness of frame and freshness of complexion, which
I am inclined to attribute to their living so much in the
open air, and pursuing so eagerly the invigorating
recreations
of the country. These hardy exercises produce
also a healthful tone of mind and spirits, and a manliness
and simplicity of manners, which even the follies and
dissipations of the town cannot easily pervert, and can
never entirely destroy. In the country, too, the
different
orders of society seem to approach more freely, to be
more disposed to blend and operate favourably upon each
other. The distinctions between them do not appear to
be so marked and impassable, as in the cities. The
manner
in which property has been distributed into small
estates
and farms, has established a regular gradation from
the nobleman, through the classes of gentry, small
landed
proprietors, and substantial farmers, down to the
labouring
peasantry; and while it has thus banded the
extremes
of society together, has infused into each
intermediate
rank a spirit of independence. This, it must be
confessed, is not so universally the case at present as it
was formerly; the larger estates having, in late years of
distress, absorbed the smaller, and, in some parts of the
country, almost annihilated the sturdy race of small
farmers
.
These, however, I believe, are but casual breaks in
the general system I have mentioned.
In rural occupation there is nothing mean and
debasing
.
It leads a man forth among scenes of natural
grandeur
and beauty; it leaves him to the workings of his own
mind, operated upon by the purest and most elevating of
external influences. Such a man may be simple and
rough, but he cannot be vulgar. The man of refinement,
therefore, finds nothing revolting in an intercourse with
the lower orders of moral life, as he does when he casually
mingles with the lower of cities. He lays aside his
distance
and reserve, and is glad to wave the distinctions of
rank, and to enter into the honest, heartfelt enjoyments of
common life. Indeed the very amusements of the country
bring men more and more together; and the sound of
hound and horn blend all feelings into harmony. I
believe
this is one great reason why the nobility and gentry
are more popular among the inferior orders in England
than they are in any other country; and why the latter
have endured so many excessive pressures and extremities,
without repining more generally at the unequal
distribution
of fortune and privilege.
To this mingling of cultivated and rustic society may
also be attributed the rural feeling that runs through
British
literature; the frequent use of illustrations from rural
life; those incomparable descriptions of nature that abound
in the British Poetsthat have continued down from
the flower and the leaf of Chaucer, and have brought
into our closets all the freshness and fragrance of the dewy
landscape. The pastoral writers of other countries appear
as if they had paid nature an occasional visit, and become
acquainted with her general charms: but the British poets
have lived and revelled with her,they have wooed her
in her most secret haunts,they have watched her
minutest
caprices. A spray could not tremble in the breeze
a leaf could not rustle to the grounda diamond drop
could not patter in the streama fragrance could not
exhale from the humble violet, nor a daisy unfold its
crimson
tints to the morning; but it has been noticed by these
impassioned and delicate observers, and wrought up into
some beautiful morality.
LETTER
FROM MUSTAPHA RUB-A-DUB KELI KHAN,
To Muley Helim al Raggi, surnamed the agreeable
Ragamuffin
,
chief mountebank and buffo-dancer to
his Highness
.
The
numerous letters which I have written to our friend
the slave-driver, as well as those to thy kinsman
the
snorer
,
and which doubtless were read to thee, honest Muley,
have in all probability, awakened thy curiosity to know
further
particulars concerning the manners of the barbarians,
who hold me in such ignominious captivity. I was lately
at one of their public ceremonies, which, at first, perplexed
me exceedingly as to its object; but as the explanations of
a friend have let me somewhat into the secret, and as it
seems to bear no small analogy to thy profession, a
description
20
of it may contribute to thy amusement, if not to thy
instruction.
A few days since, just as I had finished my coffee, and
was perfuming my whiskers preparatory to a morning
walk, I was waited upon by an inhabitant of this place,
a gay young infidel, who has of late cultivated my
acquaintance
.
He presented me with a square bit of
painted
pasteboard, which he informed me, would entitle me
to admittance to the
city assembly
. Curious to know the
meaning of a phrase which was entirely new to me, I
requested an explanation; when my friend informed me
that the assembly was a numerous concourse of young
people of both sexes, who, on certain occasions, gathered
together to dance about a large room with violent
gesticulation
,
and try to out-dress each other. In short, said
he, If you wish to see the natives in all their glory, there's
no place like the
city assembly;
so you must go there and
sport your whiskers. Though the matter of sporting
my whiskers was considerably beyond my apprehension,
yet I now began, as I thought, to understand him. I
had heard of the war dances of the natives, which are a
kind of religious institution, and had little doubt but
that this must be a solemnity of the kindupon a
prodigious
great scale. Anxious as I am to contemplate
these strange people in every situation, I willingly
acceded
to his proposal, and, to be more at ease, I
determined
to lay aside my Turkish dress, and appear in
plain garments of the fashion of this country, as is my
custom whenever I wish to mingle in a crowd, without
exciting the attention of the gaping multitude.
It was long after the shades of night had fallen, before
my friend appeared to conduct me to the assembly.
These infidels, thought I, shroud themselves in
mystery, and seek the aid of gloom and darkness, to
heighten the solemnity of their pious orgies. Resolving
to conduct myself with that decent respect, which every
stranger owes to the customs of the land in which he
sojourns
,
I chastised my features into an expression of sober
reverence, and stretched my face into a degree of
longitude
suitable to the ceremony I was about to witness.
Spite of myself, I felt an emotion of awe stealing over
my senses as I approached the majestic pile. My
imagination
pictured something similar to a descent into the cave
of Dom-Daniel, where the necromancers of the East are
taught their infernal arts. I entered with the same
gravity
of demeanour that I would have approached the holy
temple of Mecca, and bowed my head three times as I
passed the threshold.Head of the mighty Amrou!
thought I, on being ushered into a splendid saloon, what
a display is here! surely I am transported to the
mansions
of the Houris, the elysium of the faithful!How
tame appeared all the descriptions of enchanted palaces in
our Arabian poetry! Where ever I turned my eyes, the
quick glances of beauty dazzled my vision and ravished
my heart: lovely virgins fluttered by me, darting
imperial
looks of conquest, or beaming such smiles of invitation,
as did Gabriel when he beckoned our holy prophet to
heaven. Shall I own the weakness of thy friend, good
Muley?while thus gazing on the enchanting scene
before
me, I for a moment forgot my country, and even the
memory of my three-and-twenty wives faded from my
heart; my thoughts were bewildered and led astray, by
the charms of these bewitching savages, and I sunk, for
a while, into that delicious state of mind where the senses,
all enchanted and all striving for mastery, produce an
endless variety of tumultuous, yet pleasing emotions. Oh,
Muley, never shall I again wonder that an infidel should
prove a recreant to the single solitary wife allotted him,
when even thy friend, armed with all the precepts of
Mahomet, can so easily prove faithless to
three-and-twenty
!
Whither have you led me? said I, at length, to my
companion, and to whom do these beautiful creatures
belong? certainly this must be the seraglio of the grand
bashaw of the city, and a most happy bashaw must he
be, to possess treasures which even his highness of
Tripoli
cannot parallel. Have a care, cried my
companion
,
how you talk of seraglios, or you will have all
these gentle nymphs about your ears; for seraglio is a
word which beyond all others, they abhor:most of
them, continued he, have no lord and master, but
come here to catch onethey're in the market, as we
term it. Ah, ha! said I, exultingly, then you
really have a fair, or slave market, such as we have in
the East, where the faithful are provided with the choicest
virgins of Georgia and Circassia?by our glorious
sun of Afric, but I should like to select some ten or a
dozen wives from so lovely an assemblage! pray what
would you suppose they might be bought for?
Before I could receive an answer, my attention was
attracted by two or three good-looking middle-sized men,
who being dressed in black, a colour universally worn in
this country by the muftis and dervises, I immediately
concluded to be high priests, and was confirmed in my
original opinion that this was a religious ceremony.
These reverend personages are entitled managers, and
enjoy unlimited authority in the assemblies, being armed
with swords, with which, I am told, they would
infallibly
put any lady to death who infringed the laws of the
temple. They walked round the room with great
solemnity
,
and, with an air of profound importance and
mystery, put a little piece of folded paper in each fair
hand, which I concluded were religious talismans. One
of them dropped on the floor, whereupon I slily put my
foot on it, and, watching an opportunity, picked it up
unobserved, and found it to contain some unintelligible
words and the mystic number 9. What were its virtues
I know not; except that I put it in my pocket, and have
hitherto been preserved from my fit of the lumbago,
which I generally have about this season of the year ever
since I tumbled into the well of Zim-zim on my
pilgrimage
to Mecca. I enclose it to thee in this letter, presuming
it to be particularly serviceable against the dangers of thy
profession.
Shortly after the distribution of these talismans, one
of the high priests stalked into the middle of the room
with great majesty, and clapped his hands three times:
a loud explosion of music succeeded from a number of
black, yellow, and white musicians, perched in a kind of
cage over the grand entrance. The company were
thereupon
thrown into great confusion and apparent
consternation
.They
hurried to and fro about the room, and at
length formed themselves into little groups of eight
persons
,
half male and half female;the music struck into
something like harmony, and, in a moment, to my utter
astonishment and dismay, they were all seized with what
I concluded to be a paroxysm of religious phrensy,
tossing
about their heads in a ludicrous style from side to
side, and indulging in extravagant contortions of figure;
now throwing their heels into the air, and anon
whirling
round with the velocity of the eastern idolators, who
think they pay a grateful homage to the sun by imitating
his motions. I expected every moment to see them fall
down in convulsions, foam at the mouth, and shriek with
fancied inspiration. As usual the females seemed most
fervent in their religious exercises, and performed them
with a melancholy expression of feature that was
peculiarly
touching; but I was highly gratified by the
exemplary
conduct of several male devotees, who, though their
gesticulations would intimate a wild merriment of the
feelings, maintained throughout as inflexible a gravity of
countenance as so many monkeys of the island of Borneo
at their antics.
And pray, said I, who is the divinity that
presides
in this splendid mosque?The divinity! Oh, I
understandyou mean the
belle
of the evening; we have
a new one every season.The one at present in fashion
is that lady you see yonder, dressed in white, with pink
ribbons, and a crowd of adorers around her. Truly,
cried I, this is the pleasantest deity I have encountered
in the whole course of my travels;so familiar, so
condescending
,
and so merry withal;why, her very
worshippers
take her by the hand, and whisper in her ear.
My good Mussulman, replied my friend with great
gravity, I perceive you are completely in an error
concerning
the intent of this ceremony. You are now in a
place of public amusement, not of public worship; and
the pretty looking young men you see making such
violent
grotesque distortions are merely indulging in our
favourite amusement of dancing. I cry your
mercy
,
exclaimed I, these then are the dancing men and
women of the town, such as we have in our principal
cities, who hire themselves out for the entertainment of
the wealthy;but, pray who pays them for this
fatiguing
exhibition?My friend regarded me for a moment
with an air of whimsical perplexity, as if doubtful
whether
I was in jest or in earnest'Sblood man, cried
he, these are some of our greatest people, our
fashionables
,
who are merely dancing here for amusement.
Dancing for amusement!
think of that, Muley!thou,
whose greatest pleasure is to chew opium, smoke tobacco,
loll on a couch, and doze thyself into the regions of the
Houris!Dancing for amusement!shall I never cease
having occasion to laugh at the absurdities of these
barbarians
,
who are laborious in their recreations, and
indolent
only in their hours of business!Dancing for
amusement
!the
very idea makes my bones ache, and I never
think of it without being obliged to apply my
handkerchief
to my forehead, and fan myself into some degree of
coolness.
And pray, said I, when my astonishment had a
20*
little subsided, do these musicians also toil for
amusement
,
or are they confined to their cage, like birds, to
sing for the gratification of others? I should think the
former was the case, from the animation with which they
flourish their elbows. Not so, replied my friend,
they are well paid, which is no more than just, for I
assure you they are the most important personages in the
room. The fiddler puts the whole assembly in motion,
and directs their movements, like the master of a
puppet-show
,
who sets all his pasteboard gentry kicking by a
jerk of his fingers.There now, look at that dapper
little
gentleman yonder, who appears to be suffering the
pangs of dislocation in every limb: he is the most expert
puppet in the room, and performs not so much for his
own amusement, as for that of the bystanders. Just
then, the little gentleman having finished one of his
paroxysms
of activity, seemed to be looking round for
applause
from the spectators. Feeling myself really much
obliged to him for his exertions, I made him a low bow
of thanks, but nobody followed my example, which I
thought a singular instance of ingratitude.
Thou wilt perceive, friend Muley, that the dancing of
these barbarians is totally different from the science
professed
by thee in Tripoll; the country, in fact, is afflicted
by numerous epidemical diseases, which travel from house
to house, from city to city, with the regularity of a
caravan. Among these, the most formidable is this
dancing
mania, which prevails chiefly throughout the winter.
It at first seized on a few people of fashion, and being
indulged in moderation was a cheerful exercise; but in a
little time, by quick advances, it infected all classes of the
community, and became a raging epidemic. The doctors
immediately, as is their usual way, instead of devising a
remedy, fell together by the ears, to decide whether it was
native or imported, and the sticklers for the latter opinion
traced it to a cargo of trumpery from France, as they had
before hunted down the yellow-fever to a bag of coffee
from the West-Indies. What makes this disease the
more formidable is, that the patients seem infatuated with
their malady, abandon themselves to its unbounded
ravages
,
and expose their persons to wintry storms and
midnight
airs, more fatal in this capricious climate, than the
withering Simoon blast of the desert.
I know not whether it is a sight most whimsical, or
melancholy, to witness a fit of this dancing malady. The
lady hops up to the gentleman, who stands at the distance
of about three paces, and then capers back again to her
place;the gentleman of course does the same; then they
skip one way, then they jump another;then they turn
their backs to each other;then they seize each other and
shake hands; then they whirl round, and throw
themselves
into a thousand grotesque and ridiculous attitudes;
sometimes on one leg, and sometimes on the other, and
sometimes on no leg at all: and this they call exhibiting
the graces! By the nineteen thousand capers of the great
mountebank of Damascus, but these graces must be
something
like the crooked backed dwarf of Shabrac, who is
sometimes permitted to amuse his Highness by imitating
the tricks of a monkey. These fits continue for short
intervals of from four to five hours, till at last the lady
is led off, faint, languid, exhausted, and panting, to her
carriage;rattles home;passes a night of feverish
restlessness
,
cold perspirations, and troubled sleep; rises late
next morning, if she rises at all; is nervous, petulant, or
a prey to languid indifference all day; a mere household
spectre, neither giving nor receiving enjoyment; in the
evening hurries to another dance; receives an unnatural
exhilaration from the lights, the music, the crowd, and
the unmeaning bustle;flutters, sparkles, and blooms for
a while, until the transient dolirium being past, the
infatuated
maid drops and languishes into apathy again;
is again led off to her carriage, and the next morning
rises to go through exactly the same joyless routine.
And yet, wilt thou believe it, my dear Raggi, these
are rational beings; nay, more, their countrymen would
fain persuade me they have souls! Is it not a thousand
times to be lamented that beings, endowed with charms
that might warm even the frigid heart of a dervise;
with social and endearing powers, that would render them
the joy and pride of the harem;should surrender
themselves
to a habit of heartless dissipation, which preys
imperceptibly
on the roses of the check; which robs the
eye of its lustre, the mouth of its dimpled smile, the spirits
of their cheerful hilarity, and the limbs of their elastic
vigour:which hurries them off in the spring-time of
existence; or, if they survive, yields to the arms of a
youthful bridegroom a frame wrecked in the storms of
dissipation, and struggling with premature infirmity.
Alas, Muley! may I not ascribe to this cause the
number
of little old women I meet with in this country, from
the age of eighteen to eight-and-twenty?
In sauntering down the room, my attention was
attracted
by a smoky painting, which, on nearer
examination
,
I found consisted of two female figures crowning a
bust with a wreath of laurel. This, I suppose, cried
I, was some famous dancer in his time? O, no,
replied my friend, he was only a general. Good;
but then he must have been great at a cotillion, or expert
at a fiddle-stickor why is his memorial here? Quite
the contrary, answered my companion; history makes
no mention of his ever having flourished a fiddle-stick, or
figured in a single dance. You have no doubt, heard of
him: he was the illustrious Washington, the father and
deliverer of his country: and, as our nation is remarkable
for gratitude to great men, it always does honour to their
memory, by placing their monuments over the doors of
taverns, or in the corners of dancing-rooms.
From thence my friend and I strolled into a small
apartment adjoining the grand saloon, where I beheld a
number of grave looking persons with venerable gray
heads, but without beards, which I thought very
unbecoming
,
seated round a table studying hieroglyphics. I
approached them with reverence, as so many magi, or
learned men, endeavouring to expound the mysteries of
Egyptian science: several of them threw down money,
which I supposed was a reward proposed for some great
discovery, when presently one of them spread his
hieroglyphics
on the table, exclaimed triumphantly, Two
bullets and a bragger! and swept all the money into his
pocket. He has discovered a key to the hieroglyphics,
thought Ihappy mortal!no doubt, his name shall be
immortalized. Willing, however, to be satisfied, I
looked
round on my companion with an inquiring eye; he
understood me, and informed me that these were a
company
of friends, who had met together to win each other's
money and be agreeable. Is that all? exclaimed I;
why then, I pray you, make way, and let me escape
from this temple of abominations, who knows but
these people, who meet together to toil, worry, and fatigue
themselves to death, and give it the name of pleasure
and who win each other's money by way of being
agreeable
may
some one of them take a liking to me, and pick
my pocket, or break my head in a paroxysm of hearty
good-will!
Thy friend,
Mustapha
.
JAMES I. OF SCOTLAND.
James
flourished nearly about the time of Chaucer and
Gower, and was evidently an admirer and studier of
their writings. Indeed, in one of his stanzas he
acknowledges
them as his masters; and, in some parts of his
poem, we find traces of similarity to their productions,
more especially to those of Chaucer. There are always,
however, general features of resemblance in the works
of contemporary authors, which are not so much
borrowed
from each other as from the times. Writers, like
bees, toil their sweets in the wide world; they
incorporate
with their own conceptions the anecdotes and thoughts
which are current in society; and thus each generation
has some feature in common, characteristic of the age in
which it lived.
James in fact belongs to one of the most brilliant eras
of our literary history, and establishes the claims of his
country to a participation in its primitive honours.
Whilst a small cluster of English writers are constantly
cited as the fathers of our verse, the name of their great
Scottish compeer is apt to be passed over in silence; but
he is evidently worthy of being enrolled in that little
constellation
of remote but never-failing luminaries, who shine
in the highest firmament of literature, and who, like
morning
stars, sang together at the bright dawning of British
poesy.
How Peter Stuyvesant relieved the Sovereign People from
the Burthen of taking Care of the Nationwith
sundry
Particulars of his Conduct in Time of Peace.
The
history of the reign of Peter Stuyvesant furnishes a
melancholy picture of the incessant cares and vexations
inseparable
from government; and may serve as a solemn
warning to all who are ambitious of attaining the seat of
power. Though crowned with victory, enriched by
conquest
,
and returning in triumph to his metropolis, his
exultation
was checked by beholding the sad abuses that had
taken
place during the short interval of his absence.
The populace, unfortunately for their own comfort, had
taken a deep draught of the intoxicating cup of power,
during
the reign of William the Testy; and though, upon
the accession of Peter Stuyvesant, they felt, with a certain
instinctive perception, which mobs as well as cattle possess,
that the reins of government had passed into stronger
hands; yet they could not help fretting, and chafing, and
champing on the bit, in restive silence.
It seems by some strange and inscrutable fatality, to be
the destiny of most countries (and more especially of your
enlightened republics,) always to be governed by the most
incompetent man in the nation; so that you will scarcely
find an individual throughout the whole community, but
who will detect to you innumerable errors in
administration
,
and convince you in the end, that had he been at the
head of affairs, matters would have gone on a thousand
times more prosperously. Strange! that that government,
which seems to be so generally understood, should
invariably
be so erroneously administeredstrange, that the
talent of legislation, so prodigally bestowed, should be
denied
to the only man in the nation to whose station it is
requisite.
Thus it was in the present instance, not a man of all the
herd of pseudo-politicians in New-Amsterdam, but was an
oracle on topics of state, and could have directed public
affairs
incomparably better than Peter Stuyvesant. But so
severe was the old governor in his disposition that he would
never suffer one of the multitude of able counsellors by
whom he was surrounded, to intrude his advice, and save
the country from destruction,
Scarcely, therefore, had he departed on his expedition
against the Swedes, than the old factions of William Kieft's
reign began to thrust their heads above water, and to gather
together in political meetings, to discuss the state of the
nation. At these assemblages the busy burgomasters
and their officious schepens made a very considerable figure.
These worthy dignitaries were no longer the fat, well-fed,
tranquil magistrates, that presided in the peaceful days of
Wouter Van Twiller. On the contrary, being elected by
the people, they formed in a manner a sturdy bulwark
between
the mob and the administration. They were great
candidates for popularity, and strenuous advocates for the
rights of the rabble; resembling in disinterested zeal the
wide-mouthed tribunes of ancient Rome, or those virtuous
patriots of modern days, emphatically denominated the
friends of the people.
Under the tuition of these profound politicians it is
astonishing how suddenly enlightened the swinish
multitude
became, in matters above their comprehensions.
Coblers, tinkers, and tailors, all at once felt themselves
inspired, like those religious idiots, in the glorious times
of monkish illumination; and, without any previous study
or experience, became instantly capable of directing all
the movements of government. Nor must I neglect to
mention a number of superannuated, wrong-headed old
burghers, who had come over when boys, in the crew of
the
Goede Vrouw
, and were held up as infallible oracles by
the enlightened mob. To suppose that a man who had
helped to discover a country did not know how it ought
to be governed was preposterous in the extreme. It would
have been deemed as much a heresy as, at the present
day, to question the political talents and universal
infallibility
of our old heroes of '76and to doubt that he
who had fought for a government, however stupid he
might naturally be, was not competent to fill any station
under it.
But as Peter Stuyvesant had a singular inclination to
govern
his province without the assistance of his subjects, he
felt highly incensed on his return to find the factious
appearance
they had assumed during his absence. His first
measure
,
therefore, was to restore perfect order, by prostrating
the dignity of the sovereign people.
He accordingly watched his opportunity, and one
evening
when the enlightened mob was gathered together,
listening
to a patriotic speech from an inspired cobler the
intrepid Peter, like his great namesake of all the Russias,
all at once appeared among them, with a countenance
sufficient
to petrify a millstone. The whole meeting was
thrown into consternationthe orator seemed to have
received
a paralytic stroke in the very middle of a sublime
sentence, and stood aghast with open mouth and trembling
knees, whilst the words horror! tyranny! liberty! rights!
taxes! death! destruction! and a deluge of other
patriotic
phrases came roaring from his throat, before he had
power to close his lips. The shrewd Peter took no notice
of the skulking throng around him but advancing to the
brawling bully ruffian, and drawing out a huge silver watch,
which might have served in times of yore as a town-clock,
and which is still retained by his descendants as a family
curiosity, requested the orator to mend it and set it going.
The orator humbly confessed it was utterly out of his
power as he was unacquainted with the nature of its
construction
.
Nay, but, said Peter, try your ingenuity,
man; you see all the springs and wheels, and how easily
the clumsiest hand may stop it, and pull it to pieces; and
why should it not be equally easy to regulate as to stop
it? The orator declared that his trade was wholly
different
,
he was a poor cobler, and had never meddled
with a watch in his life. That there were men skilled in
the art, whose business it was to attend to those matters;
but for his part he should only mar the workmanship,
and put the whole in confusionWhy, harkee, master
of mine, cried Peter, turning suddenly upon him, with a
countenance that almost petrified the patcher of shoes into
a perfect lapstonedost thou pretend to meddle with
the movements of governmentto regulate and correct,
and patch, and cobble, a complicated machine, the
principles
of which are above thy comprehension, and its
simplest
operation too subtle for thy understanding, when thou
canst not correct a trifling error in a common piece of
mechanism
,
the whole mystery of which is open to thy
inspection
?Hence
with thee to the leather and stone,
which are emblems of thy head; cobble thy shoes, and
confine thyself to the vocation for which heaven has fitted
theeBut, elevating his voice until it made the welkin
ring, if ever I catch thee, or any of thy tribe, meddling
again with the affairs of governmentby St. Nicholas, but
I'll have every mother's bastard of ye flea'd alive, and your
hides stretched for drum-heads, that ye may thenceforth
make a noise to some purpose!
This threat, and the tremendous voice in which it was
uttered, caused the whole multitude to quake with fear.
The hair of the orator rose on his head like his own swine's
bristles, and not a knight of the thimble present but his
heart died within him and he felt as though he could have
verily escaped through the eye of a needle.
But though this measure produced the desired effect in
reducing the community to order, yet it tended to injure
the popularity of the great Peter among the enlightened
vulgar. Many accused him of entertaining highly
aristocratic
sentiments and of leaning too much in favour of
the patricians. Indeed there appeared to be some grounds
for such an accusation, as he always carried himself with
a very lofty soldier-like port, and was somewhat particular
in his dress; dressing himself when not in uniform, in
simple but rich apparel; and was especially noted for
having his sound leg (which was a very comely one)
always arrayed in a red stocking and high heeled shoe.
Though a man of great simplicity of manners, yet there
was something about him that repelled rude familiarity,
while it encouraged frank, and even social intercourse.
He likewise observed some appearance of court
ceremony
and etiquette. He received the common class
of visiters on the stoop,
[16]
[16]
Properly spelled
stoeb
: the porch commonly built in front of
Dutch houses, with benches on each side.
before his door, according to
the custom of our Dutch ancestors. But when visiters
were formally received in his parlour, it was expected
they would appear in clean linen; by no means to be
bare footed, and always to take their hats off. On public
occasions he appeared with great pomp of equipage (for,
in truth, his station required a little show and dignity,) and
always rode to church in a yellow waggon with flaming
red wheels.
These symptons of state and ceremony occasioned
considerable
discontent among the vulgar. They had been
accustomed to find easy access to their former governors,
and in particular had lived on terms of extreme familiarity
with William the Testy. They therefore were very
impatient
of these dignified precautions, which discouraged
intrusion. But Peter Stuyvesant had his own way of
thinking in these matters, and was a staunch upholder of
the dignity of office.
He always maintained that government to be the least
popular, which is most open to popular access and
control
;
and that the very brawlers against court ceremony,
and the reserve of men in power, would soon despise
rulers among whom they found even themselves to be of
consequence. Such at least, had been the case with the
administration of William the Testy; who, bent on making
himself popular, had listened to every man's advice,
suffered
every person to have admittance to his person at all
hours; and, in a word, treated every one as his thorough
equal. By this means every scrub politician and
public
busybody was enabled to measure wits with him, and
to find out the true dimensions, not only of his person,
but his mind.And what great man can stand such
scrutiny?
It is the mystery that envelopes great men, that gives
21
them half their greatness. We are always inclined to
think highly of those who hold themselves aloof from our
examination. There is likewise a kind of superstitious
reverence for office, which leads us to exaggerate the
merits and abilities of men of power, and to suppose that
they must be constituted different from other men. And,
indeed, faith is as necessary in politics as in religion. It
certainly is of the first importance, that a country should
be governed by wise men; but then it is almost equally
important, that the people should believe them to be wise;
for this belief alone can produce willing subordination.
To keep up, therefore, this desirable confidence in
rulers, the people should be allowed to see as little of
them as possible. He who gains access to cabinets soon
finds out by what foolishness the world is governed. He
discovers that there is a quackery in legislation, as well as
in every thing else; that many a measure, which is
supposed
by the million to be the result of great wisdom and
deep deliberation, is the effect of mere chance, or perhaps
of hair-brained experiment.That rulers have their whims
and errors as well as other men, and after all are not so
wonderfully superior to their fellow-creatures as he at first
imagined; since he finds that even his own opinions have
had some weight with them. Thus awe subsides into
confidence
,
confidence inspires familiarity, and familiarity
produces contempt. Peter Stuyvesant, on the contrary,
by conducting himself with dignity and loftiness, was
looked up to with great reverence. As he never gave his
reasons for any thing he did, the public always gave him
credit for very profound ones. Every movement, however
intrinsically unimportant, was a matter of speculation; and
his very red stocking excited some respect, as being
different
from the stocking of other men.
To these times we may refer the rise of family pride
and aristocratic distinctions;
[17]
[17]
In a work published many years after the time here treated of
(in 1761, by C. W. A. M.) it is mentioned that Frederick Philipse was
counted the richest Mynheer in New-York, and was said to have
whole hogsheads of Indian money or wampum
; and had a son
and daughter, who according to the Dutch custom, should divide
it equally.
and indeed I cannot but
look back with reverence to the early planting of those
mighty Dutch families, which have taken such vigorous
root, and branched out so luxuriantly in our state. The
blood which has flowed down uncontaminated through a
succession of steady, virtuous generations, since the times
of the patriarchs of Communipaw, must certainly be pure
and worthy. And if so, then are the Van Rensellaers, the
Van Zandts, the Van Hornes, the Rutgers, the Bensons,
the Brinkerhoffs, the Skermerhorns, and all the true
descendants
of the ancient Pavonians, the only legitimate
nobility
and real lords of the soil.
I have been led to mention thus particularly the well
authenticated claims of our genuine Dutch families,
because
I have noticed with great sorrow and vexation, that
they have been somewhat elbowed aside in latter days, by
foreign intruders. It is really astonishing to behold how
many great families have sprung up of late years, who
pride themselves excessively on the score of ancestry. Thus
he who can look up to his father without humiliation
assumes
not a little importancehe who can safely talk of
his grandfather is still more vaingloriousbut he who can
look back to his great grandfather without blushing is
absolutely
intolerable in his pretensions to family.Bless us!
what a piece of work is here, between these mushrooms of
an hour and these mushrooms of a day!
But from what I have recounted in the former part of
this chapter, I would not have my reader imagine that the
great Peter was a tyrannical governor, ruling his subjects
with a rod of ironon the contrary, where the dignity of
authority was not implicated, he abounded with
generosity
and courteous condescension. In fact he really
believed, though I fear my more enlightened republican
readers will consider it a proof of his ignorance and
illiberality
,
that in preventing the cup of social life from
being dashed with the intoxicating ingredient of politics,
he promoted the tranquillity and happiness of the people
and by detaching their minds from subjects which they
could not understand, and which only tended to inflame
their passions, he enabled them to attend more faithfully
and industriously to their proper callings; becoming more
useful citizens and more attentive to their families and
fortunes
.
So far from having any unreasonable austerity, he
delighted
to see the poor and the labouring man rejoice, and
for this purpose was a great promoter of holydays and
public amusements. Under his reign was first introduced
the custom of cracking eggs at Pass or Easter.
New-Years
Day was also observed with extravagant festivity
and ushered in by the ringing of bells and firing of guns.
Every house was a temple to the jolly god. Oceans of
cherry-brandy, true hollands, and mulled cider, were set
afloat on the occasion: and not a poor man in town but
made it a point to get drunk, out of a principle of pure
economytaking in liquor enough to serve him half a year
afterward.
It would have done one's heart good also to have seen
the valiant Peter, seated among the old burghers and their
wives of a Saturday afternoon, under the great trees that
spread their shade over the Battery, watching the young
men and women as they danced on the green. Here he
would smoke his pipe, crack his joke, and forget the
rugged
toils of war in the sweet oblivious festivities of peace.
He would occasionally give a nod of approbation to those
of the young men who shuffled and kicked most
vigorously
,
and now and then gave a hearty smack, in all honesty
of soul, to the buxom lass that held out longest, and tired
down all her competitors, which she considered as
infallible
proofs of her being the best dancer. Once it is true the
harmony of the meeting was rather interrupted. A young
vrouw, of great figure in the gay world, and who, having
lately come from Holland, of course led the fashions in
the city, made her appearance in not more than half a
dozen petticoats, and these too of most alarming
shortness
.A
universal whisper ran through the assembly;
the old ladies all felt shocked in the extreme, the young
ladies blushed and felt excessively for the poor thing, and
even the governor himself was observed to be a little
troubled
in mind. To complete the astonishment of the good
folks, she undertook, in the course of a jig, to describe some
astonishing figures in algebra, which she had learned
from a dancing master in Rotterdam.Whether she was
too animated in flourishing her feet, or whether some
vagabond
Zephyr took the liberty of intruding his services,
certain it is, that in the course of a grand evolution which
would not have disgraced a modern ball room, she made a
most unexpected displaywhereat the whole assembly
was thrown into great admiration, several grave country
members were not a little moved, and the good Peter
himself
,
who was a man of unparalleled modesty, felt himself
grievously scandalized.
The shortness of the female dresses, which had
continued
in fashion ever since the days of William Kieft, had
long offended his eye; and though extremely averse to
meddling with the petticoats of the ladies, yet he
immediately
recommended that every one should be furnished
with a flounce to the bottom. He likewise ordered that
the ladies, and indeed the gentlemen, should use no other
step in dancing than shuffle and turn, and double trouble;
and forbade, under pain of his high displeasure, any young
lady thenceforth to attempt what was termed exhibiting
the graces.
These were the only restrictions he ever imposed upon
the sex; and these were considered by them as tyrannical
oppressions, and resisted with that becoming spirit always
manifested by the gentle sex whenever their privileges are
invaded,In fact, Peter Stuyvesant plainly perceived, that
if he attempted to push the matter any farther, there was
danger of their leaving off petticoats altogether; so, like a
wise man experienced in the ways of women, he held his
peace, and suffered them ever after to wear their petticoats
and cut their capers as high as they pleased.
Showing the great Difficulty Philosophers have had in
peopling Americaand how the Aborigines came to be
begotten by Accident, to the great Relief and
Satisfaction
of the Author.
The
next inquiry at which we arrive in the regular course
of our history, is to ascertain, if possible, how this
country
was originally peopled; a point fruitful of incredible
embarrassments; for unless we prove that the aborigines
did absolutely come from somewhere, it will be
immediately
asserted in this age of scepticism, that they did not
come at all; and if they did not come at all, then was this
country never populateda conclusion perfectly agreeable
to the rules of logic, but wholly irreconcilable to every
feeling of humanity, inasmuch as it must syllogistically
prove fatal to the innumerable aborigines of this populous
region.
To avert so dire a sophism, and to rescue from logical
annihilation so many millions of fellow creatures, how
many wings of geese have been plundered! what oceans
of ink have been benevolently drained! and how many
capacious heads of learned historians have been addled
and for ever confounded! I pause with reverential awe,
21*
when I contemplate the ponderous tomes in different
languages
,
with which they have endeavoured to solve this
question, so important to the happiness of society but so
involved in clouds of inpenetrable obscurity. Historian
after historian has engaged in the endless circle of
hypothetical
argument, and after leading us a weary chase
through octavos, quartos, and folios, has let us out, at the
end of his work, just as wise as we were at the beginning.
It was doubtless some philosophical wild-goose chase of
the kind, that made the old poet Macrobius rail in such a
passion at curiosity, which he anathematizes most heartily
as an irksome, agonizing care, a superstitious industry
about unprofitable things, an itching humour to see what
is not to be seen, and to be doing what signifies nothing
when it is done. But to proceed:
Of the claims of the children of Noah to the original
population of this country I shall say nothing, as they
have already been touched upon in my last chapter. The
claimants next in celebrity are the descendants of
Abraham
.
Thus Christoval Colon (vulgarly called Columbus,)
when he first discovered the gold mines of Hispaniola,
immediately concluded, with a shrewdness that would
have done honour to a philosopher, that he had found the
ancient Ophir, from whence Solomon procured the gold
for embellishing the temple at Jerusalem: nay, Colon
even imagined that he saw the remains of furnaces of
veritable
Hebraic construction, employed in refining the
precious ore.
So golden a conjecture, tinctured with such fascinating
extravagance, was too tempting not to be immediately
snapped at by the gudgeons of learning; and accordingly,
there were divers profound writers, ready to swear to its
correctness, and bring in their usual load of authorities
and wise surmises, wherewithal to prop it up. Vatablus
and Robertus Stephens declared nothing could be more
clear: Arius Montanus, without the least hesitation,
asserts
that Mexico was the true Ophir, and the Jews the
early settlers of the country: while Possevin, Becan, and
several other sagacious writers, lug in a
supposed
prophecy
of the fourth book of Esdras, which being inserted
in the mighty hypothesis, like the key stone of an arch,
gives it in their opinion perpetual durability.
Scarce, however, have they completed their goodly
superstructure than in trudges a phalanx of opposite
authors
,
with Hans de Laet, the great Dutchman, at their
head; and at one blow tumbles the whole fabric about
their ears. Hans, in fact, contradicts outright all the
Israelitish claims to the first settlements of this country.
attributing all those equivocal symptoms, and traces of
Christianity and Judaism, which have been said to be
found in divers provinces of the New World, to the
Devil
,
who has always affected to counterfeit the worship of the
true Deity. A remark, says the knowing old Padre
d'Acosta, made by all good authors who have spoken
of the religion of nations newly discovered, and founded
besides on the authority of the
fathers of the church
.
Some writers again, among whom it is with great
regret
I am compelled to mention Lopes de Gomora and Juan
de Leri, insinuate that the Cananites, being driven from
the land of promise by the Jews, were seized with such a
panic that they fled, without looking behind them, until
stopping to take breath, they found themselves safe in
America. As they brought neither their national
language
,
manners, nor features with them, it is supposed
they left them behind in the hurry of their flight. I
cannot give my faith to this opinon.
I pass over the supposition of the learned Grotius, who
being both an ambassador and a Dutchman to boot, is
entitled to great respect; that North America was
peopled
by a strolling company of Norwegians, and that
Peru was founded by a colony from ChinaManco, or
Mungo Capac, the first Incas, being himself a Chinese.
Nor shall I more than barely mention, that father
Kircher
ascribes the settlement of America to the Egyptians,
Budbeck to the Scandinavians, Charron to the Gauls,
Juffredus Petri to a skating party from Friesland,
Milius
to the Calt, Marinocus the Sicilian to the Romans,
Le Comte to the Phnicians, Postel to the Moors,
Martin
d' Angleria to the Abyssinians, together with the sage
surmise of De Laet, that England, Ireland and the
Orcades
may contend for that honour.
Nor will I bestow any more attention or credit to the
idea that America is the fairy region of Zipangri, described
by that dreaming traveller Marco Polo the Venetian; or
that it comprises the visionary island of Atlantis, described
by Plato. Neither will I stop to investigate the
heathenish
assertion of Paracelsus, that each hemisphere of the
globe was originally furnished with an Adam and Eve:
or the more flattering opinion of Dr. Romayne, supported
by many nameless authorities, that Adam was of the
Indian
race: or the startling conjecture of Buffon,
Helvetius
,
and Darwin, so highly honourable to mankind,
that the whole human species is accidentally descended
from a remarkable family of the monkeys!
This last conjecture, I must own, came upon me very
suddenly and very ungraciously. I have often beheld the
clown in a pantomime, while gazing in stupid wonder at
the extravagant gambols of a harlequin, all at once
electrified
by a sudden stroke of the wooden sword across his
shoulders. Little did I think at such times that it would
ever fall to my lot to be treated with equal discourtesy,
and that while I was quietly beholding these grave
philosophers
emulating the eccentric transformations of the
hero of pantomime, they would on a sudden turn upon me
and my readers, and with one hypothetical flourish
metamorphose
us into beasts! I determined from that moment
not to burn my fingers with any more of their theories,
but content myself with detailing the different methods by
which they transported the descendants of these ancient
and respectable monkeys, to this great field of theoretical
warfare.
This was done either by migrations by land or
transmigrations
by water. Thus Padre Joseph d'Acosto
enumerates
three passages by land, first by the north of
Europe
,
secondly by the north of Asia, and thirdly by regions
southward of the straits of Magellan. The learned
Grotius
marches his Norwegians by a pleasant route across
frozen rivers and arms of the sea, through Iceland,
Greenland
,
Estotiland, and Naremberga. And various writers,
among whom are Angleria, De Hornn, and Buffon,
anxious
for the accommodation of these travellers, have
fastened
the two continents together by a strong chain of
deductions
by
which means they could pass over dryshod.
But should even this fail, Pinkerton, that industrious old
gentleman, who compiles books and manufactures
Geographies
,
has constructed a natural bridge of ice, from
continent to continent, at the distance of four or five miles
from Behring's straitsfor which he is entitled to the
grateful thanks of all the wandering aborigines who ever
did or ever will pass over it.
It is an evil much to be lamented, that none of the
worthy
writers above quoted, could ever commence his work,
without immediately declaring hostilities against every
writer who had treated on the same subject. In this
particular
,
authors may be compared to a certain sagacious
bird, which in building its nest is sure to pull to pieces
the nests of all the birds in its neighbourhood. This
unhappy
propensity tends grievously to impede the progress
of sound knowledge. Theories are at best but brittle
productions, and when once committed to the stream,
they should take care that like the notable pots which
were fellow voyagers, they do not crack each other.
For my part, when I beheld the sages I have quoted
gravely accounting for unaccountable things and
discoursing
thus wisely about matters for ever hidden from their
eyes, like a blind man describing the glories of light, and
the beauty and harmony of colours, I fell back in
astonishment
at the amazing extent of human ingenuity.
If, cried I to myself, these learned men can weave whole
systems out of nothing, what would be their productions
were they furnished with substantial materialsif they can
argue and dispute thus ingeniously about subjects beyond
their knowledge, what would be the profundity of their
observations, did they but know what they were talking
about! Should old Rhadamanthus, when he comes to
decide upon their conduct while on earth, have the least
idea of the usefulness of their labours, he will undoubtedly
class them with those notorious wise men of Gotham, who
milked a bull, twisted a rope of sand, and wove a velvet
purse from a sow's ear.
My chief surprise is, that among the many writers I
have noticed, no one has attempted to prove that this
country was peopled from the moonor that the first
inhabitants
floated hither on islands of ice, as white bears
cruise about the northern oceansor that they were
conveyed
hither by balloons, as modern aeronauts pass from
Dover to Calaisor by witchcraft, as Simon Magus
posted among the starsor after the manner of the
renowned
Scythian Abaris, who, like the New-England
witches on full blooded broomsticks made most
unheard-of
journeys on the back of a golden arrow, given him by
the Hyperborean Apollo.
But there is still one mode left by which this country
could have been peopled, which I have reserved for the
last, because I consider it worth all the rest; it is
by
accident!
Speaking of the islands of Solomon,
New-Guinea
,
and New-Holland, the profound father
Charlevoix
observes, in fine, all these countries are peopled,
and
it is possible
, some have been so
by accident
. Now
if it could have happened in that manner, why might it
not have been at the
same time
, and by the
same means
,
with
the other
parts of the globe? This ingenious mode
of deducing certain conclusions from possible premises, is
an improvement on syllogistic skill, and proves the good
father superior even to Archimedes, for he can turn the
world without any thing to rest his lever upon. It is only
surpassed by the dexterity with which the sturdy old
Jesuit
,
in another place, cuts the gordian knotNothing,
says he, is more easy. The inhabitants of both
hemispheres
are certainly the descendants of the same father.
The common father of mankind received an express order
from Heaven to people the world, and
accordingly it has
been peopled
. To bring this about, it was necessary to
overcome all difficulties in the way,
and they have also
been overcome!
Pious Logician! How does he put all
the herd of laborious theorists to the blush, by explaining
in five words, what it has cost them volumes to prove
they know nothing about!
They have long been picking at the lock, and fretting
at the latch, but the honest father at once unlocks the door
by bursting it open, and when he has it once ajar, he is
at full liberty to pour in as many nations as he pleases.
This proves to a demonstration that a little piety is better
than a cart-load of philosophy, and is a practical
illustration
of that scriptural promiseBy faith ye shall move
mountains.
From all the authorities here quoted, and a variety of
others which I have consulted, but which are omitted
through fear of fatiguing the unlearned readerI can
only draw the following conclusions, which, luckily
however
,
are sufficient for my purposeFirst, That this part
of the world has actually
been peopled
(Q. E. D.:) to
support which we have living proofs in the numerous
tribes of Indians that inhabit it. Secondly, That it has
been peopled in five hundred different ways, as proved
by a cloud of authors, who from the positiveness of their
assertions, seem to have been eye-witness to the fact
Thirdly, That the people of this country had a
variety of
fathers
, which as it may not be thought much to their
credit by the common run of readers, the less we say on
the subject the better. The question, therefore, I trust is
for ever at rest.
WOUTER VAN TWILLER.
The
renowned Wouter (or Walter) Van Twiller was
descended from a long line of Dutch burgomasters, who
had successively dozed away their lives, and grown fat
upon the bench of magistracy in Rotterdam; and who
had comported themselves with such singular wisdom and
propriety that they were never either heard or talked of
which, next to being universally applauded, should be the
object of ambition to all sage magistrates and rulers.
His surname of Twiller is said to be a corruption of
the original
Twijfler
, which in English means
doubter;
a
name admirably descriptive of his deliberative habits.
For though he was a man shut up within himself like an
oyster, and of such a profoundly reflective turn that he
scarcely ever spoke except in monosyllables; yet did he
never make up his mind on any doubtful point. This
was clearly accounted for by his adherents, who affirmed
that he always conceived every subject on so
comprehensive
a scale that he had not room in his head to turn it
over and examine both sides of it; so that he always
remained
in doubt, merely in consequence of the astonishing
magnitude of his ideas!
There are two opposite ways by which some men get
into noticeone by talking a vast deal and thinking a
little
,
and the other by holding their tongues and not
thinking
at all. By the first many a vapouring superficial
pretender acquires the reputation of a man of quick parts,
by the other, many a vacant dunderpate like the owl,
the stupidest of birds, comes to be complimented by a
discerning world, with all the attributes of wisdom. This,
by the way, is a mere casual remark, which I would not
for the universe have it thought I apply to Governor Van
Twiller. On the contrary, he was a very wise Dutchman,
for he never said a foolish thing; and of such invincible
gravity that he was never known to laugh, or even to
smile, through the course of a long and prosperous life.
Certain, however, it is, there never was a matter proposed,
however simple, and on which your common narrow
minded mortals would rashly determine at the first glance,
but what the renowned Wouter put on a mighty
mysterious
,
vacant kind of look, shook his capacious head, and
having smoked for five minutes with redoubled
earnestness
,
sagely observed, that he had his doubts about
the matter;which, in process of time gained him the
character of a man slow of belief, and not easily imposed
on.
The person of this illustrious old gentleman was as
regularly
formed, and nobly proportioned, as though it had
been moulded by the hands of some cunning Dutch
statuary
,
as a model of majesty and lordly grandeur. He
was exactly five feet six inches in height, and six feet five
inches in circumference. His head was a perfect sphere,
far excelling in magnitude that of the great Pericles (who
was thence waggishly called
Schenocephalus
, or onion
head)indeed, of such stupendous dimensions was it, that
dame Nature herself, with all her sex's ingenuity, would
have been puzzled to construct a neck capable of
supporting
it; wherefore she wisely declined the attempt, and
settled it firmly on the top of his back-bone, just between
the shoulders; where it remained, as snugly bedded as a
ship of war in the mud of Potowmac. His body was
of an oblong form, particularly capacious at bottom; which
was wisely ordered by providence, seeing that he was a
man of sedentary habits, and very averse to the idle labour
of walking. His legs, though exceeding short, were
sturdy in proportion to the weight they had to sustain;
so that when erect he had not a little the appearance of
a robustious beer barrel, standing on skids. His face,
that infalliable index of the mind, presented a vast expanse
perfectly unfurrowed or deformed by any of those lines
and angles which disfigure the human countenance with
what is termed expression. Two small gray eyes twinkled
feebly in the midst, like two stars of lesser magnitude,
in a hazy firmament; and his full-fed checks, which seemed
to have taken toll of every thing that went into his mouth,
were curiously mottled and streaked with dusky red, like a
Spitzemburg apple.
His habits were as regular as his person. He daily
took his four stated meals, appropriating exactly an hour
to each; he smoked and doubted eight hours, and he slept
the remaining twelve of the four-and-twenty. Such was
the renowned Wouter Van Twillera true philosopher,
for his mind was either elevated above, or tranquilly
settled
below, the cares and perplexities of this world. He
had lived in it for years, without feeling the least curiosity
to know whether the sun revolved around it, or it round
the sun; and he had even watched for at least half a
century
,
the smoke curling from his pipe to the ceiling,
without
once troubling his head with any of those numerous
theories, by which a philosopher would have perplexed his
brain, in accounting for its arising above the surrounding
atmosphere.
In his council he presided with great state and
solemnity
.
He sat in a huge chair of solid oak hewn in the
celebrated forest of the Hague, fabricated by an
experienced
Timmerman of Amsterdam, and curiously carved
about the arms and feet, into exact imitations of gigantic
eagle's claws. Instead of a sceptre, he swayed a long
Turkish pipe, wrought with jasmin and amber, which had
been presented to a stadtholder of Holland at the
conclusion
of a treaty with one of the petty Barbary powers.
In this stately chair would he sit, and this magnificent
pipe would he smoke, shaking his right knee with a
constant
motion, and fixing his eyes for hours together upon
a little print of Amsterdam, which hung in a black frame
against the opposite wall of the council chamber. Nay,
it has even been said, that when any deliberation of
extraordinary
length and intricacy was on the carpet, the
renowned Wouter would absolutely shut his eyes for full
two hours at a time, that he might not be disturbed by
external objects; and at such times the internal
commotion
of his mind was evinced by certain regular guttural
sounds, which his admirers declared were merely the
noise of conflict made by his contending doubts and
opinions.
It is with infinite difficulty I have been enabled to
collect
these biographical anecdotes of the great man under
consideration. The facts respecting him were so
scattered
and vague, and divers of them so questionable in point
of authenticity, that I have had to give up the search
after
many, and decline the admission of still more, which
would have tended to heighten the colouring of his
portrait
.
I have been the more anxious to delineate fully the
person and habits of the renowned Van Twiller, from the
consideration that he was not only the first, but also the
best governor that ever presided over this ancient and
respectable province; and so tranquil and benevolent was
his reign that I do not find, throughout the whole of it, a
single instance of any offender being brought to
punishment
;a
most indubitable sign of a merciful governor
and a case unparalleled, excepting in the reign of the
illustrious
22
King Log, from whom, it is hinted, the renowned
Van Twiller was a lineal descendant.
The very outset of the career of this excellent
magistrate
,
like that of Solomon, or to speak more
appropriately
,
like that of the illustrious governor of Barataria,
was distinguished by an example of legal acumen, that
gave flattering presage of a wise and equitable
administration
.
The very morning after he had been solemnly
installed
in office, and at the moment that he was making
his breakfast from a prodigious earthen dish, filled with
milk and Indian pudding, he was suddenly interrupted by
the appearance of one Wandle Schoonhoven, a very
important
old burgher of New-Amsterdam, who complained
bitterly of one Barent Bleecker, inasmuch as he
fraudulently
refused to come to a settlement of accounts, seeing
that there was a heavy balance in favour of the said
Wandle
.
Governor Van Twiller, as I have already observed,
was a man of few words; he was likewise a mortal
enemy to multiplying writings, or being disturbed at his
breakfast. Having listened attentively to the statement
of Wandle Schoonhoven, giving an occasionable grunt, as
he shovelled a mighty spoonful of Indian pudding into
his moutheither as a sign that he relished the dish, or
comprehended the story: he called unto him his
constable
,
and pulling out of his breeches pocket a huge
jackknife
,
despatched it after the defendant as a summons,
accompanied by his tobacco box as a warrant.
This summary process was as effectual in those simple
days as was the seal ring of the great Haroun Alraschid
among the true believers. The two parties, being
confronted
before him, each produced a book of accounts,
written in a language and character that would have
puzzled
any but a high Dutch commentator, or a learned
decipherer
of Egyptian obelisks, to understand. The sage
Wouter took them one after the other, and having poised
them in his hands, and attentiveiy counted over the
number
of leaves, fell straightway into a very great doubt, and
smoked for half an hour without saying a word; at length,
laying his finger beside his nose, and shutting his eyes for
a moment, with the air of a man who has just caught a
subtle idea by the tail, he slowly took his pipe from his
mouth, puffed forth a column of tobacco smoke, and with
marvellous gravity and solemnity pronouncedthat
having
carefully counted over the leaves, and weighed the
books, it was found, that one was just as thick and as
heavy as the othertherefore it was the final opinion of
the court, that the accounts were equally balanced
therefore
Wandle should give Barent a receipt, and Barent
should give Wandle a receiptand the constable should
pay the costs.
This decision being straightway made known, diffused
general joy throughout New-Amsterdam; for the people
immediately perceived, that they had a very wise and
equitable magistrate to rule over them. But its happiest
effect was, that not another lawsuit took place throughout
the whole of his administration; and the office of
constable
fell into such decay, that there was not one of those
losel scouts known in the province for many years. I am
the more particular in dwelling on this transaction, not
only because I deem it one of the most sage and
righteous
judgments on record, and well worthy the attention of
modern magistrates, but because it was a miraculous event
in the history of the renowned Wouterbeing the only
time he was ever known to come to a decision, in the
whole course of his life.
The Grand Council of New-Amsterdamwith Reasons
why an Alderman should be Fat.
To assist the doubtful Wouter in the arduous business of
legislation, a board of magistrates was appointed, which
presided immediately over the police. This potent body
consisted of a schout or bailiff, with powers between those
of the present mayor and sheriff; five burgermeesters, who
were equivalent to aldermen; and five schepens, who
officiated
as scrubs, sub-devils, or bottle-holders, to the
burgermeesters
,
in the same manner as do assistant alderman
to their principals at the present dayit being their duty
to fill the pipes of the lordly burgermeesters, hunt the
markets for delicacies for corporation dinners, and to
discharge
such other little offices of kindness, as were
occasionally
required. It was, moreover, tacitly understood,
though not specifically enjoined, that they should
consider
themselves as butts for the blunt wits of the
burgermeesters
,
and should laugh most heartily at all their
jokes; but this last was a duty as rarely called in action
in those days as it is at present, and was shortly remitted,
in consequence of the tragical death of a fat little schepen,
who actually died of suffocation in an unsuccessful effort
to force a laugh at one of burgermeester Van Zandt's
best jokes.
In return for these humble services, they were permitted
to say,
yes
and
no
at the council board, and to have that
enviable privilege, the run of the public kitchen; being
graciously permitted to eat, and drink, and smoke, at all
those snug junkettings, and public gormandizings, for
which the ancient magistrates were equally famous with
their more modern successors. The post of schepen,
therefore
,
like that of assistant alderman, was eagerly coveted
by all your burghers of a certain description, who have a
huge relish for good feeding, and an humble ambition to
be great men in a small waywho thirst after a little
brief authority, that shall render them the terror of the
alms-house and the bridewellthat shall enable them to
lord it over obsequious poverty, vagrant vice, outcast
prostitution
,
and hunger-driven dishonestythat shall place
in their hands the lesser, but galling scourge of the law,
and give to their beck a houndlike pack of catchpoles and
bum-bailiffstenfold greater rogues than the culprits they
hunt down!My readers will excuse this sudden warmth,
which I confess is unbecoming of a grave historian; but
I have a mortal antipathy to catchpoles, bum-bailiffs, and
little great men.
The ancient magistrates of this city corresponded with
those of the present time no less in form, magnitude, and
intellect, than in prerogative and privilege. The
burgomasters
,
like our aldermen, were generally chosen by
weight; and not only the weight of the body, but likewise
the weight of the head. It is a maxim practically observed
in all honest, plain thinking, regular cities, that an
alderman
should be fatand the wisdom of this can be proved
to a certainty. That the body is in some measure an
image of the mind, or rather that the mind is moulded to
the body, like melted lead to the clay in which it is cast,
has been insisted on by many men of science, who have
made human nature their peculiar study. For as a learned
gentleman of our own city observes, there is a constant
relation between the moral character of all intelligent
creatures
and their physical constitutionbetween their habits
and the structure of their bodies. Thus we see, that a
lean, spare, diminutive body is generally accompanied by
a petulant, restless, meddling mind. Either the mind wears
down the body by its continual motion; or else the body,
not affording the mind sufficient house-room, keeps it
continually in a state of fretfulness, tossing and worrying
about, from the uneasiness of its situation. Whereas your
round, sleek, fat, unwieldy periphery is ever attended by a
mind like itself, tranquil, torpid, and at ease; and we may
always observe, that your well-fed, robustious burghers are
in general very tenacious of their ease and comfort; being
great enemies to noise, discord, and disturbance: and
surely none are more likely to study the public tranquillity
than those who are so careful of their own. Whoever
hears of fat men heading a riot, or herding together in
turbulent mobs?Nonoit is your lean, hungry men,
who are continually worrying society, and setting the whole
community by the ears.
The divine Plato, whose doctrines are not sufficiently
attended to by Philosophers of the present age, allows to
every man three souls: one immortal and rational, seated
in the brain, that it may overlook and regulate the body
a second consisting of the surly and irrascible passions,
which, like belligerent powers, lie encamped around the
hearta third mortal and sensual, destitute of reason,
gross and brutal in its propensities, and enchained in the
belly, that it may not disturb the divine soul, by its
ravenous
howlings. Now, according to this excellent theory,
what can be more clear, than that your fat alderman is
most likely to have the most regular and well conditioned
mind. His head is like a huge, spherical chamber,
containing
a prodigious mass of soft brains, whereon the
rational
soul lies softly and snugly couched, as on a feather
bed; and the eyes, which are the windows of the
bedchamber
,
are usually half closed, that its slumberings may
not be disturbed by external objects. A mind thus
comfortably
lodged, and protected from disturbance, is
manifestly
most likely to perform its functions with regularity
and ease. By dint of good feeding, morever, the mortal
and malignant soul, which is confined in the belly, and
which by its raging and roaring, puts the irritable soul in
the neighbourhood of the heart in an intolerable passion,
and thus renders men crusty and quarrelsome when
hungry
is
completely pacified, silenced, and put to rest:
whereupon a host of honest good-fellow qualities, and
kindhearted affections, which had laid in perdue, slily
peeping out of the loopholes of the heart, finding this
Cerberus
asleep, do pluck up their spirits, turn out one and all
in their holiday suits, and gambol up and down the
diaphraghm
disposing
22 *
their possessor to laughter, good
humour
,
and a thousand friendly offices towards his fellow
mortals.
As a board of magistrates, formed on this model, think
but very little, they are less likely to differ and wrangle
about favourite opinions; and as they generally transact
business upon a hearty dinner, they are naturally disposed
to be lenient and indulgent in the administration of their
duties. Charlemagne was conscious of this, and therefore
(a pitiful measure, for which I can never forgive him,)
ordered in his cartularies, that no judge should hold a
court of justice, except in the morning, on an empty
stomach
.A
rule which, I warrant, bore hard upon all the
poor culprits in his kingdom. The more enlightened and
humane generation of the present day have taken an
opposite
course, and have so managed that the alderman
are the best fed men in the community; feasting lustily
on the fat things of the land, and gorging so heartily
oysters
and turtles, that in process of time they acquire the
activity of the one, and the form, the waddle, and the
green fat of the other. The consequence is, as I have
just said; these luxurious feastings do produce such a
dulcet equanimity and repose of the soul, rational and
irrational, that their transactions are proverbial for
unvarying
monotony; and the profound laws, which they enact
in their dozing moments, amid the labours of digestion,
are quietly suffered to remain as dead letters, and never
enforced, when awake. In a word, your fair round
bellied
burgomaster, like a full fed mastiff, dozes quietly at
the house door, always at home, and always at hand to
watch over its safety: but as to electing a lean, meddling
candidate to the office, as has now and then been done, I
would as lief put a greyhound to watch the house, or a
race-horse
to drag an ox-waggon.
The burgomasters then, as I have already mentioned,
were wisely chosen by weight, and the schepens or
assistant
Alderman, were appointed to attend upon them, and
help them to eat;
but the latter in the course of time, when
they have been fed and fattened into sufficient bulk of body
and drowsiness of brain, became very eligible candidates
for the burgomasters' chair; have fairly eaten themselves
into office, as a mouse eats its way into a comfortable
lodgment
in a goodly blue-nosed, skimmed milk, New-England
cheese.
ICHABOD CRANE AND THE GALLOPING
HESSIAN.
From the Sketch-Book
.
It
was the very witching time of night that Ichabod,
heavy-hearted, and crest-fallen, pursued his travel
homewards
,
along the sides of the lofty hills which rise above
Tarry-Town, and which he had traversed so cheerily in
the afternoon. The hour was as dismal as himself.
Far below him, the Tappan Zee spread its dusky and
indistinct waste of waters, with here and there the tall
mast of a sloop, riding quietly at anchor under the land.
In the dead hush of midnight, he could even hear the
barking of the watch-dog from the opposite shore of the
Hudson! but it was so vague and faint as only to give
an idea of his distance from this faithful companion of
man. Now and then, too, the long-drawn crowing of a
cock, accidentally awakened, would sound far, far off,
from some farm-house away among the hillsbut it was
like a dreaming sound in his ear. No signs of life
occurred
near him, but occasionally the melancholy chirp of
a cricket, or perhaps the guttural twang of a bull-frog,
from a neighbouring marsh, as if sleeping uncomfortably,
and turning suddenly in his bed.
All the storeis of ghosts and goblins that he had heard
in the afternoon, now came crowding upon his
recollection
.
The night grew darker and darker; the stars
seemed to sink deeper in the sky, and driving clouds
occasionally
hid them from his sight. He had never felt
so lonely and dismal. He was, moreover, approaching
the very place where many of the scenes of the ghost
stories had been laid. In the centre of the road stood an
enormous tulip tree, which towered like a giant above all
the other trees of the neighbourhood, and formed a kind
of land-mark. Its limbs were gnarled, and fantastic,
large enough to form trunks for ordinary trees, twisting
down almost to the earth, and rising again into the air.
It was connected with the tragical story of the
unfortunate
Andr, who had been taken prisoner hard by; and
was universally known by the name of Major Andr's
tree. The common people regarded it with a mixture of
respect and superstition, partly out of sympathy for the
fate of its ill-starred namesake, and partly from the tales
of strange sights, and doleful lamentations told
concerning
it.
As Ichabod approached this fearful tree, he began to
whistle: he thought his whistle was answered; it was
but a blast sweeping sharply through the dry banches.
As he approached a little nearer, he thought he saw
something
white, hanging in the midst of the tree; he paused
and ceased whistling; but on looking more narrowly,
perceived that it was a place where the tree had been
scathed by lightning, and the white wood laid bare.
Suddenly he heard a groanhis teeth chattered, and his
knees smote against the saddle: It was but the rubbing
of one huge branch upon another, as they were swayed
about by the breeze. He passed the tree in safety, but
new perils lay before him.
About two hundred yards from the tree a small brook
crossed the road, and ran into a marshy and thickly
wooded
glen, known by the name of Wiley's swamp. A few
rough logs, laid side by side, served for a bridge over this
stream. On that side of the road where the brook
entered
the wood, a group of oaks and chesnuts, matted
thick with wild grape vines, threw a cavernous gloom
over it. To pass this bridge, was the severest trial. It
was at this identical spot that the unfortunate Andr
was captured, and under the covert of those chesnuts
and vines were the sturdy yeomen concealed who surprised
him. This has ever since been considered a haunted
stream, and fearful are the feelings of the schoolboy who
has to pass it alone after dark.
As he approached the stream, his heart began to thump;
he summoned up, however, all his resolution, gave his
horse half a score of kicks in the ribs, and attempted to
dash briskly across the bridge; but instead of starting
forward, the perverse old animal made a lateral
movement
,
and ran broadside against the fence. Ichabod,
whose fears increased with the delay, jerked the reins on
the other side, and kicked lustily with the contrary foot;
it was all in vain; his steed started, it is true, but it was
only to plunge to the opposite side of the road into a
thicket of brambles and alder bushes. The schoolmaster
now bestowed both whip and heel upon the starveling
ribs of old Gunpowder, who dashed forward, snuffling
and snorting, but came to a stand just by the bridge with
a suddenness that had nearly sent his rider sprawling
over his head. Just at this moment a plashy tramp by
the side of the bridge caught the sensitive ear of Ichabod.
In the dark shadow of the grove, on the margin of the
brook, he beheld something huge and misshapen, black
and towering. It stirred not, but seemed gathered up in
gloom, like some gigantic monster ready to spring upon
the traveller.
The hair of the affrighted pedagogue rose upon his
head with terror. What was to be done? To turn and
fly was now too late; and besides, what chance was there
of escaping ghost or goblin, if such it was, which could
ride upon the wings of the wind? Summoning up,
therefore
,
a show of courage, he demanded in stammering
accents
Who
are you? He received no reply. He
repeated his demand in a still more agitated voice. Still
there was no answer. Once more he cudgelled the
inflexible
sides of old Gunpowder, and shutting his eyes,
broke forth with involuntary fervour into a psalm tune.
Just then the shadowy object of alarm put himself in
motion
,
and with a scramble and a bound, stood at once in
the middle of the road. Though the night was dark
and dismal, yet the form of the unknown might now in
some degree be ascertained. He appeared to be a
horseman
of large dimensions, and mounted on a black horse
of powerful frame. He made no offer of molestation or
sociability, but kept aloof on one side of the road, jogging
along on the blind side of old Gunpowder, who had now
got over his flight and waywardness.
Ichabod, who had no relish for this strange midnight
companion, and bethought himself of the adventure of
Brom Bones with the Galloping Hessian, now quickened
his steed, in hopes of leaving him behind. The
stranger
,
however, quickened his horse to an equal pace.
Ichabod
pulled up, and fell into a walk, thinking to lag
behind
the
other did the same. His heart began to sink
within him; he endeavoured to resume his psalm tune,
but his parched tongue clove to the roof of his mouth,
and he could not utter a stave. There was something
in the moody and dogged silence of this pertinacious
companion, that was mysterious and appalling. It was
soon fearfully accounted for. On mounting a rising
ground, which brought the figure of his fellow traveller
in relief against the sky, gigantic in height, and muffled
in a cloak, Ichabod was horror-struck, on perceiving that
he was headless!but his horror was still more
increased
,
on observing that the head, which should have rested
on his shoulders, was carried before him on the pommel
of the saddle; his terror rose to desperation; he rained a
shower of kicks and blows upon Gunpowder, hoping by
a sudden movement, to give his companion the slipbut
the spectre started full jump with him. Away then
they dashed, through thick and thin; stones flying, and
sparks flashing, at every bound. Ichabod's flimsy
garments
fluttered in the air, as he stretched his long lank
body away over his horse's head, in the eagerness of his
flight.
They had now reached the road which turns off to
Sleepy Hollow; but Gunpowder, who seemed possessed
with a demon, instead of keeping up to it, made an opposite
turn, and plunged headlong down hill to the left. This
road leads through a sandy hollow, shaded by trees for
about a quarter of a mile, where it crosses the bridge
famous
in goblin story, and just beyond swells the green
knoll on which stands the whitewashed church.
As yet the panic of the steed had given his unskilful
rider an apparent advantage in the chase; but just as he
had got half way through the hollow, the girths of the
saddle gave way, and he felt it slipping from under him.
He seized it by the pommel, and endeavoured to hold it
firm, but in vain; and had just time to save himself by
clasping old Gunpowder round the neck, when the
saddle
fell to the earth, and he heard it trampled under foot
by his pursuer. For a moment the terror of Hans Van
Ripper's wrath passed across his mindfor it was his
Sunday saddle; but this was no time for petty fears; the
goblin was hard on his haunches; and (unskilful rider
that he was!) he had much ado to maintain his seat;
sometimes slipping on one side, and sometimes on another,
and sometimes jolted on the high ridge of his horse's
back bone, with a violence that he verily feared would
cleave him asunder.
An opening of the trees now cheered him with the
hopes that the Church bridge was at hand. The
wavering
reflection of a silver star in the bosom of the brook
told him that he was not mistaken. He saw the walls
of the church dimly glaring under the trees beyond. He
recollected the place where Brom Bones' ghostly
competitor
had disappeared. If I can but reach that
bridge, thought Ichabod, I am safe. Just then he
heard the black steed panting and blowing close behind
him; he even fancied that he felt his hot breath.
Another
convulsive kick in the ribs, and old Gunpowder
sprung upon the bridge; he thundered over the
resounding
planks; he gained the opposite side; and now
Ichabod
cast a look behind to see if his pursuer should vanish,
according to rule, in a flash of fire and brimstone. Just
then he saw the goblin rising in his stirrups, and in the
very act of hurling his head at him. Ichabod
endeavoured
to dodge the horrible missile, but too late. It
encountered his cranium with a tremendous crashhe
was tumbled headlong into the dust, and Gunpowder,
the black steed, and the goblin rider, passed by like a
whirlwind.
The next morning the old horse was found without
his saddle, and with the bridle under his feet, soberly
cropping the grass at his master's gate. Ichabod did not
make his appearance at breakfastdinner-hour came,
but no Ichabod. The boys assembled at the schoolhouse,
and strolled idly about the banks of the brook; but no
schoolmaster. Hans Van Ripper now began to feel some
uneasiness about the fate of poor Ichabod, and his saddle.
An inquiry was set on foot, and after diligent
investigation
they came upon his traces. In one part of the road
leading to the church, was found the saddle trampled in
the dirt; the tracks of horses' hoofs deeply dented on the
road, and evidently at furious speed, were traced to the
bridge, beyond which, on the bank of a broad part of the
brook, where the water ran deep and black, was found
the hat of the unfortunate Ichabod, and close beside it a
shattered pumpkin.
The brook was searched, but the body of the
schoolmaster
was not to be discovered. Hans Van Ripper,
as executor of his estate, examined the bundle which
contained
all his worldly effects. They consisted of two
shirts and a half; two stocks for the neck; a pair or two
of worsted stockings; an old pair of corduroy
small-clothes
;
a rusty razor; a book of psalm tunes, full of
dog's ears; and a broken pitch-pipe. As to the books
and furniture of the schoolhouse, they belonged to the
community, excepting Cotton Mather's History of
Witch-craft
,
a New-England Almanack, and a book of dreams
and fortune telling; in which last was a sheet of foolscap
much scribbled and blotted in several fruitless attempts
to make a copy of verses in honour of the heiress of Van
Tassel. These magic books and the poetic scrawl were
forthwith consigned to the flames by Hans Van Ripper;
who from that time forward determined to send his
children
no more to school; observing, that he never knew
any good come of this same reading and writing.
Whatever
money the schoolmaster possessed, and he had
received
his quarter's pay but a day or two before, he must
have had about his person at the time of his
disappearance
.
The mysterious event caused much speculation at the
church on the following Sunday. Knots of gazers and
gossips were collected in the church-yard, at the bridge,
and at the spot where the hat and pumpkin had been
found. The stories of Brouwer, of Bones, and a whole
budget of others were called to mind; and when they
had diligently considered them all, and compared them
with the symptoms of the present case, they shook their
heads, and came to the conclusion that Ichabod had been
carried off by the galoping Hessian. As he was a
bachelor
,
and in nobody's debt, nobody troubled his head any
more about him; the school was removed to a different
quarter of the hollow, and another pedagogue reigned in his
stead.
It is true, an old farmer, who had been down to
New-York
on a visit several years after, and from whom this
account of the ghostly adventure was received, brought
home the intelligence that Ichabod Crane was still alive;
that he had left the neighbourhood partly through fear of
the goblin and Hans Van Ripper, and partly in
mortification
at having been suddenly dismissed by the heiress;
that he had changed his quarters to a distant part of the
country; had kept school and studied law at the same
time; had been admitted to the bar, turned politician,
electioneered, written for the newspapers, and finally had
been made a justice of the Ten Pound Court. Brom Bones
too, who shortly after his rival's disappearance,
conducted
the blooming Katrina in triumph to the altar, was
observed
to look exceedingly knowing whenever the story
of Ichabod was related, and always burst into a hearty
laugh at the mention of the pumpkin; which led some to
suspect that he knew more about the matter than he chose
to tell.
ON GREATNESS.
We
have more than once, in the course of our work,
been most jocosely familiar with great personages; and,
in truth, treated them with as little ceremony, respect,
and consideration, as if they had been our most
particular
friends. Now, we would not suffer the mortification
of having our readers even suspect us of an intimacy of the
kind; assuring them we are extremely choice in our
intimates
,
and uncommonly circumspect in avoiding
connections
with all doubtful characters; particularly pimps,
bailiffs
,
lottery-brokers, chevaliers of industry, and great men.
The world in general is pretty well aware of what is to be
understood by the former classes of delinquents: but as
the latter has never, I believe been specifically defined, and
as we are determined to instruct our readers to the extent
of our abilities, and their limited comprehension, it may
not be amiss here to let them know what we understand by
a great man.
First, therefore, let us (editors and kings are always
plural
)
premise, that there are two kinds of greatness;one
conferred by heaventhe exalted nobility of the soul;
the other, a spurious distinction, engendered by the mob,
and lavished upon its favourites. The former of these
distinctions
we have already contemplated with reverence;
the latter we will take this opportunity to strip naked
before
our unenlightened readers; so that if by chance any of
them are held in ignominious thraldom by this base
circulation
of false coin, they may forthwith emancipate
themselves
from such inglorious delusion.
It is a fictitious value given to individuals by public
caprice, as bankers give an impression to a worthless slip
of paper, thereby giving it a currency for infinitely more
23
than its intrinsic value. Every nation has its peculiar
coin, and peculiar great men; neither of which will, for
the most part, pass current out of the country where they
are stamped. Your true mob-created great man is like
a note of one of the little New-England banks, and his
value depreciates in proportion to the distance from home.
In England, a great man is he who has most ribands and
gew-gaws on his coat, most horses in his carriage, most
slaves in his retinue, or most toad-eaters at his table; in
France, he who can most dexterously flourish his heels
above his headDuport is most incontestibly the
greatest
man in France!when the Emperor is absent. The
greatest man in China is he who can trace his ancestry
up to the moon; and in this country our great men may
generally hunt down their pedigree until it burrows in
the dirt like a rabbit. To be concise; our great men are
those who are most expert at crawling on all-fours, and
have the happiest facility in dragging and winding
themselves
along in the dirt like very reptiles. This may seem
a paradox to many of my readers, who with great good
nature be it hinted, are too stupid to look beyond the mere
surface of our invaluable writings; and often pass over
the knowing allusion, and poignant meaning, that is slyly
couching beneath. It is for the benefit of such helpless
ignorants, who have no other creed but the opinion of the
mob, that I shall trace, as far as it is possible to follow him
in his ascent from insignificance,the rise, progress, and
completion of a
little great man
.
In a logocracy, to use the sage Mustapha's phrase, it
is not absolutely necessary to the formation of a great
man that he should be either wise or valiant, upright or
honourable. On the contrary, daily experience shows
that these qualities rather impede his preferment,
inasmuch
as they are prone to render him too inflexibly erect,
and are directly at variance with that willowy suppleness
which enables a man to wind, and twist, through all the
nooks and turns and dark winding passages that lead to
greatness. The grand requisite for climbing the rugged
hill of popularity,the summit of which is the seat of
power,is to be useful. And here once more, for the
sake of our readers, who are of course not so wise as
ourselves
,
I must explain what we understand by usefulness.
The horse, in his native state, is wild, swift, impetuous,
full of majesty, and of a most generous spirit. It is then
the animal is noble, exalted and useless. But entrap him,
manacle him, cudgel him, break down his lofty spirit, put
the curb into his mouth, the load upon his back, and reduce
him into servile obedience to the bridle and the lash, and
it is then he becomes useful. Your jackass is one of the
most useful animals in existence. If my readers do not
now understand what I mean by usefulness, I give them
all up for most absolute nincoms.
To rise in this country a man must first descend. The
aspiring politician may be compared to that indefatigable
insect called the tumbler, pronounced by a distinguished
personage to be the only industrious animal in Virginia;
which buries itself in filth, and works ignobly in the dirt,
until it forms a little ball of dirt, which it rolls
laboriously
along, like Diogenes in his tub; sometimes head,
sometimes tail foremost, pilfering from every rat and mud
hole, and encreasing its ball of greatness by the
contributions
of the kennel. Just so the candidate for greatness:
he plunges into that mass of obscenity, the mob; labours
in dirt and oblivion, and makes unto himself the
rudiments
of a popular name from the admiration and praises
of rogues, ignoramuses, and blackguards. His name
once started, onward he goes struggling and puffing, and
pushing it before him; collecting new tributes from the
dregs and offals of the land as he proceeds, until having
gathered together a mighty mass of popularity, he mounts
it in triumph, is hoisted into office, and becomes a great
man, and a ruler in the land.All this will be clearly
illustrated by a sketch of a worthy of the kind, who
sprung up under my eye, and was hatched from pollution
by the broad rays of popularity, which, like the sun, can
breed maggots in a dead dog.
Timothy Dabble was a young man of very promising
talents; for he wrote a fair hand, and had thrice won
the silver medal at a country academy; he was also
an orator, for he talked with emphatic volubility, and
could argue a full hour without taking either side, or
advancing a single opinion; he had still farther
requisites
for eloquence; for he made very handsome gestures,
had dimples in his cheeks when he smiled, and
enunciated
most harmoniously through his nose. In short,
nature
had certainly marked him out for a great man; for
though he was not tall, yet he added at least half an
inch to his stature by elevating his head, and assumed an
amazing expression of dignity by turning up his nose and
curling his nostrils in a style of conscious superiority.
Convinced by these unequivocal appearances, Dabble's
friends, in full caucus, one and all declared that he was
undoubtedly born to be a great man, and it would be his
own fault if he were not one. Dabble was tickled with
an opinion which coincided so happily with his own,
for vanity, in a confidential whisper, had given him the
like intimation; and he reverenced the judgment of his
friends because they thought so highly of himself;
accordingly
he set out with a determination to become a
great man, and to start in the scrub-race for honour and
renown. How to attain the desired prizes was however
the question. He knew, by a kind of instinctive feeling,
which seems peculiar to grovelling minds, that honour,
and its better partprofit, would never seek him out;
that they would never knock at his door and crave
admittance
;
but must be courted, and toiled after, and
earned. He therefore strutted forth in the highways,
the market-places, and the assemblies of the people;
ranted like a true cockerel orator about virtue, and
patriotism
,
and liberty, and equality, and himself. Full
many a political windmill did he battle with; and full
many a time did he talk himself out of breath, and his
hearers out of their patience. But Dabble found to his
vast astonishment, that there was not a notorious
political
pimp at a ward meeting but could out-talk him;
and what was still more mortifying, there was not a
notorious
political pimp but was more noticed and caressed
than himself. The reason was simple enough; while he
harangued about principles, the others ranted about men;
where he reprobated a political error, they blasted a
political character:they were, consequently, the most
useful; for the great object of our political disputes is not
who shall have the honour of emancipating the
community
from the leading-strings of delusion, but who shall
have the profit of holding the strings and leading the
community by the nose.
Dabble was likewise very loud in his professions of
integrity, incorruptibility, and disinterestedness; words,
which, from being filtered and refined through
newspapers
and election hand-bills, have lost their original
signification; and in the political dictionary are
synonymous
with empty pockets, itching palms, and
interested
ambition. He, in addition to all this, declared
that he would support none but honest men; but
unluckily
as but few of these offered themselves to be
supported, Dabble's services were seldom required. He
pledged himself never to engage in party schemes, or
party politics, but to stand up solely for the broad
interests
of his country;so he stood alone and what is
the same thing, he stood still; for, in this country, he
who does not side with either party is like a body in a
vacuum
between two planets, and must for ever remain
motionless.
Dabble was immeasurably surprised that a man so
honest, so disinterested, and so sagacious withal, and
one too who had the good of his country so much at
heart should thus remain unnoticed and unapplauded.
A little worldly advice, whispered in his ear by a
shrewd old politician, at once explained the whole
mystery
.
He who would become great, said he, must
serve an apprenticeship to greatness; and rise by regular
gradation, like the master of a vessel, who commences by
being scrub and cabin-boy. He must fag in the train of
great men, echo all their sentiments, become their
toad-eater
and parasite,laugh at all their jokes; and, above
all, endeavour to make them laugh; if you only now
and then make a man laugh, your fortune is made. Look
but about you, youngster, and you will not see a single
little great man of the day but has his miserable herd of
retainers, who yelp at his heels, come at his whistle,
worry whoever he points his finger at, and think
themselves
fully rewarded by sometimes snapping up a crumb
that falls from the great man's table. Talk of
patriotism
,
virtue and incorruptibility! tut, man! they are the
very qualities that scare munificence, and keep patronage
at a distance. You might as well attempt to entice crows
with red rags and gunpowder. Lay all these scarecrow
virtues aside, and let this be your maxim, that a
candidate
for political eminence is like a dried herring; he
never becomes luminous until he is corrupt.
Dabble caught with hungry avidity these congenial
doctrines, and turned into his predestined channel of
action with the force and rapidity of a stream which
has for a while been restrained from its natural course.
He became what nature had fitted him to be;his
tone softened down from arrogant self-sufficiency to the
whine of fawning solicitation. He mingled in the
caucusses
of the sovereign people; adapted his dress to a
similitude of dirty raggedness; argued most logically
with those who were of his own opinion; and slandered,
23 *
with all the malice of impotence, exalted characters
whose orbit he despaired ever to approach:just as
that scoundrel midnight thief, the owl, hoots at the
blessed light of the sun, whose glorious lustre he dares
never contemplate. He likewise applied himself to
discharging faithfully the honourable duties of a
partizan
;
he poached about for private slanders, and ribald
anecdotes; he folded hand-billshe even wrote one or
two himself, which he carried about in his pocket and
read to every body; he became a secretary at
ward-meetings
,
set his hand to divers resolutions of patriotic
import, and even once went so far as to make a speech,
in which he proved that patriotism was a virtue;
the reigning bashaw a great man;that this was a free
country, and he himself an arrant and incontestable
buzzard
!
Dabble was now very frequent and devout in his visits
to those temples of politics, popularity, and smoke, the
ward porter-houses; those true dens of equality, where
all ranks, ages, and talents, are brought down to the
dead level of rude familiarity.'Twas here his talents
expanded, and his genius swelled up to its proper size;
like the loathsome toad, which shrinking from balmy
airs, and jocund sunshine, funds his congenial home in
caves and dungeons, and there nourishes his venom, and
bloats his deformity. 'Twas here he revelled with the
swinish multitude in their debauches on patriotism and
porter; and it became an even chance whether Dabble
would turn out a great man or a great drunkard.But
Dabble in all this kept steadily in his eye the only deity
he ever worshipedhis interest. Having by his
familiarity
ingratiated himself with the mob, he became
wonderfully potent and industrious at elections: knew
all the dens and cellars of profligacy and intemperance;
brought more negroes to the polls, and knew to a greater
certainty where votes could be bought for beer, than any
of his contemporaries. His exertions in the cause, his
persevering industry, his degrading compliance, his
unresisting
humility, his steadfast dependence, at length
caught the attention of one of the leaders of the party;
who was pleased to observe that Dabble was a very
useful fellow, who would go all lengths. From that
moment his fortune was made;he was hand and glove
with orators and slang-whangers; basked in the
sunshine
of great men's smiles, and had the honour, sundry
times, of shaking hands with dignitaries, and drinking
out of the same pot with them at a porter-house!!
I will not fatigue myself with tracing this caterpillar
in his slimy progress from worm to butterfly; suffice
it that Dabble bowed and bowed, and fawned, and
sneaked, and smirked, and libelled, until one would
have thought perseverance itself would have settled down
into despair. There was no knowing how long he might
have lingered at a distance from his hopes, had he not
luckily got tarred and feathered for some of his election
eering manuvresthis was the making of him! Let
not my readers staretarring and feathering here is
equal to pillory and cropped ears in England; and either
of these kinds of martyrdom will ensure a patriot the
sympathy and suffrages of a faction. His partizans, for
even he had his partizans, took his case into consideration
he had been kicked and cuffed, and disgraced, and
dishonoured
in the causehe had licked the dust at the feet
of the mobhe was a faithful drudge, slow to anger, of
invincible patience, of incessant assiduitya thorough
going tool, who could be curbed, and spurred, and
directed
at pleasurein short he had all the important
qualifications
for a little great man, and he was accordingly
ushered into office amid the acclamations of the party.
The leading men complimented his usefulness, the
multitude
his republican simplicity, and the slang-whangers
vouched for his patriotism. Since his elevation he has
discovered indubitable signs of having been destined for a
great man. His nose has acquired an additional
elevation
of several degrees, so that now he appears to have
bidden adieu to this world, and to have set his thoughts
altogether on things above; and he has swelled and
inflated
himself to such a degree, that his friends are under
apprehensions that he will one day or other explode and
blow up like a torpedo.
THE END.